10-K 1 d639242d10k.htm FORM 10-K
Table of Contents
UNITED STATES SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION

Washington, D.C. 20549

FORM 10-K

Annual Report Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934

For the year ended December 31, 2013

Commission File Number 1-11758

 

LOGO

 

(Exact name of Registrant as specified in its charter)

 

 	 	 	 
Delaware

(State or other jurisdiction of incorporation or organization)

 	1585 Broadway
New York, NY 10036

(Address of principal executive offices,
including zip code)

 	36-3145972
(I.R.S. Employer Identification No.)

 	(212) 761-4000
(Registrant’s telephone number,
including area code)

Title of each class

  	Name of exchange on
which registered

Securities registered pursuant to Section 12(b) of the Act:

  	
Common Stock, $0.01 par value	  	New York Stock Exchange
Depositary Shares, each representing 1/1,000th interest in a share of Floating Rate Non-Cumulative Preferred Stock, Series A, $0.01 par value

  	New York Stock Exchange
Depositary Shares, each representing 1/1,000th interest in a share of Fixed-to-Floating Rate Non-Cumulative Preferred Stock, Series E, $0.01 par value

  	New York Stock Exchange
Depositary Shares, each representing 1/1,000th interest in a share of Fixed-to-Floating Rate Non-Cumulative Preferred Stock, Series F, $0.01 par value

  	New York Stock Exchange
61/4% Capital Securities of Morgan Stanley Capital Trust III (and Registrant’s guaranty with respect thereto)	  	New York Stock Exchange
61/4% Capital Securities of Morgan Stanley Capital Trust IV (and Registrant’s guaranty with respect thereto)	  	New York Stock Exchange
53/4% Capital Securities of Morgan Stanley Capital Trust V (and Registrant’s guaranty with respect thereto)	  	New York Stock Exchange
6.60% Capital Securities of Morgan Stanley Capital Trust VI (and Registrant’s guaranty with respect thereto)	  	New York Stock Exchange
6.60% Capital Securities of Morgan Stanley Capital Trust VII (and Registrant’s guaranty with respect thereto)	  	New York Stock Exchange
6.45% Capital Securities of Morgan Stanley Capital Trust VIII (and Registrant’s guaranty with respect thereto)	  	New York Stock Exchange
Market Vectors ETNs due March 31, 2020 (2 issuances); Market Vectors ETNs due April 30, 2020 (2 issuances)	  	NYSE Arca, Inc.
Morgan Stanley Cushing® MLP High Income Index ETNs due March 21, 2031	  	NYSE Arca, Inc.
Morgan Stanley S&P 500 Crude Oil Linked ETNs due July 1, 2031	  	NYSE Arca, Inc.
 

Indicate by check mark if Registrant is a well-known seasoned issuer, as defined in Rule 405 of the Securities Act. YES x NO ¨

 

Indicate by check mark if Registrant is not required to file reports pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Act. YES ¨ NO x

 

Indicate by check mark whether Registrant (1) has filed all reports required to be filed by Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 during the preceding 12 months (or for such shorter period that Registrant was required to file such reports), and (2) has been subject to such filing requirements for the past 90 days. YES x NO ¨

 

Indicate by check mark whether the Registrant has submitted electronically and posted on its corporate Web site, if any, every Interactive Data File required to be submitted and posted pursuant to Rule 405 of Regulation S-T during the preceding 12 months (or for such shorter period that the Registrant was required to submit and post such files). YES x NO ¨

 

Indicate by check mark if disclosure of delinquent filers pursuant to Item 405 of Regulation S-K is not contained herein, and will not be contained, to the best of Registrant’s knowledge, in definitive proxy or information statements incorporated by reference in Part III of this Form 10-K or any amendment to this Form 10-K. ¨

 

Indicate by check mark whether the Registrant is a large accelerated filer, an accelerated filer, a non-accelerated filer, or a smaller reporting company. See the definitions of “large accelerated filer,” “accelerated filer” and “smaller reporting company” in Rule 12b-2 of the Exchange Act. (Check one):

 

Large Accelerated Filer x

Non-Accelerated Filer ¨

(Do not check if a smaller reporting company)

 	
Accelerated Filer ¨

Smaller reporting company ¨

 

Indicate by check mark whether Registrant is a shell company (as defined in Exchange Act Rule 12b-2). YES ¨ NO x

 

As of June 28, 2013, the aggregate market value of the common stock of Registrant held by non-affiliates of Registrant was approximately $45,831,657,254. This calculation does not reflect a determination that persons are affiliates for any other purposes.

 

As of January 31, 2014, there were 1,975,673,438 shares of Registrant’s common stock, $0.01 par value, outstanding.

 

Documents Incorporated by Reference: Portions of Registrant’s definitive proxy statement for its 2014 annual meeting of shareholders are incorporated by reference in Part III of this Form 10-K.

Table of Contents
 

LOGO

 

ANNUAL REPORT ON FORM 10-K

for the year ended December 31, 2013

 

Table of Contents	  	  	  	Page	 
Part I	  		  			
Item 1.

  	
Business

  	 	1	  
  	
Overview

  	 	1	  
  	
Available Information

  	 	1	  
  	
Business Segments

  	 	2	  
  	
Institutional Securities

  	 	2	  
  	
Wealth Management

  	 	4	  
  	
Investment Management

  	 	5	  
  	
Competition

  	 	6	  
  	
Supervision and Regulation

  	 	7	  
  	
Executive Officers of Morgan Stanley

  	 	21	  
Item 1A.

  	
Risk Factors

  	 	22	  
Item 1B.

  	
Unresolved Staff Comments

  	 	33	  
Item 2.

  	
Properties

  	 	34	  
Item 3.

  	
Legal Proceedings

  	 	35	  
Item 4.

  	
Mine Safety Disclosures

  	 	46	  
Part II	  		  			
Item 5.

  	
Market for Registrant’s Common Equity, Related Stockholder Matters and Issuer Purchases of Equity Securities

  	 	47	  
Item 6.

  	
Selected Financial Data

  	 	50	  
Item 7.

  	
Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations

  	 	52	  
  	
Introduction

  	 	52	  
  	
Executive Summary

  	 	54	  
  	
Business Segments

  	 	63	  
  	
Accounting Developments

  	 	83	  
  	
Other Matters

  	 	85	  
  	
Critical Accounting Policies

  	 	88	  
  	
Liquidity and Capital Resources

  	 	92	  
Item 7A.

  	
Quantitative and Qualitative Disclosures about Market Risk

  	 	111	  
Item 8.

  	
Financial Statements and Supplementary Data

  	 	136	  
  	
Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm

  	 	136	  
  	
Consolidated Statements of Financial Condition

  	 	137	  
  	
Consolidated Statements of Income

  	 	138	  
  	
Consolidated Statements of Comprehensive Income

  	 	139	  
  	
Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows

  	 	140	  
  	
Consolidated Statements of Changes in Total Equity

  	 	141	  
 

i

LOGO

Table of Contents
Table of Contents	  	  	  	Page	 
  	
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements

  	 	142	  
  	
Financial Data Supplement (Unaudited)

  	 	285	  
Item 9.

  	
Changes in and Disagreements with Accountants on Accounting and Financial Disclosure

  	 	293	  
Item 9A.

  	
Controls and Procedures

  	 	293	  
Item 9B.

  	
Other Information

  	 	295	  
Part III	  		  			
Item 10.

  	
Directors, Executive Officers and Corporate Governance

  	 	296	  
Item 11.

  	
Executive Compensation

  	 	296	  
Item 12.

  	
Security Ownership of Certain Beneficial Owners and Management and Related Stockholder Matters

  	 	297	  
Item 13.

  	
Certain Relationships and Related Transactions, and Director Independence

  	 	298	  
Item 14.

  	
Principal Accountant Fees and Services

  	 	298	  
Part IV	  		  			
Item 15.

  	
Exhibits and Financial Statement Schedules

  	 	299	  
Signatures

  	 	S-1	  
Exhibit Index

  	 	E-1	  
 

ii

LOGO

Table of Contents
Forward-Looking Statements

 

We have included in or incorporated by reference into this report, and from time to time may make in our public filings, press releases or other public statements, certain statements, including (without limitation) those under “Legal Proceedings” in Part I, Item 3, “Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations” in Part II, Item 7 and “Quantitative and Qualitative Disclosures about Market Risk” in Part II, Item 7A, that may constitute “forward-looking statements” within the meaning of the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. In addition, our management may make forward-looking statements to analysts, investors, representatives of the media and others. These forward-looking statements are not historical facts and represent only our beliefs regarding future events, many of which, by their nature, are inherently uncertain and beyond our control.

 

The nature of our business makes predicting the future trends of our revenues, expenses and net income difficult. The risks and uncertainties involved in our businesses could affect the matters referred to in such statements, and it is possible that our actual results may differ, possibly materially, from the anticipated results indicated in these forward-looking statements. Important factors that could cause actual results to differ from those in the forward-looking statements include (without limitation):

 

 	•	 	
the effect of economic and political conditions and geopolitical events;

 

 	•	 	
the effect of market conditions, particularly in the global equity, fixed income, credit and commodities markets, including corporate and mortgage (commercial and residential) lending and commercial real estate markets;

 

 	•	 	
the impact of current, pending and future legislation (including the Dodd-Frank Wall Street Reform and Consumer Protection Act (the “Dodd-Frank Act”)), regulation (including capital, leverage and liquidity requirements), policies (including fiscal and monetary) and legal and regulatory actions in the United States (“U.S.”) and worldwide;

 

 	•	 	
the level and volatility of equity, fixed income and commodity prices, interest rates, currency values and other market indices;

 

 	•	 	
the availability and cost of both credit and capital as well as the credit ratings assigned to our unsecured short-term and long-term debt;

 

 	•	 	
investor, consumer and business sentiment and confidence in the financial markets;

 

 	•	 	
the performance of our acquisitions, divestitures, joint ventures, strategic alliances or other strategic arrangements;

 

 	•	 	
our reputation;

 

 	•	 	
inflation, natural disasters and acts of war or terrorism;

 

 	•	 	
the actions and initiatives of current and potential competitors as well as governments, regulators and self-regulatory organizations;

 

 	•	 	
the effectiveness of our risk management policies;

 

 	•	 	
technological changes and risks, including cybersecurity risks; and

 

 	•	 	
other risks and uncertainties detailed under “Business—Competition” and “Business—Supervision and Regulation” in Part I, Item 1, “Risk Factors” in Part I, Item 1A and elsewhere throughout this report.

 

Accordingly, you are cautioned not to place undue reliance on forward-looking statements, which speak only as of the date on which they are made. We undertake no obligation to update publicly or revise any forward-looking statements to reflect the impact of circumstances or events that arise after the dates they are made, whether as a result of new information, future events or otherwise except as required by applicable law. You should, however, consult further disclosures we may make in future filings of our Annual Reports on Form 10-K, Quarterly Reports on Form 10-Q and Current Reports on Form 8-K and any amendments thereto or in future press releases or other public statements.

 

iii

LOGO

Table of Contents
Part I

 

Item 1.	Business.
 

Overview.

 

Morgan Stanley is a global financial services firm that, through its subsidiaries and affiliates, provides its products and services to a large and diversified group of clients and customers, including corporations, governments, financial institutions and individuals. Morgan Stanley was originally incorporated under the laws of the State of Delaware in 1981, and its predecessor companies date back to 1924. The Company is a financial holding company regulated by the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System (the “Federal Reserve”) under the Bank Holding Company Act of 1956, as amended (the “BHC Act”). The Company conducts its business from its headquarters in and around New York City, its regional offices and branches throughout the U.S. and its principal offices in London, Tokyo, Hong Kong and other world financial centers. At December 31, 2013, the Company had 55,794 employees worldwide. Unless the context otherwise requires, the terms “Morgan Stanley,” the “Company,” “we,” “us” and “our” mean Morgan Stanley together with its consolidated subsidiaries.

 

Financial information concerning the Company, its business segments and geographic regions for each of the 12 months ended December 31, 2013 (“2013”), December 31, 2012 (“2012”) and December 31, 2011 (“2011”) is included in the consolidated financial statements and the notes thereto in “Financial Statements and Supplementary Data” in Part II, Item 8.

 

Available Information.

 

The Company files annual, quarterly and current reports, proxy statements and other information with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the “SEC”). You may read and copy any document the Company files with the SEC at the SEC’s public reference room at 100 F Street, NE, Washington, DC 20549. Please call the SEC at 1-800-SEC-0330 for information on the public reference room. The SEC maintains an internet site that contains annual, quarterly and current reports, proxy and information statements and other information that issuers (including the Company) file electronically with the SEC. The Company’s electronic SEC filings are available to the public at the SEC’s internet site, www.sec.gov.

 

The Company’s internet site is www.morganstanley.com. You can access the Company’s Investor Relations webpage at www.morganstanley.com/about/ir. The Company makes available free of charge, on or through its Investor Relations webpage, its proxy statements, Annual Reports on Form 10-K, Quarterly Reports on Form 10-Q, Current Reports on Form 8-K and any amendments to those reports filed or furnished pursuant to the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (the “Exchange Act”), as soon as reasonably practicable after such material is electronically filed with, or furnished to, the SEC. The Company also makes available, through its Investor Relations webpage, via a link to the SEC’s internet site, statements of beneficial ownership of the Company’s equity securities filed by its directors, officers, 10% or greater shareholders and others under Section 16 of the Exchange Act.

 

You can access information about the Company’s corporate governance at www.morganstanley.com/about/company/governance. The Company’s Corporate Governance webpage includes the Company’s Amended and Restated Certificate of Incorporation; Amended and Restated Bylaws; charters for its Audit Committee; Compensation, Management Development and Succession Committee; Nominating and Governance Committee; Operations and Technology Committee; and Risk Committee; Corporate Governance Policies; Policy Regarding Communication with the Board of Directors; Policy Regarding Director Candidates Recommended by Shareholders; Policy Regarding Corporate Political Activities; Policy Regarding Shareholder Rights Plan; Code of Ethics and Business Conduct; Code of Conduct; and Integrity Hotline information.

 

Morgan Stanley’s Code of Ethics and Business Conduct applies to all directors, officers and employees, including its Chief Executive Officer, Chief Financial Officer and Deputy Chief Financial Officer. The Company

 

 	1	 	LOGO
Table of Contents
will post any amendments to the Code of Ethics and Business Conduct and any waivers that are required to be disclosed by the rules of either the SEC or the New York Stock Exchange LLC (“NYSE”) on its internet site. You can request a copy of these documents, excluding exhibits, at no cost, by contacting Investor Relations, 1585 Broadway, New York, NY 10036 (212-761-4000). The information on the Company’s internet site is not incorporated by reference into this report.

 

Business Segments.

 

The Company is a global financial services firm that maintains significant market positions in each of its business segments—Institutional Securities, Wealth Management and Investment Management.

 

Institutional Securities.

 

The Company provides financial advisory and capital-raising services to a diverse group of corporate and other institutional clients globally, primarily through wholly owned subsidiaries that include Morgan Stanley & Co. LLC (“MS&Co.”), Morgan Stanley & Co. International plc and Morgan Stanley Asia Limited, and certain joint venture entities that include Morgan Stanley MUFG Securities Co., Ltd. (“MSMS”) and Mitsubishi UFJ Morgan Stanley Securities Co., Ltd. (“MUMSS”). The Company, primarily through these entities, also conducts sales and trading activities worldwide, as principal and agent, and provides related financing services on behalf of institutional investors.

 

Investment Banking and Corporate Lending Activities.

 

Capital Raising.    The Company manages and participates in public offerings and private placements of debt, equity and other securities worldwide. The Company is a leading underwriter of common stock, preferred stock and other equity-related securities, including convertible securities and American Depositary Receipts (“ADRs”). The Company is also a leading underwriter of fixed income securities, including investment grade debt, non-investment grade instruments, mortgage-related and other asset-backed securities, tax-exempt securities and commercial paper and other short-term securities.

 

Financial Advisory Services.    The Company provides corporate and other institutional clients globally with advisory services on key strategic matters, such as mergers and acquisitions, divestitures, joint ventures, corporate restructurings, recapitalizations, spin-offs, exchange offers and leveraged buyouts and takeover defenses as well as shareholder relations. The Company also provides advice and services concerning rights offerings, dividend policy, valuations, foreign exchange exposure, financial risk management strategies and financial planning. In addition, the Company furnishes advice and services regarding project financings and provides advisory services in connection with the purchase, sale, leasing and financing of real estate.

 

Corporate Lending.    The Company provides loans or lending commitments, including bridge financing, to select corporate clients through its subsidiaries, including Morgan Stanley Bank, N.A (“MSBNA”). These loans and lending commitments have varying terms; may be senior or subordinated; may be secured or unsecured; are generally contingent upon representations, warranties and contractual conditions applicable to the borrower; and may be syndicated, traded or hedged by the Company. The borrowers may be rated investment grade or non-investment grade.

 

Sales and Trading Activities.

 

The Company conducts sales, trading, financing and market-making activities on securities, swaps and futures, both on exchanges and in over-the-counter (“OTC”), markets around the world. The Company’s Institutional Securities sales and trading activities comprise Institutional Equity; Fixed Income and Commodities; Research; and Investments.

 

LOGO	 	2	 	
Table of Contents
Institutional Equity.    The Company acts as agent and principal (including as a market-maker) in executing transactions globally in cash equity and equity-related products, including common stock, ADRs, global depositary receipts and exchange-traded funds.

 

The Company acts as agent and principal (including as a market-maker) in executing transactions globally in equity derivatives and equity-linked or related products, including options, equity swaps, warrants, structured notes and futures on individual securities, indices and baskets of securities and other equity-related products. The Company offers prime brokerage services to clients, including consolidated clearance, settlement, custody, financing and portfolio reporting. In addition, the Company provides wealth management services to ultra-high net worth and high net worth clients in select regions outside the U.S.

 

Fixed Income and Commodities.    The Company trades, invests and makes markets in fixed income securities and related products globally, including, among other products, investment and non-investment grade corporate debt; distressed debt; bank loans; U.S. and other sovereign securities; emerging market bonds and loans; convertible bonds; collateralized debt obligations; credit, currency, interest rate and other fixed income-linked notes; securities issued by structured investment vehicles; mortgage-related and other asset-backed securities and real estate-loan products; municipal securities; preferred stock and commercial paper; and money-market and other short-term securities. The Company is a primary dealer of U.S. federal government securities and a member of the selling groups that distribute various U.S. agency and other debt securities. The Company is also a primary dealer or market-maker of government securities in numerous European, Asian and emerging market countries, as well as Canada.

 

The Company trades, invests and makes markets globally in listed swaps and futures and OTC cleared and uncleared swaps, forwards, options and other derivatives referencing, among other things, interest rates, currencies, investment grade and non-investment grade corporate credits, loans, bonds, U.S. and other sovereign securities, emerging market bonds and loans, credit indexes, asset-backed security indexes, property indexes, mortgage-related and other asset-backed securities and real estate loan products.

 

The Company trades, invests and makes markets in major foreign currencies, such as the British pound, Canadian dollar, euro, Japanese yen and Swiss franc, as well as in emerging markets currencies. The Company trades these currencies on a principal basis in the spot, forward, option and futures markets.

 

Through the use of repurchase and reverse repurchase agreements, the Company acts as an intermediary between borrowers and lenders of short-term funds and provides funding for various inventory positions. The Company also provides financing to customers for commercial and residential real estate loan products and other securitizable asset classes, and distributes such securitized assets to investors. In addition, the Company engages in principal securities lending with clients, institutional lenders and other broker-dealers.

 

The Company advises on investment and liability strategies and assists corporations in their debt repurchases and planning. The Company structures debt securities, derivatives and other instruments with risk/return factors designed to suit client objectives, including using repackaged asset and other structured vehicles through which clients can restructure asset portfolios to provide liquidity or reconfigure risk profiles.

 

The Company trades, invests and makes markets in the spot, forward, OTC cleared and uncleared swaps, options and futures markets in several commodities, including metals (base and precious), agricultural products, crude oil, oil products, natural gas, electric power, emission credits, coal, freight, liquefied natural gas and related products and indices. The Company offers counterparties hedging programs relating to production, consumption, reserve/inventory management and structured transactions, including energy-contract securitizations and monetization. The Company is an electricity power marketer in the U.S. and owns electricity-generating facilities in the U.S.

 

The Company owns TransMontaigne Inc. and its subsidiaries, a group of companies operating in the refined petroleum products marketing and distribution business, and owns a minority interest in Heidmar Holdings LLC,

 

 	3	 	LOGO
Table of Contents
which owns a group of companies that provide international marine transportation and U.S. marine logistics services. On December 20, 2013, the Company and a subsidiary of Rosneft Oil Company (“Rosneft”) entered into a Purchase Agreement pursuant to which the Company will sell the global oil merchanting unit of its commodities division to Rosneft. The transaction includes the sale of the Company’s minority interest in Heidmar Holdings LLC. The transaction is subject to regulatory approvals and other customary conditions and is expected to close in the second half of 2014. Also on December 20, 2013, the Company announced it is exploring strategic options for its stake in TransMontaigne Inc. and its subsidiaries.

 

Research.    The Company’s research department (“Research”) coordinates globally across all of the Company’s businesses and consists of economists, strategists and industry analysts who engage in equity and fixed income research activities and produce reports and studies on the U.S. and global economy, financial markets, portfolio strategy, technical market analyses, individual companies and industry developments. Research examines worldwide trends covering numerous industries and individual companies, the majority of which are located outside the U.S.; provides analysis and forecasts relating to economic and monetary developments that affect matters such as interest rates, foreign currencies, securities, derivatives and economic trends; and provides analytical support and publishes reports on asset-backed securities and the markets in which such securities are traded and data are disseminated to investors through third-party distributors, proprietary internet sites such as Client Linksm and Matrixsm, and the Company’s global representatives.

 

Investments.    The Company from time to time makes investments that represent business facilitation or other investing activities. Such investments are typically strategic investments undertaken by the Company to facilitate core business activities. From time to time, the Company may also make investments and capital commitments to public and private companies, funds and other entities.

 

The Company sponsors and manages investment vehicles and separate accounts for clients seeking exposure to private equity, infrastructure, mezzanine lending and real estate-related and other alternative investments. The Company may also invest in and provide capital to such investment vehicles. See also “Investment Management” herein.

 

Operations and Information Technology.

 

The Company’s Operations and Information Technology departments provide the process and technology platform required to support Institutional Securities sales and trading activity, including post-execution trade processing and related internal controls over activity from trade entry through settlement and custody, such as asset servicing. This support is provided for listed and OTC transactions in commodities, equity and fixed income securities, including both primary and secondary trading, as well as listed, OTC and structured derivatives in markets around the world. This activity is undertaken through the Company’s own facilities, through membership in various clearing and settlement organizations, and through agreements with unaffiliated third parties.

 

Wealth Management.

 

The Company’s Wealth Management business segment provides comprehensive financial services to clients through a network of more than 16,700 global representatives in 649 locations at year-end. As of December 31, 2013, Wealth Management had $1,909 billion in client assets.

 

Clients.

 

Wealth Management professionals serve individual investors and small-to-medium sized businesses and institutions with an emphasis on ultra-high net worth, high net worth and affluent investors. Wealth Management representatives are located in branches across the U.S. and provide solutions designed to accommodate the individual investment objectives, risk tolerance and liquidity needs of investors residing in and outside the U.S. Call centers are available to meet the needs of emerging affluent clients.

 

LOGO	 	4	 	
Table of Contents
Products and Services.

 

Wealth Management provides clients with a comprehensive array of financial solutions, including products and services from the Company and third-party providers, such as other financial institutions, insurance companies and mutual fund families. Wealth Management provides brokerage and investment advisory services covering various types of investments, including equities, options, futures, foreign currencies, precious metals, fixed income securities, mutual funds, structured products, alternative investments, unit investment trusts, managed futures, separately managed accounts and mutual fund asset allocation programs. Wealth Management also engages in fixed income principal trading, which primarily facilitates clients’ trading or investments in such securities. In addition, Wealth Management offers education savings programs, financial and wealth planning services, and annuity and other insurance products.

 

In addition, Wealth Management offers its clients access to several cash management services through various banks and other third parties, including deposits, debit cards, electronic bill payments and check writing, as well as lending products through affiliates such as MSBNA and Morgan Stanley Private Bank, National Association (“MSPNA” and, together with MSBNA, the “Subsidiary Banks”), including securities-based lending, mortgage loans and home equity lines of credit. Wealth Management also offers access to trust and fiduciary services, offers access to cash management and commercial credit solutions to qualified small- and medium-sized businesses in the U.S., and provides individual and corporate retirement solutions, including individual retirement accounts and 401(k) plans and U.S. and global stock plan services to corporate executives and businesses.

 

Wealth Management provides clients a variety of ways to establish a relationship and conduct business, including brokerage accounts with transaction-based pricing and investment advisory accounts with asset-based fee pricing.

 

Operations and Information Technology.

 

The Operations and Information Technology departments provide the process and technology platform to support the Wealth Management business segment, including core securities processing, capital markets operations, product services, and alternative investments, margin, payments and related internal controls over activity from trade entry through settlement and custody. This activity is undertaken through the Company’s own facilities, through membership in various clearing and settlement organizations, and through agreements with affiliates and unaffiliated third parties.

 

Investment Management.

 

The Company’s Investment Management business segment, consisting of Traditional Asset Management, Merchant Banking and Real Estate Investing activities, is one of the largest global investment management organizations of any full-service financial services firm and offers clients a broad array of equity, fixed income and alternative investments and merchant banking strategies. Portfolio managers located in the U.S., Europe and Asia manage investment products ranging from money market funds to equity and fixed income strategies, alternative investment and merchant banking products in developed and emerging markets across geographies and market cap ranges.

 

Institutional Investors.

 

The Company provides investment management strategies and products to institutional investors worldwide, including corporations, pension plans, endowments, foundations, sovereign wealth funds, insurance companies and banks through a broad range of pooled vehicles and separate accounts. Additionally, the Company provides sub-advisory services to various unaffiliated financial institutions and intermediaries. A Global Sales and Client Service team is engaged in business development and relationship management for consultants to help serve institutional clients.

 

 	5	 	LOGO
Table of Contents
Intermediary Clients and Individual Investors.

 

The Company offers open-end and alternative investment funds and separately managed accounts to individual investors through affiliated and unaffiliated broker-dealers, banks, insurance companies, financial planners and other intermediaries. Closed-end funds managed by the Company are available to individual investors through affiliated and unaffiliated broker-dealers. The Company also distributes mutual funds through numerous retirement plan platforms. Internationally, the Company distributes traditional investment products to individuals outside the U.S. through non-proprietary distributors and distributes alternative investment products through affiliated broker-dealers and banks.

 

Merchant Banking and Real Estate Investing.

 

The Company offers a range of alternative investment, real estate investing and merchant banking products for institutional investors and high net worth individuals. The Company’s alternative investments platform includes funds of hedge funds, funds of private equity and real estate funds and portable alpha strategies. The Company’s alternative investments platform also includes minority stakes in Lansdowne Partners and Avenue Capital Group. The Company’s real estate and merchant banking businesses include its real estate investing business, private equity funds, corporate mezzanine debt investing group and infrastructure investing group. The Company typically acts as general partner of, and investment adviser to, its alternative investment, real estate and merchant banking funds and typically commits to invest a minority of the capital of such funds with subscribing investors contributing the majority.

 

Operations and Information Technology.

 

The Company’s Operations and Information Technology departments provide or oversee the process and technology platform required to support its Investment Management business segment, including transfer agency, mutual fund accounting and administration, transaction processing and certain fiduciary services on behalf of institutional, intermediary and high net worth clients. This activity is undertaken through the Company’s own facilities, through membership in various clearing and settlement organizations, and through agreements with unaffiliated third parties.

 

Competition.

 

All aspects of the Company’s businesses are highly competitive, and the Company expects them to remain so. The Company competes in the U.S. and globally for clients, market share and human talent in all aspects of its business segments. The Company’s competitive position depends on its reputation and the quality and consistency of its long-term investment performance. The Company’s ability to sustain or improve its competitive position also depends substantially on its ability to continue to attract and retain highly qualified employees while managing compensation and other costs. The Company competes with commercial banks, brokerage firms, insurance companies, electronic trading and clearing platforms, financial data repositories, sponsors of mutual funds, hedge funds, energy companies and other companies offering financial or ancillary services in the U.S., globally and through the internet. Over time, certain sectors of the financial services industry have become more concentrated, as institutions involved in a broad range of financial services have left businesses, been acquired by or merged into other firms or have declared bankruptcy. Such changes could result in the Company’s remaining competitors gaining greater capital and other resources, such as the ability to offer a broader range of products and services and geographic diversity, or new competitors may emerge. See also “—Supervision and Regulation” below and “Risk Factors” in Part I, Item 1A herein.

 

Institutional Securities and Wealth Management.

 

The Company’s competitive position for its Institutional Securities and Wealth Management business segments depends on innovation, execution capability and relative pricing. The Company competes directly in the U.S. and globally with other securities and financial services firms and broker-dealers and with others on a regional or product basis.

 

LOGO	 	6	 	
Table of Contents
The Company’s ability to access capital at competitive rates (which is generally impacted by the Company’s credit ratings) and to commit capital efficiently, particularly in its capital-intensive underwriting and sales, trading, financing and market-making activities, also affects its competitive position. Corporate clients may request that the Company provide loans or lending commitments in connection with certain investment banking activities and such requests are expected to increase in the future.

 

It is possible that competition may become even more intense as the Company continues to compete with financial institutions that may be larger, or better capitalized, or may have a stronger local presence and longer operating history in certain areas. Many of these firms have the ability to offer a wide range of products and services that may enhance their competitive position and could result in pricing pressure in its businesses. The complementary trends in the financial services industry of consolidation and globalization present, among other things, technological, risk management, regulatory and other infrastructure challenges that require effective resource allocation in order for the Company to remain competitive. In addition, the Company’s business is subject to increased regulation in the U.S. and abroad, while certain of its competitors may be subject to less stringent legal and regulatory regimes than the Company, thereby putting the Company at a competitive disadvantage.

 

The Company has experienced intense price competition in some of its businesses in recent years. In particular, the ability to execute securities trades electronically on exchanges and through other automated trading markets has increased the pressure on trading commissions and comparable fees. The trend toward direct access to automated, electronic markets will likely increase as additional markets move to more automated trading platforms. It is possible that the Company will experience competitive pressures in these and other areas in the future as some of its competitors may seek to obtain market share by reducing prices (in the form of commissions or pricing).

 

Investment Management.

 

Competition in the asset management industry is affected by several factors, including the Company’s reputation, investment objectives, quality of investment professionals, performance of investment strategies or product offerings relative to peers and an appropriate benchmark index, advertising and sales promotion efforts, fee levels, the effectiveness of and access to distribution channels and investment pipelines, and the types and quality of products offered. The Company’s alternative investment products, such as private equity funds, real estate and hedge funds, compete with similar products offered by both alternative and traditional asset managers, who may be subject to less stringent legal and regulatory regimes than the Company.

 

Supervision and Regulation.

 

As a major financial services firm, the Company is subject to extensive regulation by U.S. federal and state regulatory agencies and securities exchanges and by regulators and exchanges in each of the major markets where it conducts its business. Moreover, in response to the 2007–2008 financial crisis, legislators and regulators, both in the U.S. and worldwide, are in the process of adopting, finalizing and implementing a wide range of reforms that will result in major changes to the way the Company is regulated and conducts its business. It will take time for the comprehensive effects of these reforms to emerge and be understood.

 

Regulatory Outlook.

 

The Dodd-Frank Act was enacted on July 21, 2010. While certain portions of the Dodd-Frank Act became effective immediately, most other portions are effective following transition periods or through numerous rulemakings by multiple governmental agencies, and although a large number of rules have been proposed, many are still subject to final rulemaking or transition periods. U.S. regulators also plan to propose additional regulations to implement the Dodd-Frank Act. Accordingly, it remains difficult to assess fully the impact that the Dodd-Frank Act will have on the Company and on the financial services industry generally. In addition, various

 

 	7	 	LOGO
Table of Contents
international developments, such as the adoption of or further revisions to risk-based capital, leverage and liquidity standards by the Basel Committee on Banking Supervision (the “Basel Committee”), including Basel III, and the implementation of those standards in jurisdictions in which the Company operates, will continue to impact the Company in the coming years.

 

It is likely that 2014 and subsequent years will see further material changes in the way major financial institutions are regulated in both the U.S. and other markets in which the Company operates, although it remains difficult to predict the exact impact these changes will have on the Company’s business, financial condition, results of operations and cash flows for a particular future period.

 

Financial Holding Company.

 

Consolidated Supervision.

 

The Company has operated as a bank holding company and financial holding company under the BHC Act since September 2008. As a bank holding company, the Company is subject to comprehensive consolidated supervision, regulation and examination by the Federal Reserve. As a result of the Dodd-Frank Act, the Federal Reserve also gained heightened authority to examine, prescribe regulations and take action with respect to all of the Company’s subsidiaries. In particular, as a result of the Dodd-Frank Act, the Company is, or will become, subject to (among other things) significantly revised and expanded regulation and supervision, to more intensive scrutiny of its businesses and plans for expansion of those businesses, to new activities limitations, to a systemic risk regime that will impose heightened capital and liquidity requirements, to new restrictions on activities and investments imposed by a section of the BHC Act added by the Dodd-Frank Act referred to as the “Volcker Rule” and to comprehensive new derivatives regulation. In addition, the Consumer Financial Protection Bureau has primary rulemaking, enforcement and examination authority over the Company and its subsidiaries with respect to federal consumer protection laws, to the extent applicable.

 

Scope of Permitted Activities.    The BHC Act places limits on the activities of bank holding companies and financial holding companies, and grants the Federal Reserve authority to limit the Company’s ability to conduct activities. The Company must obtain Federal Reserve Board approval before engaging in certain banking and other financial activities both in the U.S. and internationally. Since becoming a bank holding company in September 2008, the Company has disposed of certain nonconforming assets and conformed certain activities to the requirements of the BHC Act.

 

In addition, the Company continues to engage in discussions with the Federal Reserve regarding its commodities activities, as the BHC Act also grandfathers “activities related to the trading, sale or investment in commodities and underlying physical properties,” provided that the Company was engaged in “any of such activities as of September 30, 1997 in the United States” and provided that certain other conditions that are within the Company’s reasonable control are satisfied. If the Federal Reserve were to determine that any of the Company’s commodities activities did not qualify for the BHC Act grandfather exemption, then the Company would likely be required to divest any such activities that did not otherwise conform to the BHC Act. At this time, the Company believes, based on its interpretation of applicable law, that (i) such commodities activities qualify for the BHC Act grandfather exemption or otherwise conform to the BHC Act and (ii) if the Federal Reserve were to determine otherwise, any required divestment would not have a material adverse impact on its financial condition. In January 2014, the Federal Reserve issued an advance notice of proposed rulemaking, which seeks public comment on certain matters related to financial holding companies’ physical commodity activities and merchant banking investments in nonfinancial companies.

 

Activities Restrictions under the Volcker Rule.    In December 2013, U.S. regulators issued final regulations to implement the Volcker Rule. The Volcker Rule will, over time, prohibit “banking entities,” including the Company and its affiliates, from engaging in certain prohibited “proprietary trading” activities, as defined in the Volcker Rule, subject to exemptions for underwriting, market making-related activities, risk mitigating hedging and certain other activities. The Volcker Rule will also require banking entities to either restructure or unwind

 

LOGO	 	8	 	
Table of Contents
certain investments and relationships with “covered funds,” as defined in the Volcker Rule. Banking entities have until July 21, 2015 to bring all of their activities and investments into conformance with the Volcker Rule, subject to possible extensions. The Volcker Rule requires banking entities to establish comprehensive compliance programs designed to help ensure and monitor compliance with restrictions under the Volcker Rule.

 

The Company is continuing its review of activities that may be affected by the Volcker Rule, including its trading operations and asset management activities, and is taking steps to establish the necessary compliance programs to comply with the Volcker Rule. The Company had already taken certain steps to comply with the Volcker Rule prior to the issuance of final regulations, including, for example, the divestiture of its in-house proprietary quantitative trading unit in January 2013. Given the complexity of the new framework, the full impact of the Volcker Rule is still uncertain, and will ultimately depend on the interpretation and implementation by the five regulatory agencies responsible for its oversight.

 

Capital and Liquidity Standards.    The Federal Reserve establishes capital requirements for the Company and evaluates its compliance with such capital requirements. The Office of the Comptroller of the Currency (the “OCC”) establishes similar capital requirements and standards for the Company’s Subsidiary Banks. Under existing capital regulations, for the Company to remain a financial holding company, its Subsidiary Banks must qualify as “well-capitalized” by maintaining a total risk-based capital ratio (total capital to risk-weighted assets) of at least 10% and a Tier 1 risk-based capital ratio of at least 6%. To maintain its status as a financial holding company, the Company is also required to be “well-capitalized” by maintaining these capital ratios. Effective January 1, 2015, the “well-capitalized” standard for the Company’s Subsidiary Banks will be revised to reflect the higher capital requirements in the U.S. Basel III final rule, as defined below. The Federal Reserve may require the Company and its peer financial holding companies to maintain risk and leverage-based capital ratios substantially in excess of mandated minimum levels, depending upon general economic conditions and a financial holding company’s particular condition, risk profile and growth plans. In addition, under the Federal Reserve and OCC’s leverage capital rules, the Company and the Subsidiary Banks are subject to a minimum Tier 1 leverage ratio (Tier 1 capital to average total consolidated assets) of 4%.

 

As of December 31, 2013, the Company calculated its capital ratios and risk-weighted assets in accordance with the existing capital adequacy standards for financial holding companies adopted by the Federal Reserve. These existing capital standards are based upon a framework described in the “International Convergence of Capital Measurement and Capital Standards,” July 1988, as amended, also referred to as Basel I. In December 2007, the U.S. banking regulators published final regulations incorporating the Basel II Accord, which requires internationally active U.S. banking organizations, as well as certain of their U.S. bank subsidiaries, to implement Basel II standards over the next several years. On January 1, 2013, the U.S. banking regulators’ rules to implement the Basel Committee’s market risk capital framework, referred to as “Basel 2.5,” became effective, which increased the capital requirements for securitizations and correlation trading within the Company’s trading book, as well as incorporated add-ons for stressed Value-at-Risk and incremental risk requirements.

 

In December 2010, the Basel Committee reached an agreement on Basel III. In July 2013, the U.S. banking regulators promulgated final rules to implement many aspects of Basel III (the “U.S. Basel III final rule”). The Company became subject to the U.S. Basel III final rule on January 1, 2014. Certain requirements in the U.S. Basel III final rule, including the minimum risk-based capital ratios and new capital buffers, will commence or be phased in over several years.

 

The U.S. Basel III final rule contains new capital standards that raise capital requirements, strengthen counterparty credit risk capital requirements, introduce a leverage ratio as a supplemental measure to the risk-based ratio and replace the use of externally developed credit ratings with alternatives such as the Organisation for Economic Co-operation and Development’s country risk classifications. Under the U.S. Basel III final rule, the Company is subject, on a fully phased-in basis, to a minimum Common Equity Tier 1 risk-based capital ratio of 4.5%, a minimum Tier 1 risk-based capital ratio of 6% and a minimum total risk-based capital ratio of 8%.

 

 	9	 	LOGO
Table of Contents
The Company is also subject to a 2.5% Common Equity Tier 1 capital conservation buffer and, if deployed, up to a 2.5% Common Equity Tier 1 countercyclical buffer, on a fully phased-in basis by 2019. Failure to maintain such buffers will result in restrictions on the Company’s ability to make capital distributions, including the payment of dividends and the repurchase of stock, and to pay discretionary bonuses to executive officers. In addition, certain new items will be deducted from Common Equity Tier 1 capital and certain existing deductions will be modified. The majority of these capital deductions is subject to a phase-in schedule and will be fully phased in by 2018. Under the U.S. Basel III final rule, unrealized gains and losses on available-for-sale securities will be reflected in Common Equity Tier 1 capital, subject to a phase-in schedule.

 

U.S. banking regulators have published final regulations implementing a provision of the Dodd-Frank Act requiring that certain institutions supervised by the Federal Reserve, including the Company, be subject to minimum capital requirements that are not less than the generally applicable risk-based capital requirements. Currently, this minimum “capital floor” is based on Basel I. Beginning on January 1, 2015, the U.S. Basel III final rule will replace the current Basel I-based “capital floor” with a standardized approach that, among other things, modifies the existing risk weights for certain types of asset classes. The “capital floor” applies to the calculation of minimum risk-based capital requirements as well as the capital conservation buffer and, if deployed, the countercyclical capital buffer.

 

On February 21, 2014, the Federal Reserve and the OCC approved the Company’s and the Subsidiary Banks’ respective use of the U.S. Basel III advanced internal ratings-based approach for determining credit risk capital requirements and advanced measurement approaches for determining operational risk capital requirements (collectively, the “advanced approaches method”) to calculate and publicly disclose their risk-based capital ratios beginning with the second quarter of 2014, subject to the “capital floor” discussed above. One of the stipulations for this approval is that the Company will be required to satisfy certain conditions, as agreed to with the regulators, regarding the modeling used to determine its estimated risk-weighted assets associated with operational risk.

 

In addition to the U.S. Basel III final rule, the Dodd-Frank Act requires the Federal Reserve to establish more stringent capital requirements for certain bank holding companies, including the Company. The Federal Reserve has indicated that it intends to address this requirement by implementing the Basel Committee’s capital surcharge for global systemically important banks (“G-SIBs”). The Financial Stability Board (“FSB”) has provisionally identified the G-SIBs and assigned each G-SIB a Common Equity Tier 1 capital surcharge ranging from 1.0% to 2.5% of risk-weighted assets. The Company is provisionally assigned a G-SIB capital surcharge of 1.5%. The FSB has stated that it intends to update the list of G-SIBs annually.

 

The U.S. Basel III final rule also subjects certain banking organizations, including the Company, to a minimum supplementary leverage ratio of 3% beginning on January 1, 2018. In January 2014, the Basel Committee finalized revisions to the denominator of the Basel III leverage ratio. The revised denominator differs from the supplementary leverage ratio in the treatment of, among other things, derivatives, securities financing transactions and other off-balance sheet items. U.S. banking regulators may issue regulations to implement the revised Basel III leverage ratio.

 

The U.S. banking regulators have also proposed a rule to implement enhanced supplementary leverage standards for certain large bank holding companies and their subsidiary insured depository institutions, including the Company and the Subsidiary Banks. Under this proposal, a covered bank holding company would need to maintain a leverage buffer of Tier 1 capital of greater than 2% in addition to the 3% minimum (for a total of greater than 5%), in order to avoid limitations on capital distributions, including dividends and stock repurchases, and discretionary bonus payments to executive officers. This proposal would further establish a “well-capitalized” threshold based on a supplementary leverage ratio of 6% for insured depository institution subsidiaries, including the Subsidiary Banks. If this proposal is adopted, its requirements would become effective on January 1, 2018 with public disclosure of the ratio required beginning in 2015.

 

LOGO	 	10	 	
Table of Contents
The Basel Committee has developed two standards intended for use in liquidity risk supervision, the Liquidity Coverage Ratio (“LCR”) and the Net Stable Funding Ratio (“NSFR”). The LCR was developed to ensure banks have sufficient high-quality liquid assets to cover net cash outflows arising from significant stress over 30 calendar days. This standard’s objective is to promote the short-term resilience of the liquidity risk profile of banks and bank holding companies. The NSFR has a time horizon of one year and is defined as the ratio of the amount of available stable funding to the amount of required stable funding. This standard’s objective is to promote resilience over a longer time horizon. In January 2014, the Basel Committee proposed revisions to the original December 2010 version of the NSFR and continues to contemplate the introduction of the NSFR, including any final revisions, as a minimum standard by January 1, 2018.

 

In October 2013, the U.S. banking regulators proposed a rule to implement the LCR in the U.S. (“U.S. LCR proposal”). The U.S. LCR proposal would apply to the Company and the Subsidiary Banks. The U.S. LCR proposal is more stringent in certain respects compared to the Basel Committee’s version of the LCR, and includes a generally narrower definition of high-quality liquid assets, a different methodology for calculating net cash outflows during the 30-day stress period as well as a shorter, two-year phase-in period that ends on December 31, 2016. The Federal Reserve has also indicated that it may implement regulatory measures related to short-term wholesale funding.

 

See also “Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operation—Liquidity and Capital Resources—Regulatory Requirements” in Part II, Item 7 herein.

 

Capital Planning, Stress Tests and Dividends.    Pursuant to the Dodd-Frank Act, the Federal Reserve has adopted capital planning and stress test requirements for large bank holding companies, including the Company, which form part of the Federal Reserve’s annual Comprehensive Capital Analysis and Review (“CCAR”) framework. Under the Federal Reserve’s capital plan final rule, the Company must submit an annual capital plan to the Federal Reserve, taking into account the results of separate stress tests designed by the Company and the Federal Reserve.

 

The capital plan must include a description of all planned capital actions over a nine-quarter planning horizon, including any issuance of a debt or equity capital instrument, any capital distribution (i.e., payments of dividends or stock repurchases), and any similar action that the Federal Reserve determines could impact the bank holding company’s consolidated capital. The capital plan must include a discussion of how the bank holding company will maintain capital above the minimum regulatory capital ratios, including the minimum ratios under the U.S. Basel III final rule that are phased in over the planning horizon, and above a Tier 1 common risk-based capital ratio of 5%, and serve as a source of strength to its subsidiary U.S. depository institutions under supervisory stress scenarios. The capital plan final rule requires that such companies receive no objection from the Federal Reserve before making a capital distribution. In addition, even with an approved capital plan, the bank holding company must seek the approval of the Federal Reserve before making a capital distribution if, among other reasons, the bank holding company would not meet its regulatory capital requirements after making the proposed capital distribution. In addition to capital planning requirements, the OCC, the Federal Reserve and the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation (“FDIC”) have authority to prohibit or to limit the payment of dividends by the banking organizations they supervise, including the Company and the Subsidiary Banks, if, in the banking regulator’s opinion, payment of a dividend would constitute an unsafe or unsound practice in light of the financial condition of the banking organization. All of these policies and other requirements could influence the Company’s ability to pay dividends and repurchase stock, or require it to provide capital assistance to the Subsidiary Banks under circumstances which the Company would not otherwise decide to do so.

 

The Company expects that, by March 31, 2014, the Federal Reserve will either object or provide a notice of non-objection to the Company’s 2014 capital plan that was submitted to the Federal Reserve on January 6, 2014.

 

In October 2012, the Federal Reserve issued its stress test final rule as required by the Dodd-Frank Act that requires the Company to conduct semi-annual company-run stress tests. Under this rule, the Company is required to publicly disclose the summary results of its company-run stress tests under the severely adverse economic

 

 	11	 	LOGO
Table of Contents
scenario. The rule also subjects the Company to an annual supervisory stress test conducted by the Federal Reserve. The capital planning and stress testing requirements for large bank holding companies form part of the Federal Reserve’s annual CCAR process.

 

The Dodd-Frank Act also requires each of the Subsidiary Banks to conduct an annual stress test, although MSPNA was given an exemption by the OCC for the 2014 stress test. MSBNA submitted its 2014 annual company-run stress tests to the OCC and the Federal Reserve on January 6, 2014.

 

See also “—Capital and Liquidity Standards” above and “Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operation—Liquidity and Capital Resources—Regulatory Requirements” in Part II, Item 7 herein.

 

Systemic Risk Regime. The Dodd-Frank Act established a regulatory framework applicable to financial institutions deemed to pose systemic risks. Bank holding companies with $50 billion or more in consolidated assets, such as the Company, became automatically subject to the systemic risk regime in July 2010. A new oversight body, the Financial Stability Oversight Council (the “Council”), can recommend prudential standards, reporting and disclosure requirements to the Federal Reserve for systemically important financial institutions, must approve any finding by the Federal Reserve that a financial institution poses a grave threat to financial stability and must undertake mitigating actions. The Council is also empowered to designate systemically important payment, clearing and settlement activities of financial institutions, subjecting them to prudential supervision and regulation and, assisted by the new Office of Financial Research within the U.S. Department of the Treasury (“U.S. Treasury”) (established by the Dodd-Frank Act), can gather data and reports from financial institutions, including the Company.

 

Pursuant to the Dodd-Frank Act, the Company must also provide to the Federal Reserve and FDIC, and MSBNA must provide to the FDIC, an annual plan for rapid and orderly resolution in the event of material financial distress. The Company and MSBNA submitted their most recent annual resolution plans to the Federal Reserve and the FDIC, as required, on October 1, 2013.

 

In February 2014, the Federal Reserve issued final rules to implement certain requirements of the Dodd-Frank Act’s systemic risk regime. Effective on January 1, 2015, the final rules will require bank holding companies with $50 billion or more in total consolidated assets, such as the Company, to conduct internal liquidity stress tests, maintain unencumbered highly liquid assets to meet projected net cash outflows for 30 days over the range of liquidity stress scenarios used in internal stress tests, and comply with various liquidity risk management requirements. In addition, the final rules will require institutions to comply with a range of risk management and corporate governance requirements, such as establishment of a risk committee of the board of directors and appointment of a chief risk officer, both of which the Company already has. Under the final rules, upon a grave threat determination by the Council, the Federal Reserve must require financial institutions subject to the systemic risk regime to maintain a debt-to-equity ratio of no more than 15-to-1 if the Council considers it necessary to mitigate the risk.

 

The systemic risk regime provides that, for institutions posing a grave threat to U.S. financial stability, the Federal Reserve, upon Council vote, must limit that institution’s ability to merge, restrict its ability to offer financial products, require it to terminate activities, impose conditions on activities or, as a last resort, require it to dispose of assets. The Federal Reserve also has the ability to establish further standards, including those regarding contingent capital, enhanced public disclosures, and limits on short-term debt, including off-balance sheet exposures.

 

In addition, the Federal Reserve has proposed rules that would limit the aggregate exposure of each bank holding company with $500 billion or more in total consolidated assets, such as the Company, and each company designated by the Council, to each other such institution to 10% of the aggregate capital and surplus of each institution, and limit the aggregate exposure of such institutions to any other unaffiliated counterparty to 25% of the institution’s aggregate capital and surplus. The proposed rules would also create a new early remediation

 

LOGO	 	12	 	
Table of Contents
framework to address financial distress or material management weaknesses determined with reference to four levels of early remediation, including heightened supervisory review, initial remediation, recovery, and resolution assessment, with specific limitations and requirements tied to each level. The Federal Reserve has stated that it will issue, at a later date, final rules establishing single counterparty credit limits and an early remediation framework.

 

See also “—Capital and Liquidity Standards” above and “—Orderly Liquidation Authority” below.

 

Orderly Liquidation Authority.    Under the Dodd-Frank Act, certain financial companies, including bank holding companies such as the Company and certain covered subsidiaries, can be subjected to resolution under a new orderly liquidation authority. The U.S. Treasury Secretary, in consultation with the President of the U.S., must first make certain extraordinary financial distress and systemic risk determinations, and action must be recommended by two-thirds of the FDIC Board and two-thirds of the Federal Reserve Board. Absent such actions, the Company as a bank holding company would remain subject to resolution under the U.S. Bankruptcy Code.

 

The orderly liquidation authority went into effect in July 2010, and rulemaking is proceeding in stages, with some regulations now finalized and others planned but not yet proposed. If the Company were subject to the orderly liquidation authority, the FDIC would be appointed receiver, which would give the FDIC considerable powers to resolve the Company, including (i) the power to remove officers and directors responsible for the Company’s failure and to appoint new directors and officers; (ii) the power to assign assets and liabilities to a third party or bridge financial company without the need for creditor consent or prior court review; (iii) the ability to differentiate among creditors, including by treating junior creditors better than senior creditors, subject to a minimum recovery right to receive at least what they would have received in bankruptcy liquidation; and (iv) broad powers to administer the claims process to determine distributions from the assets of the receivership to creditors not transferred to a third party or bridge financial institution. In December 2013, the FDIC released its proposed single point of entry strategy for resolution of a systemically important financial institution under the orderly liquidation authority. The FDIC’s release outlines how it would use its powers under the orderly liquidation authority to resolve a systemically important financial institution by placing its top-tier U.S. holding company in receivership and keeping its operating subsidiaries open and out of insolvency proceedings by transferring the operating subsidiaries to a new bridge holding company, recapitalizing the operating subsidiaries and imposing losses on the shareholders and creditors of the holding company in receivership according to their statutory order of priority. The Federal Reserve has indicated that it may also introduce a requirement that certain large bank holding companies maintain a minimum amount of long-term debt at the holding company level to facilitate orderly resolution of those firms.

 

U.S. Subsidiary Banks.

 

U.S. Banking Institutions.    MSBNA, primarily a wholesale commercial bank, offers retail securities-based lending and commercial lending services in addition to deposit products. Certain foreign exchange activities are also conducted in MSBNA. As an FDIC-insured national bank, MSBNA is subject to supervision, regulation and examination by the OCC.

 

MSPNA offers certain mortgage and other secured lending products primarily for customers of its affiliate retail broker-dealer, Morgan Stanley Smith Barney LLC (“MSSB LLC”). MSPNA also offers certain deposit products, as well as prime brokerage custody services. MSPNA is an FDIC-insured national bank whose activities are subject to supervision, regulation and examination by the OCC.

 

Effective October 1, 2013, the lending limits applicable to the Company’s U.S. Subsidiary Banks were revised to take into account credit exposure arising from derivative transactions, securities lending, securities borrowing and repurchase and reverse repurchase agreements with third parties.

 

In January 2014, the OCC proposed a set of specific risk governance guidelines to formalize its heightened expectations for large national banks, including MSBNA. The proposed guidelines set minimum standards for

 

 	13	 	LOGO
Table of Contents
the design and implementation of a bank’s risk governance framework and the oversight of that framework by a bank’s board of directors.

 

Prompt Corrective Action.    The Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation Improvement Act of 1991 provides a framework for regulation of depository institutions and their affiliates, including parent holding companies, by their federal banking regulators. Among other things, it requires the relevant federal banking regulator to take “prompt corrective action” (“PCA”) with respect to a depository institution if that institution does not meet certain capital adequacy standards. Current PCA regulations generally apply only to insured banks and thrifts such as MSBNA or MSPNA and not to their parent holding companies. The Federal Reserve is, however, subject to limitations, authorized to take appropriate action at the holding company level. In addition, as described above, under the systemic risk regime, the Company will become subject to an early remediation protocol in the event of financial distress. The Dodd-Frank Act also formalized the requirement that bank holding companies, such the Company, serve as a source of strength to their U.S. bank subsidiaries and commit resources to support these subsidiaries in the event such subsidiaries are in financial distress.

 

Transactions with Affiliates.    The Company’s U.S. bank subsidiaries are subject to Sections 23A and 23B of the Federal Reserve Act, which impose restrictions on any extensions of credit to, purchase of assets from, and certain other transactions with, any affiliates. These restrictions limit the total amount of credit exposure that they may have to any one affiliate and to all affiliates, as well as collateral requirements, and they require all such transactions to be made on market terms. Effective July 2012, derivatives, securities borrowing and securities lending transactions between the Company’s U.S. bank subsidiaries and their affiliates became subject to these restrictions. The Federal Reserve has indicated that it will propose rulemaking to implement these restrictions. These reforms will place limits on the Company’s U.S. bank subsidiaries’ ability to engage in derivatives, repurchase agreements and securities lending transactions with other affiliates of the Company.

 

In addition, the Volcker Rule generally prohibits “covered transactions,” such as extensions of credit, between (i) the Company or any of its affiliates and (ii) “covered funds” for which the Company or any of its affiliates serve as the investment manager, investment adviser, commodity trading advisor or sponsor and other “covered funds” organized and offered pursuant to specific exemptions in the Volcker Rule.

 

FDIC Regulation.    An FDIC–insured depository institution is generally liable for any loss incurred or expected to be incurred by the FDIC in connection with the failure of an insured depository institution under common control by the same bank holding company. As FDIC-insured depository institutions, MSBNA and MSPNA are exposed to each other’s losses. In addition, both institutions are exposed to changes in the cost of FDIC insurance. In 2010, the FDIC adopted a restoration plan to replenish the reserve fund over a multi-year period. Under the Dodd-Frank Act, some of the restoration must be paid for exclusively by large depository institutions, including MSBNA, and FDIC deposit insurance assessments are calculated using a new methodology that generally favors banks that are mostly funded by deposits.

 

Institutional Securities and Wealth Management.

 

Broker-Dealer and Investment Adviser Regulation.    The Company’s primary U.S. broker-dealer subsidiaries, MS&Co. and MSSB LLC, are registered broker-dealers with the SEC and in all 50 states, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico and the U.S. Virgin Islands, and are members of various self-regulatory organizations, including the Financial Industry Regulatory Authority, Inc. (“FINRA”), and various securities exchanges and clearing organizations. Broker-dealers are subject to laws and regulations covering all aspects of the securities business, including sales and trading practices, securities offerings, publication of research reports, use of customers’ funds and securities, capital structure, recordkeeping and retention, and the conduct of their directors, officers, representatives and other associated persons. Broker-dealers are also regulated by securities administrators in those states where they do business. Violations of the laws and regulations governing a broker-dealer’s actions could result in censures, fines, the issuance of cease-and-desist orders, revocation of licenses or registrations, the suspension or expulsion from the securities industry of such broker-dealer or its officers or employees, or other similar consequences by both federal and state securities administrators.

 

LOGO	 	14	 	
Table of Contents
In addition, MSSB LLC is a registered investment adviser with the SEC. MSSB LLC’s relationship with its investment advisory clients is subject to the fiduciary and other obligations imposed on investment advisors under the Investment Advisers Act of 1940, and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder as well as various state securities laws. These laws and regulations generally grant the SEC and other supervisory bodies with broad administrative powers to address non-compliance, including the power to restrict or limit MSSB LLC from carrying on its investment advisory and other asset management activities. Other sanctions that may be imposed include the suspension of individual employees, limitations on engaging in certain activities for specified periods of time or for specified types of clients, the revocation of registrations, other censures and significant fines.

 

The Dodd-Frank Act includes various provisions that affect the regulation of broker-dealer sales practices and customer relationships. For example, the SEC is authorized to adopt a fiduciary duty applicable to broker-dealers when providing personalized investment advice about securities to retail customers. The U.S. Department of Labor is considering revisions to regulations under the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974 that could subject broker-dealers to a fiduciary duty and prohibit specified transactions for a wider range of customer interactions. These developments may impact the manner in which affected businesses are conducted, decrease profitability and increase potential liabilities.

 

Margin lending by broker-dealers is regulated by the Federal Reserve’s restrictions on lending in connection with customer and proprietary purchases and short sales of securities, as well as securities borrowing and lending activities. Broker-dealers are also subject to maintenance and other margin requirements imposed under FINRA and other self-regulatory organization rules. In many cases, the Company’s broker-dealer subsidiaries’ margin policies are more stringent than these rules.

 

As registered U.S. broker-dealers, certain subsidiaries of the Company are subject to the SEC’s net capital rule and the net capital requirements of various exchanges, other regulatory authorities and self-regulatory organizations. Many non-U.S. regulatory authorities and exchanges also have rules relating to capital and, in some cases, liquidity requirements that apply to the Company’s non-U.S. broker-dealer subsidiaries. These rules are generally designed to measure general financial integrity and/or liquidity and require that at least a minimum amount of net and/or liquid assets be maintained by the subsidiary. See also “—Financial Holding Company—Consolidated Supervision” and “—Financial Holding Company—Capital and Liquidity Standards” above. Rules of FINRA and other self-regulatory organizations also impose limitations and requirements on the transfer of member organizations’ assets.

 

Compliance with regulatory capital requirements may limit the Company’s operations requiring the intensive use of capital. Such requirements restrict the Company’s ability to withdraw capital from its broker-dealer subsidiaries, which in turn may limit its ability to pay dividends, repay debt, or redeem or purchase shares of its own outstanding stock. Any change in such rules or the imposition of new rules affecting the scope, coverage, calculation or amount of capital requirements, or a significant operating loss or any unusually large charge against capital, could adversely affect the Company’s ability to pay dividends or to expand or maintain present business levels. In addition, such rules may require the Company to make substantial capital infusions into one or more of its broker-dealer subsidiaries in order for such subsidiaries to comply with such rules.

 

MS&Co. and MSSB LLC are members of the Securities Investor Protection Corporation (“SIPC”), which provides protection for customers of broker-dealers against losses in the event of the insolvency of a broker-dealer. SIPC protects customers’ eligible securities held by a member broker-dealer up to $500,000 per customer for all accounts in the same capacity subject to a limitation of $250,000 for claims for uninvested cash balances. To supplement this SIPC coverage, each of MS&Co. and MSSB LLC have purchased additional protection for the benefit of their customers in the form of an annual policy issued by certain underwriters and various insurance companies that provides protection for each eligible customer above SIPC limits subject to an aggregate firmwide cap of $1 billion with no per client sublimit for securities and a $1.9 million per client limit for the cash portion of any remaining shortfall. As noted under “—Financial Holding Company—Systemic Risk Regime” above, the Dodd-Frank Act contains special provisions for the orderly liquidation of covered financial

 

 	15	 	LOGO
Table of Contents
institutions (which could potentially include MS&Co. and/or MSSB LLC). While these provisions are generally intended to provide customers of covered broker-dealers with protections at least as beneficial as they would enjoy in a broker-dealer liquidation proceeding under the Securities Investor Protection Act, the details and implementation of such protections are subject to further rulemaking.

 

The SEC adopted rules requiring broker-dealers to maintain risk management controls and supervisory procedures with respect to providing access to securities markets, which became fully effective in 2012. In July 2012, the SEC adopted a consolidated audit trail rule, which, when fully implemented, will require broker-dealers to report into one consolidated audit trail comprehensive information about every material event in the lifecycle of every quote, order, and execution in all exchange-listed stocks and options. It is possible that the SEC or self-regulatory organizations could propose or adopt additional market structure rules for equity and fixed income markets in the future. The provisions, new rules and proposals discussed above could result in increased costs and could otherwise adversely affect trading volumes and other conditions in the markets in which we operate.

 

Regulation of Futures Activities and Certain Commodities Activities.    As futures commission merchants, MS&Co. and MSSB LLC are subject to net capital requirements of, and their activities are regulated by, the U.S. Commodity Futures Trading Commission (the “CFTC”), the National Futures Association (the “NFA”), a registered futures association, and various commodity futures exchanges. MS&Co. and MSSB LLC and certain of their affiliates are registered members of the NFA in various capacities. Rules and regulations of the CFTC, NFA and commodity futures exchanges address obligations related to, among other things, the segregation of customer funds and the holding apart of a secured amount, the use by futures commission merchants of customer funds, recordkeeping and reporting obligations, risk disclosure, risk management and discretionary trading. MS&Co. and MSSB LLC have affiliates that are registered as commodity trading advisors and/or commodity pool operators, or are operating under certain exemptions from such registration pursuant to CFTC rules and other guidance. Under CFTC and NFA rules, commodity trading advisors who manage accounts and commodity pool operators that are registered with the NFA must distribute disclosure documents and maintain specified records relating to their activities, and commodity trading advisors and commodity pool operators have certain responsibilities with respect to each pool they advise or operate. Violations of the rules of the CFTC, the NFA or the commodity exchanges could result in remedial actions, including fines, registration restrictions or terminations, trading prohibitions or revocations of commodity exchange memberships.

 

The Company’s commodities activities are subject to extensive and evolving energy, commodities, environmental, health and safety and other governmental laws and regulations in the U.S. and abroad. Intensified scrutiny of certain energy markets by U.S. federal, state and local authorities in the U.S. and abroad and by the public has resulted in increased regulatory and legal enforcement and remedial proceedings involving energy companies, including those engaged in power generation and liquid hydrocarbons trading. Terminal facilities and other assets relating to the Company’s commodities activities also are subject to environmental laws both in the U.S. and abroad. In addition, pipeline, transport and terminal operations are subject to state laws in connection with the cleanup of hazardous substances that may have been released at properties currently or previously owned or operated by us or locations to which we have sent wastes for disposal. See also “—Financial Holding Company—Scope of Permitted Activities” above.

 

Derivatives Regulation.    Through the Dodd-Frank Act, the Company faces a comprehensive U.S. regulatory regime for its activities in certain OTC derivatives. The regulation of “swaps” and “security-based swaps” (collectively, “Swaps”) in the U.S. is being, and will continue to be, effected and implemented through the CFTC, SEC and other agency regulations. The CFTC has completed the majority of its regulations in this area, most of which are in effect. The SEC and other agencies charged with regulating Swaps have not yet adopted the majority of their Swap regulations.

 

Subject to certain limited exceptions, the Dodd-Frank Act requires central clearing of certain types of Swaps, public and regulatory reporting, and mandatory trading on regulated exchanges or execution facilities. Reporting requirements for CFTC-regulated Swaps are now in effect and certain types of CFTC-regulated interest rate and index credit default swaps are subject to mandatory central clearing. Certain Swaps will be required to be traded on an exchange or execution facility starting in February 2014.

 

LOGO	 	16	 	
Table of Contents
The Dodd-Frank Act also requires the registration of “swap dealers” and “major swap participants” with the CFTC and “security-based swap dealers” and “major security-based swap participants” with the SEC (collectively, “Swaps Entities”). Certain of the Company’s subsidiaries have registered with the CFTC as swap dealers and in the future additional subsidiaries may register with the CFTC as swap dealers. One or more subsidiaries of the Company will in the future be required to register with the SEC as security-based swap dealers.

 

Swaps Entities are or will be subject to a comprehensive regulatory regime with new obligations for the Swaps activities for which they are registered, including new capital requirements, a new margin regime for uncleared Swaps and a new segregation regime for collateral of counterparties to uncleared Swaps. Swaps Entities are subject to additional duties, including, among others, internal and external business conduct and documentation standards with respect to their Swaps counterparties, recordkeeping and reporting. The Company’s swap dealers are also subject to new rules under the Dodd-Frank Act regarding segregation of customer collateral for cleared transactions, large trader reporting, and anti-fraud and anti-manipulation requirements related to activities in Swaps.

 

The specific parameters of these requirements for Swaps have been and continue to be developed through CFTC, SEC and bank regulator rulemakings. While many of the CFTC’s requirements are already final and effective, others are subject to further rulemaking or deferred compliance dates. In particular, the CFTC, SEC and the banking regulators have proposed, but not yet adopted, rules regarding margin and capital requirements for Swaps Entities. In September 2013, the Basel Committee and the International Organization of Securities Commissions released their final policy framework on margin requirements for non-centrally-cleared derivatives. The full impact on the Company of the U.S. agencies’ margin and capital requirements for Swaps Entities will not be known with certainty until the requirements are finalized. In November 2013, the CFTC re-proposed rules that, if finalized as proposed, would limit positions in 28 agricultural, energy and metals commodities, including swaps, futures and options that are economically equivalent to those commodity contracts. Through this re-proposal, the CFTC is taking steps to institute position limits that were previously finalized in November 2011 but were vacated by a federal court in September 2012.

 

Although the full impact of U.S. derivatives regulation on the Company remains unclear, the Company has already, and will continue to, face increased costs and regulatory oversight due to the registration and regulatory requirements indicated above. Complying with the Swaps rules also has required, and will in the future require, the Company to change its Swaps businesses, and has required, and will in the future require, extensive systems and personnel changes. Compliance with Swap-related partially finalized regulatory capital requirements may require the Company to devote more capital to its Swaps business.

 

In July 2013, the CFTC issued final guidance on the cross-border application of its Swaps regulations and an exemptive order providing a delay in compliance timing of certain of those regulations as applied to certain non-U.S. entities engaging in Swaps activities. Even with the issuance of the guidance, the full scope of the extraterritorial impact of U.S. Swaps regulation remains unclear.

 

The E.U. has adopted and implemented certain rules relating to the OTC derivatives market and these rules imposed regulatory reporting beginning in February 2014. The E.U. plans to impose central clearing requirements on OTC derivatives in the future. In addition, other non-U.S. jurisdictions are in the process of adopting and implementing legislation emanating from the G20 commitments that will require, among other things, the central clearing of certain OTC derivatives, mandatory reporting of derivatives and bilateral risk mitigation procedures for non-cleared trades. It remains unclear at present how the non-U.S. and U.S. derivatives regulatory regimes will interact.

 

Non-U.S. Regulation.    The Company’s Institutional Securities businesses also are regulated extensively by non-U.S. regulators, including governments, securities exchanges, commodity exchanges, self-regulatory organizations, central banks and regulatory bodies, especially in those jurisdictions in which the Company maintains an office. Non-U.S. policy makers and regulators, including the European Commission and European

 

 	17	 	LOGO
Table of Contents
Supervisory Authorities, continue to propose and adopt numerous market reforms, including those that may further impact the structure of banks, and formulate regulatory standards and measures that will be of relevance and importance to the Company’s European operations. Certain Morgan Stanley subsidiaries are regulated as broker-dealers under the laws of the jurisdictions in which they operate. Subsidiaries engaged in banking and trust activities outside the U.S. are regulated by various government agencies in the particular jurisdiction where they are chartered, incorporated and/or conduct their business activity. For instance, the Prudential Regulation Authority (“PRA”), the Financial Conduct Authority (“FCA”) and several securities and futures exchanges in the United Kingdom (“U.K.”), including the London Stock Exchange and Euronext.liffe, regulate the Company’s activities in the U.K.; the Bundesanstalt für Finanzdienstleistungsaufsicht (the Federal Financial Supervisory Authority) and the Deutsche Bôrse AG regulate its activities in the Federal Republic of Germany; Eidgenôssische Finanzmarktaufsicht (the Financial Market Supervisory Authority) regulates its activities in Switzerland; the Financial Services Agency, the Bank of Japan, the Japanese Securities Dealers Association and several Japanese securities and futures exchanges, including the Tokyo Stock Exchange, the Osaka Securities Exchange and the Tokyo International Financial Futures Exchange, regulate its activities in Japan; the Hong Kong Securities and Futures Commission, the Hong Kong Monetary Authority and the Hong Kong Exchanges and Clearing Limited regulate its operations in Hong Kong; and the Monetary Authority of Singapore and the Singapore Exchange Limited regulate its business in Singapore.

 

Regulators in the U.K., E.U. and other major jurisdictions have also finalized or are in the process of proposing or finalizing risk-based capital, leverage capital, liquidity, banking structural reforms and other regulatory standards applicable to certain Morgan Stanley subsidiaries that operate in those jurisdictions. For example, the Company’s primary broker-dealer in the U.K., Morgan Stanley & Co. International plc (“MSIP”), is subject to regulation and supervision by the PRA with respect to prudential matters. As a prudential regulator, the PRA seeks to promote the safety and soundness of the firms that it regulates and to minimize the adverse effects that such firms may have on the stability of the U.K. financial system. The PRA has broad legal authority to establish prudential and other standards to pursue these objectives, including approvals of relevant regulatory models, as well as to bring formal and informal supervisory and disciplinary actions against regulated firms to address noncompliance with such standards. MSIP is also regulated and supervised by the FCA with respect to business conduct matters. On January 1, 2014, MSIP became subject to the Capital Requirements Regulation and Capital Requirements (collectively, “CRD IV”), which implements the Basel III and other regulatory requirements for E.U. investment firms, such as MSIP. European Market Infrastructure Regulation introduces new requirements regarding the central clearing, reporting and conduct of business with respect to derivatives. In addition, proposals to revise the Markets in Financial Instruments Directive would introduce various trading and market infrastructure reforms in the E.U. Lawmakers in the E.U. are also in the process of finalizing a proposed directive that would establish a framework for the recovery and resolution of E.U. credit institutions and investment firms, including MSIP.

 

Investment Management.

 

Many of the subsidiaries engaged in the Company’s asset management activities are registered as investment advisers with the SEC. Many aspects of the Company’s asset management activities are subject to federal and state laws and regulations primarily intended to benefit the investor or client. These laws and regulations generally grant supervisory agencies and bodies broad administrative powers, including the power to limit or restrict the Company from carrying on its asset management activities in the event that it fails to comply with such laws and regulations. Sanctions that may be imposed for such failure include the suspension of individual employees, limitations on the Company engaging in various asset management activities for specified periods of time or specified types of clients, the revocation of registrations, other censures and significant fines. In order to facilitate its asset management business, the Company owns a registered U.S. broker-dealer, Morgan Stanley Distribution, Inc., which acts as distributor to the Morgan Stanley mutual funds and as placement agent to certain private investment funds managed by the Company’s Investment Management business segment. A number of legal entities within the Company’s Investment Management business are registered as commodity trading advisors and/or commodity pool operators, or are operating under certain exemptions from such registration

 

LOGO	 	18	 	
Table of Contents
pursuant to CFTC rules and other guidance. See also “—Institutional Securities and Wealth Management—Broker-Dealer and Investment Adviser Regulation” and “—Institutional Securities and Wealth Management—Regulation of Futures Activities and Certain Commodities Activities” above.

 

As a result of the passage of the Dodd-Frank Act, the Company’s asset management activities will be subject to certain additional laws and regulations, including, but not limited to, additional reporting and recordkeeping requirements (including with respect to clients that are private funds), restrictions on sponsoring or investing in, or maintaining certain other relationships with, “covered funds,” as defined in the Volcker Rule, subject to certain limited exemptions, and certain rules and regulations regarding trading activities, including trading in derivatives markets. Many of these new requirements may increase the expenses associated with the Company’s asset management activities and/or reduce the investment returns the Company is able to generate for its asset management clients. Several important elements of the Dodd-Frank Act will not be known until rulemaking is finalized and certain final regulations are adopted.

 

The Company is continuing its review of its asset management activities that may be affected by the Volcker Rule and is taking steps to establish the necessary compliance programs to help ensure and monitor compliance with the Volcker Rule. The Company had already taken certain steps to comply with the Volcker Rule prior to the issuance of the final regulations, including, for example, launching new funds that are designed to comply with the Volcker Rule. Given the complexity of the new framework, the full impact of the Volcker Rule is still uncertain, and will ultimately depend on the interpretation and implementation by the five regulatory agencies responsible for its oversight. See also “—Financial Holding Company—Activities Restrictions under the Volcker Rule.”

 

The Company’s Investment Management business is also regulated outside the U.S. For example, the Financial Conduct Authority and the Prudential Regulation Authority regulate the Company’s business in the U.K.; the Financial Services Agency regulates the Company’s business in Japan; the Hong Kong Securities and Futures Commission regulates the Company’s business in Hong Kong; and the Monetary Authority of Singapore regulates the Company’s business in Singapore.

 

Anti-Money Laundering and Economic Sanctions.

 

The Company’s Anti-Money Laundering (“AML”) program is coordinated on an enterprise-wide basis. In the U.S., for example, the Bank Secrecy Act, as amended by the USA PATRIOT Act of 2001, imposes significant obligations on financial institutions to detect and deter money laundering and terrorist financing activity, including requiring banks, bank holding company subsidiaries, broker-dealers, futures commission merchants, and mutual funds to implement AML programs, verify the identity of customers that maintain accounts, and monitor and report suspicious activity to appropriate law enforcement or regulatory authorities. Outside the U.S., applicable laws, rules and regulations similarly require designated types of financial institutions to implement AML programs. The Company has implemented policies, procedures and internal controls that are designed to comply with all applicable AML laws and regulations. The Company has also implemented policies, procedures, and internal controls that are designed to comply with the regulations and economic sanctions programs administered by the U.S. Treasury’s Office of Foreign Assets Control (“OFAC”), which enforces economic and trade sanctions against targeted foreign countries, entities and individuals based on external threats to the U.S. foreign policy, national security, or economy; by other governments; or by global or regional multilateral organizations, such as the United Nations Security Council and the E.U. as applicable.

 

Anti-Corruption.

 

The Company is subject to applicable anti-corruption laws, such as the U.S. Foreign Corrupt Practices Act and the U.K. Bribery Act, in the jurisdictions in which it operates. Anti-corruption laws generally prohibit offering, promising, giving, or authorizing others to give anything of value, either directly or indirectly, to a government official or private party in order to influence official action or otherwise gain an unfair business advantage, such as to obtain or retain business. The Company has implemented policies, procedures, and internal controls that are designed to comply with such laws, rules and regulations.

 

 	19	 	LOGO
Table of Contents
Protection of Client Information.

 

Many aspects of the Company’s business are subject to legal requirements concerning the use and protection of certain customer information, including those adopted pursuant to the Gramm-Leach-Bliley Act and the Fair and Accurate Credit Transactions Act of 2003 in the U.S., the E.U. Data Protection Directive and various laws in Asia, including the Japanese Personal Information (Protection) Law, the Hong Kong Personal Data (Protection) Ordinance and the Australian Privacy Act. The Company has adopted measures designed to comply with these and related applicable requirements in all relevant jurisdictions.

 

Research.

 

Both U.S. and non-U.S. regulators continue to focus on research conflicts of interest. Research-related regulations have been implemented in many jurisdictions. New and revised requirements resulting from these regulations and the global research settlement with U.S. federal and state regulators (to which the Company is a party) have necessitated the development or enhancement of corresponding policies and procedures.

 

Compensation Practices and Other Regulation.

 

The Company’s compensation practices are subject to oversight by the Federal Reserve. In particular, the Company is subject to the Federal Reserve’s guidance that is designed to help ensure that incentive compensation paid by banking organizations does not encourage imprudent risk-taking that threatens the organizations’ safety and soundness. The scope and content of the Federal Reserve’s policies on executive compensation are continuing to develop and may change based on findings from its peer review process, and the Company expects that these policies will evolve over a number of years.

 

The Company is subject to the compensation-related provisions of the Dodd-Frank Act, which may impact its compensation practices. Pursuant to the Dodd-Frank Act, among other things, federal regulators, including the Federal Reserve, must prescribe regulations to require covered financial institutions, including the Company, to report the structures of all of their incentive-based compensation arrangements and prohibit incentive-based payment arrangements that encourage inappropriate risks by providing employees, directors or principal shareholders with compensation that is excessive or that could lead to material financial loss to the covered financial institution. In April 2011, seven federal agencies, including the Federal Reserve, jointly proposed an interagency rule implementing this requirement. Further, pursuant to the Dodd-Frank Act, the SEC must direct listing exchanges to require companies to implement policies relating to disclosure of incentive-based compensation that is based on publicly reported financial information and the clawback of such compensation from current or former executive officers following certain accounting restatements.

 

In addition to the guidelines issued by the Federal Reserve and referenced above, the Company’s compensation practices may also be impacted by other regulations, including those promulgated in accordance with the FSB compensation principles and standards, CRD IV, Alternative Investment Fund Managers Directive regulations, the fifth Undertakings for Collective Investment in Transferable Securities Directive and proposed second Markets in Financial Instruments Directive. The FSB standards are to be implemented by local regulators, including in the U.K., where the remuneration of employees of certain banks is governed by the Remuneration Code. In the E.U., beginning on January 1, 2014, the Company’s compensation practices with respect to certain employees whose activities have a material impact on the risk profile of the Company’s E.U. operations will be subject to CRD IV, which includes a fixed cap on bonuses and other variable remuneration restrictions.

 

For a discussion of certain risks relating to the Company’s regulatory environment, see “Risk Factors” in Part I, Item 1A herein.

 

LOGO	 	20	 	
Table of Contents
Executive Officers of Morgan Stanley.

 

The executive officers of Morgan Stanley and their ages and titles as of February 25, 2014 are set forth below. Business experience for the past five years is provided in accordance with SEC rules.

 

Gregory J. Fleming (50).    Executive Vice President (since February 2010), President of Investment Management (since February 2010) and President of Wealth Management of Morgan Stanley (since January 2011). President of Research of Morgan Stanley (February 2010 to January 2011). Senior Research Scholar at Yale Law School and Distinguished Visiting Fellow of the Center for the Study of Corporate Law at Yale Law School (January 2009 to December 2009). President of Merrill Lynch & Co., Inc. (“Merrill Lynch”) (February 2008 to January 2009). Co-President of Merrill Lynch (May 2007 to February 2008). Executive Vice President and Co-President of the Global Markets and Investment Banking Group of Merrill Lynch (August 2003 to May 2007).

 

James P. Gorman (55).    Chairman of the Board of Directors and Chief Executive Officer of Morgan Stanley (since January 2012). President and Chief Executive Officer (January 2010 through December 2011) and member of the Board of Directors (since January 2010). Co-President (December 2007 to December 2009) and Co-Head of Strategic Planning (October 2007 to December 2009). President and Chief Operating Officer of Wealth Management (February 2006 to April 2008).

 

Eric F. Grossman (47).    Executive Vice President and Chief Legal Officer of Morgan Stanley (since January 2012). Global Head of Legal (September 2010 to January 2012). Global Head of Litigation (January 2006 to September 2010) and General Counsel of the Americas (May 2009 to September 2010). General Counsel of Wealth Management (November 2008 to June 2009). Partner at the law firm of Davis Polk & Wardwell LLP (June 2001 to December 2005).

 

Keishi Hotsuki (51).    Chief Risk Officer of Morgan Stanley (since May 2011). Interim Chief Risk Officer (January 2011 to May 2011) and Head of Market Risk Department (since March 2008). Director of Mitsubishi UFJ Morgan Stanley Securities Co., Ltd. (since May 2010). Global Head of Market Risk Management at Merrill Lynch (June 2005 to September 2007).

 

Colm Kelleher (56).    Executive Vice President (since October 2007) and President of Institutional Securities (since January 2013). Co-President of Institutional Securities of Morgan Stanley (January 2010 to December 2012). Chief Financial Officer and Co-Head of Strategic Planning (October 2007 to December 2009). Head of Global Capital Markets (February 2006 to October 2007). Co-Head of Fixed Income Europe (May 2004 to February 2006).

 

Ruth Porat (56).    Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer of Morgan Stanley (since January 2010). Vice Chairman of Investment Banking (September 2003 to December 2009). Global Head of Financial Institutions Group (September 2006 to December 2009) and Chairman of the Financial Sponsors Group (July 2004 to September 2006) within Investment Banking.

 

James A. Rosenthal (60).    Executive Vice President and Chief Operating Officer of Morgan Stanley (since January 2011). Head of Corporate Strategy (January 2010 to May 2011). Chief Operating Officer of Wealth Management (January 2010 to August 2011). Head of Firmwide Technology and Operations of Morgan Stanley (March 2008 to January 2010). Chief Financial Officer of Tishman Speyer (May 2006 to March 2008).

 

 	21	 	LOGO
Table of Contents
Item 1A.    Risk Factors.

 

Liquidity and Funding Risk.

 

Liquidity and funding risk refers to the risk that we will be unable to finance our operations due to a loss of access to the capital markets or difficulty in liquidating our assets. Liquidity and funding risk also encompasses our ability to meet our financial obligations without experiencing significant business disruption or reputational damage that may threaten our viability as a going concern. For more information on how we monitor and manage liquidity and funding risk, see “Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations—Liquidity and Capital Resources” in Part II, Item 7 herein.

 

Liquidity is essential to our businesses and we rely on external sources to finance a significant portion of our operations.

 

Liquidity is essential to our businesses. Our liquidity could be negatively affected by our inability to raise funding in the long-term or short-term debt capital markets or our inability to access the secured lending markets. Factors that we cannot control, such as disruption of the financial markets or negative views about the financial services industry generally, including concerns regarding the remaining sovereign debt issues in Europe or fiscal matters in the U.S., could impair our ability to raise funding. In addition, our ability to raise funding could be impaired if investors or lenders develop a negative perception of our long-term or short-term financial prospects due to factors such as if we were to incur large trading losses, are downgraded by the rating agencies, suffer a decline in the level of our business activity, or if regulatory authorities take significant action against us, or we discover significant employee misconduct or illegal activity. If we are unable to raise funding using the methods described above, we would likely need to finance or liquidate unencumbered assets, such as our investment and trading portfolios, to meet maturing liabilities. We may be unable to sell some of our assets, or we may have to sell assets at a discount from market value, either of which could adversely affect our results of operations, cash flows and financial condition.

 

Our borrowing costs and access to the debt capital markets depend significantly on our credit ratings.

 

The cost and availability of unsecured financing generally are impacted by our short-term and long-term credit ratings. The rating agencies are continuing to monitor certain issuer specific factors that are important to the determination of our credit ratings, including governance, the level and quality of earnings, capital adequacy, funding and liquidity, risk appetite and management, asset quality, strategic direction, and business mix. Additionally, the rating agencies will look at other industry-wide factors such as regulatory or legislative changes, macro-economic environment, and perceived levels of government support, and it is possible that they could downgrade our ratings and those of similar institutions. For example, in November 2013, Moody’s Investor Services, Inc. (“Moody’s”) took certain ratings actions with respect to eight large U.S. banking groups, including downgrading us, to remove certain uplift from the U.S. government support in their ratings. See also “Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operation—Liquidity and Capital Resources—Credit Ratings” in Part II, Item 7 herein.

 

Our credit ratings also can have a significant impact on certain trading revenues, particularly in those businesses where longer term counterparty performance is a key consideration, such as OTC derivative transactions, including credit derivatives and interest rate swaps. In connection with certain OTC trading agreements and certain other agreements associated with the Institutional Securities business segment, we may be required to provide additional collateral to, or immediately settle any outstanding liability balance with, certain counterparties in the event of a credit ratings downgrade. Termination of our trading and other agreements could cause us to sustain losses and impair our liquidity by requiring us to find other sources of financing or to make significant cash payments or securities movements. The additional collateral or termination payments which may occur in the event of a future credit rating downgrade vary by contract and can be based on ratings by either or both of Moody’s and Standard & Poor’s Financial Services LLC. At December 31, 2013, the future potential collateral amounts and termination payments that could be called or required by counterparties, exchanges and clearing organizations in the event of one-notch or two-notch downgrade scenarios based on the relevant contractual downgrade triggers were $1,522 million and an incremental $3,321 million, respectively.

 

LOGO	 	22	 	
Table of Contents
We are a holding company and depend on payments from our subsidiaries.

 

The parent holding company depends on dividends, distributions and other payments from its subsidiaries to fund dividend payments and to fund all payments on its obligations, including debt obligations. Regulatory, tax restrictions or elections and other legal restrictions may limit our ability to transfer funds freely, either to or from our subsidiaries. In particular, many of our subsidiaries, including our broker-dealer subsidiaries, are subject to laws, regulations and self-regulatory organization rules that authorize regulatory bodies to block or reduce the flow of funds to the parent holding company, or that prohibit such transfers altogether in certain circumstances, including steps to “ring fence” entities by regulators outside of the U.S. to protect clients and creditors of such entities in the event of financial difficulties involving such entities. These laws, regulations and rules may hinder our ability to access funds that we may need to make payments on our obligations. Furthermore, as a bank holding company, we may become subject to a prohibition or to limitations on our ability to pay dividends or repurchase our stock. The OCC, the Federal Reserve and the FDIC have the authority, and under certain circumstances the duty, to prohibit or to limit the payment of dividends by the banking organizations they supervise, including us and our bank company subsidiaries.

 

Our liquidity and financial condition have in the past been, and in the future could be, adversely affected by U.S. and international markets and economic conditions.

 

Our ability to raise funding in the long-term or short-term debt capital markets or the equity markets, or to access secured lending markets, has in the past been, and could in the future be, adversely affected by conditions in the U.S. and international markets and economy. Global market and economic conditions have been particularly disrupted and volatile in the last several years and continue to be, including as a result of the European sovereign debt crisis, and uncertainty regarding U.S. fiscal matters. In particular, our cost and availability of funding have been, and may in the future be, adversely affected by illiquid credit markets and wider credit spreads. Continued turbulence in the U.S., the E.U. and other international markets and economies could adversely affect our liquidity and financial condition and the willingness of certain counterparties and customers to do business with us.

 

Market Risk.

 

Market risk refers to the risk that a change in the level of one or more market prices, rates, indices, implied volatilities (the price volatility of the underlying instrument imputed from option prices), correlations or other market factors, such as market liquidity, will result in losses for a position or portfolio owned by us. For more information on how we monitor and manage market risk, see “Quantitative and Qualitative Disclosure about Market Risk” in Part II, Item 7A.

 

Our results of operations may be materially affected by market fluctuations and by global and economic conditions and other factors.

 

Our results of operations may be materially affected by market fluctuations due to global and economic conditions and other factors. Our results of operations in the past have been, and in the future may continue to be, materially affected by many factors, including the effect of economic and political conditions and geopolitical events; the effect of market conditions, particularly in the global equity, fixed income, credit and commodities markets, including corporate and mortgage (commercial and residential) lending and commercial real estate markets; the impact of current, pending and future legislation (including the Dodd-Frank Act), regulation (including capital, leverage and liquidity requirements), policies (including fiscal and monetary), and legal and regulatory actions in the U.S. and worldwide; the level and volatility of equity, fixed income and commodity prices, interest rates, currency values and other market indices; the availability and cost of both credit and capital as well as the credit ratings assigned to our unsecured short-term and long-term debt; investor, consumer and business sentiment and confidence in the financial markets; the performance of our acquisitions, divestitures, joint ventures, strategic alliances or other strategic arrangements (including with Mitsubishi UFJ Financial

 

 	23	 	LOGO
Table of Contents
Group, Inc. (“MUFG”)); our reputation; inflation, natural disasters, and acts of war or terrorism; the actions and initiatives of current and potential competitors, as well as governments, regulators and self-regulatory organizations; the effectiveness of our risk management policies; and technological changes and risks, including cybersecurity risks; or a combination of these or other factors. In addition, legislative, legal and regulatory developments related to our businesses are likely to increase costs, thereby affecting results of operations. These factors also may have an adverse impact on our ability to achieve our strategic objectives.

 

The results of our Institutional Securities business segment, particularly results relating to our involvement in primary and secondary markets for all types of financial products, are subject to substantial fluctuations due to a variety of factors, such as those enumerated above that we cannot control or predict with great certainty. These fluctuations impact results by causing variations in new business flows and in the fair value of securities and other financial products. Fluctuations also occur due to the level of global market activity, which, among other things, affects the size, number and timing of investment banking client assignments and transactions and the realization of returns from our principal investments. During periods of unfavorable market or economic conditions, the level of individual investor participation in the global markets, as well as the level of client assets, may also decrease, which would negatively impact the results of our Wealth Management business segment. In addition, fluctuations in global market activity could impact the flow of investment capital into or from assets under management or supervision and the way customers allocate capital among money market, equity, fixed income or other investment alternatives, which could negatively impact our Investment Management business segment.

 

We may experience declines in the value of our financial instruments and other losses related to volatile and illiquid market conditions.

 

Market volatility, illiquid market conditions and disruptions in the credit markets make it extremely difficult to value certain of our securities, particularly during periods of market displacement. Subsequent valuations, in light of factors then prevailing, may result in significant changes in the values of these securities in future periods. In addition, at the time of any sales and settlements of these securities, the price we ultimately realize will depend on the demand and liquidity in the market at that time and may be materially lower than their current fair value. Any of these factors could cause a decline in the value of our securities portfolio, which may have an adverse effect on our results of operations in future periods.

 

In addition, financial markets are susceptible to severe events evidenced by rapid depreciation in asset values accompanied by a reduction in asset liquidity. Under these extreme conditions, hedging and other risk management strategies may not be as effective at mitigating trading losses as they would be under more normal market conditions. Moreover, under these conditions market participants are particularly exposed to trading strategies employed by many market participants simultaneously and on a large scale, such as crowded trades. Our risk management and monitoring processes seek to quantify and mitigate risk to more extreme market moves. However, severe market events have historically been difficult to predict, as seen in the last several years, and we could realize significant losses if extreme market events were to occur.

 

Holding large and concentrated positions may expose us to losses.

 

Concentration of risk may reduce revenues or result in losses in our market-making, investing, block trading, underwriting and lending businesses in the event of unfavorable market movements. We commit substantial amounts of capital to these businesses, which often results in our taking large positions in the securities of, or making large loans to, a particular issuer or issuers in a particular industry, country or region.

 

We have incurred, and may continue to incur, significant losses in the real estate sector.

 

We finance and acquire principal positions in a number of real estate and real estate-related products for our own account, for investment vehicles managed by affiliates in which we also may have a significant investment, for separate accounts managed by affiliates and for major participants in the commercial and residential real estate markets.

 

LOGO	 	24	 	
Table of Contents
We also originate loans secured by commercial and residential properties. Further, we securitize and trade in a wide range of commercial and residential real estate and real estate-related whole loans, mortgages and other real estate and commercial assets and products, including residential and commercial mortgage-backed securities. These businesses have been, and may continue to be, adversely affected by the downturn in the real estate sector. In connection with these activities, we have provided, or otherwise agreed to be responsible for, certain representations and warranties. Under certain circumstances, we may be required to repurchase such assets or make other payments related to such assets if such representations and warranties were breached. Between 2004 and December 31, 2013, we sponsored approximately $148.0 billion of residential mortgage-backed securities (“RMBS”) primarily containing U.S. residential loans. Of that amount, we made representations and warranties concerning approximately $47.0 billion of loans and agreed to be responsible for the representations and warranties made by third-party sellers, many of which are now insolvent, on approximately $21.0 billion of loans. At December 31, 2013, the current unpaid principal balance (“UPB”) for all the residential assets subject to such representations and warranties was approximately $17.2 billion and the cumulative losses associated with U.S. RMBS were approximately $13.5 billion. We did not make, or otherwise agree to be responsible, for the representations and warranties made by third party sellers on approximately $79.9 billion of residential loans that we securitized during that time period. We have not sponsored any U.S. RMBS transactions since 2007.

 

We have also made representations and warranties in connection with our role as an originator of certain commercial mortgage loans that we securitized in commercial mortgage-backed securities (“CMBS”). Between 2004 and December 31, 2013, we originated approximately $50.6 billion and $13.0 billion of U.S. and non-U.S. commercial mortgage loans, respectively, that were placed into CMBS sponsored by us. At December 31, 2013, the current UPB for all U.S. commercial mortgage loans subject to such representations and warranties was $33.0 billion. At December 31, 2013, the current UPB when known for all non-U.S. commercial mortgage loans, subject to such representations and warranties was approximately $3.0 billion and the UPB at the time of sale when the current UPB is not known was $0.4 billion.

 

Over the last several years, the level of litigation and investigatory activity (both formal and informal) by government and self-regulatory agencies has increased materially in the financial services industry. As a result, we have been and expect that we may continue to become, the subject of increased claims for damages and other relief in the future. We continue to monitor our real estate-related activities in order to manage our exposures and potential liability from these markets and businesses. See “Legal Proceedings—Residential Mortgage and Credit Crisis Related Matters” in Part I, Item 3 herein.

 

Credit Risk.

 

Credit risk refers to the risk of loss arising when a borrower, counterparty or issuer does not meet its financial obligations to us. For more information on how we monitor and manage credit risk, see “Quantitative and Qualitative Disclosure about Market Risk—Risk Management—Credit Risk” in Part II, Item 7A herein.

 

We are exposed to the risk that third parties that are indebted to us will not perform their obligations.

 

We incur significant credit risk exposure through the Institutional Securities business segment. This risk may arise from a variety of business activities, including but not limited to entering into swap or other derivative contracts under which counterparties have obligations to make payments to us; extending credit to clients through various lending commitments; providing short or long-term funding that is secured by physical or financial collateral whose value may at times be insufficient to fully cover the loan repayment amount; posting margin and/or collateral and other commitments to clearing houses, clearing agencies, exchanges, banks, securities firms and other financial counterparties; and investing and trading in securities and loan pools whereby the value of these assets may fluctuate based on realized or expected defaults on the underlying obligations or loans.

 

 	25	 	LOGO
Table of Contents
We also incur credit risk in the Wealth Management business segment lending to individual investors, including, but not limited to, margin and securities-based loans collateralized by securities, residential mortgage loans and home equity lines of credit.

 

While we believe current valuations and reserves adequately address our perceived levels of risk, there is a possibility that adverse difficult economic conditions may negatively impact our clients and our current credit exposures. In addition, as a clearing member firm, we finance our customer positions and we could be held responsible for the defaults or misconduct of our customers. Although we regularly review our credit exposures, default risk may arise from events or circumstances that are difficult to detect or foresee.

 

A default by a large financial institution could adversely affect financial markets generally.

 

The commercial soundness of many financial institutions may be closely interrelated as a result of credit, trading, clearing or other relationships between the institutions. For example, increased centralization of trading activities through particular clearing houses, central agents or exchanges as required by provisions of the Dodd-Frank Act may increase our concentration of risk with respect to these entities. As a result, concerns about, or a default or threatened default by, one institution could lead to significant market-wide liquidity and credit problems, losses or defaults by other institutions. This is sometimes referred to as “systemic risk” and may adversely affect financial intermediaries, such as clearing agencies, clearing houses, banks, securities firms and exchanges, with which we interact on a daily basis, and therefore could adversely affect us. See also “Systemic Risk Regime” under “Business—Supervision and Regulation—Financial Holding Company” in Part I, Item 1 herein.

 

Operational Risk.

 

Operational risk refers to the risk of loss, or of damage to our reputation, resulting from inadequate or failed processes, people and systems or from external events (e.g., fraud, legal and compliance risks or damage to physical assets). We may incur operational risk across the full scope of our business activities, including revenue-generating activities (e.g., sales and trading) and control groups (e.g., information technology and trade processing). Legal, regulatory and compliance risk is included in the scope of operational risk and is discussed below under “Legal, Regulatory and Compliance Risk.” For more information on how we monitor and manage operational risk, see “Quantitative and Qualitative Disclosures about Market Risk—Risk Management—Operational Risk” in Part II, Item 7A herein.

 

We are subject to operational risk that could adversely affect our businesses.

 

Our businesses are highly dependent on our ability to process, on a daily basis, a large number of transactions across numerous and diverse markets in many currencies. In addition, we may introduce new products or services or change processes, resulting in new operational risk that we may not fully appreciate or identify. In general, the transactions we process are increasingly complex. We perform the functions required to operate our different businesses either by ourselves or through agreements with third parties. We rely on the ability of our employees, our internal systems and systems at technology centers operated by unaffiliated third parties to process a high volume of transactions.

 

We also face the risk of operational failure or termination of any of the clearing agents, exchanges, clearing houses or other financial intermediaries we use to facilitate our securities transactions. In the event of a breakdown or improper operation of our or a third party’s systems or improper or unauthorized action by third parties or our employees, we could suffer financial loss, an impairment to our liquidity, a disruption of our businesses, regulatory sanctions or damage to our reputation. In addition, the interconnectivity of multiple financial institutions with central agents, exchanges and clearing houses, and the increased importance of these entities, increases the risk that an operational failure at one institution or entity may cause an industry-wide operational failure that could materially impact our ability to conduct business.

 

Our operations rely on the secure processing, storage and transmission of confidential and other information in our computer systems and the systems of third parties with which we do business or that facilitate our business

 

LOGO	 	26	 	
Table of Contents
activities, such as vendors. Like other financial services firms, we and our third party providers have been and continue to be subject to unauthorized access, mishandling or misuse, computer viruses or malware, cyber attacks, denial of service attacks and other events. The increased use of smartphones, tablets and other mobile devices may also heighten these and other operational risks. Events such as these could have a security impact on our systems and jeopardize our or our clients’ or counterparties’ personal, confidential, proprietary or other information processed and stored in, and transmitted through, our and our third party providers’ computer systems. Furthermore, such events could cause interruptions or malfunctions in our, our clients’, our counterparties’ or third parties’ operations, which could result in reputational damage, client dissatisfaction, litigation or regulatory fines or penalties not covered by insurance maintained by us, and adversely affect our business, financial condition or results of operations.

 

Despite the business contingency plans we have in place, there can be no assurance that such plans will fully mitigate all potential business continuity risks to us. Our ability to conduct business may be adversely affected by a disruption in the infrastructure that supports our business and the communities where we are located, which are concentrated in the New York metropolitan area, London, Hong Kong and Tokyo. This may include a disruption involving physical site access, terrorist activities, disease pandemics, catastrophic events, natural disasters, extreme weather events, electrical, environmental, computer servers, communications or other services we use, our employees or third parties with whom we conduct business.

 

Legal, Regulatory and Compliance Risk.

 

Legal, regulatory and compliance risk includes the risk of legal or regulatory sanctions, material financial loss including fines, penalties, judgments, damages and/or settlements, or loss to reputation we may suffer as a result of our failure to comply with laws, regulations, rules, related self-regulatory organization standards and codes of conduct applicable to our business activities. Legal, regulatory and compliance risk also includes contractual and commercial risk such as the risk that a counterparty’s performance obligations will be unenforceable. In today’s environment of rapid and possibly transformational regulatory change, we also view regulatory change as a component of legal, regulatory and compliance risk. For more information on how we monitor and manage legal, regulatory and compliance risk, see “Quantitative and Qualitative Disclosures about Market Risk—Risk Management—Legal, Regulatory and Compliance Risk” in Part II, Item 7A herein.

 

The financial services industry is subject to extensive regulation, which is undergoing major changes that will impact our business.

 

Like other major financial services firms, we are subject to extensive regulation by U.S. federal and state regulatory agencies and securities exchanges and by regulators and exchanges in each of the major markets where we conduct our business. These laws and regulations significantly affect the way we do business, and can restrict the scope of our existing businesses and limit our ability to expand our product offerings and pursue certain investments.

 

In response to the financial crisis, legislators and regulators, both in the U.S. and worldwide, have adopted, or are currently considering enacting, financial market reforms that have resulted and could result in major changes to the way our global operations are regulated. In particular, as a result of the Dodd-Frank Act, we are, or will become, subject to (among other things) significantly revised and expanded regulation and supervision, to more intensive scrutiny of our businesses and any plans for expansion of those businesses, to new activities limitations, to a systemic risk regime that imposes heightened capital and liquidity requirements to new restrictions on activities and investments imposed by the Volcker Rule, and to comprehensive new derivatives regulation. While certain portions of the Dodd-Frank Act became effective immediately, most other portions are effective following transition periods or through numerous rulemakings by multiple governmental agencies, and although a large number of rules have been proposed, many are still subject to final rulemaking or transition periods. U.S. regulators also plan to propose additional regulations to implement the Dodd-Frank Act. Many of the changes required by the Dodd-Frank Act could materially impact the profitability of our businesses and the value of

 

 	27	 	LOGO
Table of Contents
assets we hold, expose us to additional costs, require changes to business practices or force us to discontinue businesses, adversely affect our ability to pay dividends and repurchase our stock, or require us to raise capital, including in ways that may adversely impact our shareholders or creditors. In addition, similar regulatory requirements are being proposed by foreign policymakers and regulators, which may be inconsistent or conflict with regulations that we are subject to in the U.S. and, if adopted may adversely affect us. While there continues to be uncertainty about the full impact of these changes, we do know that the Company will be subject to a more complex regulatory framework, and will incur costs to comply with new requirements as well as to monitor for compliance in the future.

 

For example, the Volcker Rule provision of the Dodd-Frank Act will have an impact on us, including potentially limiting various aspects of our business. We are continuing our review of activities that may be affected by the Volcker Rule, including our trading operations and asset management activities, and are taking steps to establish the necessary compliance programs to comply with the Volcker Rule. Given the complexity of the new framework, the full impact of the Volcker Rule is still uncertain, and will ultimately depend on the interpretation and implementation by the five regulatory agencies responsible for its oversight.

 

The financial services industry faces substantial litigation and is subject to extensive regulatory investigations, and we may face damage to our reputation and legal liability.

 

As a global financial services firm, we face the risk of investigations and proceedings by governmental and self-regulatory organizations in all countries in which we conduct our business. Interventions by authorities may result in adverse judgments, settlements, fines, penalties, injunctions or other relief. In addition to the monetary consequences, these measures could, for example, impact our ability to engage in, or impose limitations on, certain of our businesses. The number of these investigations and proceedings, as well as the amount of penalties and fines sought, has increased substantially in recent years with regard to many firms in the financial services industry, including us. Significant regulatory action against us could materially adversely affect our business, financial condition or results of operations or cause us significant reputational harm, which could seriously harm our business. The Dodd-Frank Act also provides compensation to whistleblowers who present the SEC or CFTC with information related to securities or commodities laws violations that leads to a successful enforcement action. As a result of this compensation, it is possible we could face an increased number of investigations by the SEC or CFTC.

 

We have been named, from time to time, as a defendant in various legal actions, including arbitrations, class actions, and other litigation, as well as investigations or proceedings brought by regulatory agencies, arising in connection with our activities as a global diversified financial services institution. Certain of the actual or threatened legal or regulatory actions include claims for substantial compensatory and/or punitive damages, claims for indeterminate amounts of damages, or may result in penalties, fines, or other results adverse to us. In some cases, the issuers that would otherwise be the primary defendants in such cases are bankrupt or in financial distress. Like any large corporation, we are also subject to risk from potential employee misconduct, including non-compliance with policies and improper use or disclosure of confidential information.

 

Substantial legal liability could materially adversely affect our business, financial condition or results of operations or cause us significant reputational harm, which could seriously harm our business. For example, over the last several years, the level of litigation and investigatory activity (both formal and informal) by government and self-regulatory agencies has increased materially in the financial services industry. As a result, we have been, and expect that we may continue to become, the subject of increased claims for damages and other relief in the future and there can be no assurance that additional material losses will not be incurred from claims that have not yet been asserted or are not yet determined to be material. For more information regarding legal proceedings in which we are involved see “Legal Proceedings” in Part I, Item 3 herein.

 

LOGO	 	28	 	
Table of Contents
Our business, financial condition and results of operations could be adversely affected by governmental fiscal and monetary policies.

 

We are affected by fiscal and monetary policies adopted by regulatory authorities and bodies of the U.S. and other governments. For example, the actions of the Federal Reserve and international central banking authorities directly impact our cost of funds for lending, capital raising and investment activities and may impact the value of financial instruments we hold. In addition, such changes in monetary policy may affect the credit quality of our customers. Changes in domestic and international monetary policy are beyond our control and difficult to predict.

 

Our commodities activities subject us to extensive regulation, potential catastrophic events and environmental risks and regulation that may expose us to significant costs and liabilities.

 

In connection with the commodities activities in our Institutional Securities business segment, we engage in the production, storage, transportation, marketing and trading of several commodities, including metals (base and precious), crude oil, oil products, natural gas, electric power, emission credits, coal, freight, liquefied natural gas and related products and indices. In addition, we are an electricity power marketer in the U.S. and own electricity generating facilities in the U.S.; we own TransMontaigne Inc. and its subsidiaries, a group of companies operating in the refined petroleum products marketing and distribution business; and we own a minority interest in Heidmar Holdings LLC, which owns a group of companies that provide international marine transportation and U.S. marine logistics services. As a result of these activities, we are subject to extensive and evolving energy, commodities, environmental, health and safety and other governmental laws and regulations. In addition, liability may be incurred without regard to fault under certain environmental laws and regulations for the remediation of contaminated areas. Further, through these activities we are exposed to regulatory, physical and certain indirect risks associated with climate change. Our commodities business also exposes us to the risk of unforeseen and catastrophic events, including natural disasters, leaks, spills, explosions, release of toxic substances, fires, accidents on land and at sea, wars, and terrorist attacks that could result in personal injuries, loss of life, property damage, and suspension of operations. For more information about the planned sale of our global oil merchanting business, see “Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations—Business Segments—Institutional Securities—Sale of Global Oil Merchanting Business” in Part II, Item 7 herein.

 

Although we have attempted to mitigate our pollution and other environmental risks by, among other measures, adopting appropriate policies and procedures for power plant operations, monitoring the quality of petroleum storage facilities and transport vessels and implementing emergency response programs, these actions may not prove adequate to address every contingency. In addition, insurance covering some of these risks may not be available, and the proceeds, if any, from insurance recovery may not be adequate to cover liabilities with respect to particular incidents. As a result, our financial condition, results of operations and cash flows may be adversely affected by these events.

 

We continue to engage in discussions with the Federal Reserve regarding our commodities activities, as the BHC Act provides a grandfather exemption for “activities related to the trading, sale or investment in commodities and underlying physical properties,” provided that we were engaged in “any of such activities as of September 30, 1997 in the United States” and provided that certain other conditions that are within our reasonable control are satisfied. If the Federal Reserve were to determine that any of our commodities activities did not qualify for the BHC Act grandfather exemption, then we would likely be required to divest any such activities that did not otherwise conform to the BHC Act. See also “Scope of Permitted Activities” under “Business—Supervision and Regulation” in Part I, Item 1 herein.

 

We also expect the other laws and regulations affecting our commodities business to increase in both scope and complexity. During the past several years, intensified scrutiny of certain energy markets by federal, state and local authorities in the U.S. and abroad and the public has resulted in increased regulatory and legal enforcement, litigation and remedial proceedings involving companies engaged in the activities in which we are engaged. For

 

 	29	 	LOGO
Table of Contents
example, the U.S. and the E.U. have increased their focus on the energy markets which has resulted in increased regulation of companies participating in the energy markets, including those engaged in power generation and liquid hydrocarbons trading. In addition, new regulation of OTC derivatives markets in the U.S. and similar legislation proposed or adopted abroad will impose significant new costs and impose new requirements on our commodities derivatives activities. We may incur substantial costs or loss of revenue in complying with current or future laws and regulations and our overall businesses and reputation may be adversely affected by the current legal environment. In addition, failure to comply with these laws and regulations may result in substantial civil and criminal fines and penalties.

 

A failure to address conflicts of interest appropriately could adversely affect our businesses and reputation.

 

As a global financial services firm that provides products and services to a large and diversified group of clients, including corporations, governments, financial institutions and individuals, we face potential conflicts of interest in the normal course of business. For example, potential conflicts can occur when there is a divergence of interests between us and a client, among clients, or between an employee on the one hand and us or a client on the other. We have policies, procedures and controls that are designed to address potential conflicts of interest. However, identifying and mitigating potential conflicts of interest can be complex and challenging, and can become the focus of media and regulatory scrutiny. Indeed, actions that merely appear to create a conflict can put our reputation at risk even if the likelihood of an actual conflict has been mitigated. It is possible that potential conflicts could give rise to litigation or enforcement actions, which may lead to our clients being less willing to enter into transactions in which a conflict may occur and could adversely affect our businesses and reputation.

 

Our regulators have the ability to scrutinize our activities for potential conflicts of interest, including through detailed examinations of specific transactions. In addition, our status as a bank holding company supervised by the Federal Reserve subjects us to direct Federal Reserve scrutiny with respect to transactions between our U.S. bank subsidiaries and their affiliates.

 

Risk Management.

 

Our risk management strategies may not be fully effective in mitigating our risk exposures in all market environments or against all types of risk.

 

We have devoted significant resources to develop our risk management policies and procedures and expect to continue to do so in the future. Nonetheless, our risk management strategies, including our hedging strategies, may not be fully effective in mitigating our risk exposure in all market environments or against all types of risk, including risks that are unidentified or unanticipated. As our businesses change and grow, and the markets in which we operate evolve, our risk management strategies may not always adapt with those changes. Some of our methods of managing risk are based upon our use of observed historical market behavior and management’s judgment. As a result, these methods may not predict future risk exposures, which could be significantly greater than the historical measures indicate. For example, market conditions during the financial crisis involved unprecedented dislocations and highlight the limitations inherent in using historical information to manage risk. Management of market, credit, liquidity, operational, legal, regulatory and compliance risks requires, among other things, policies and procedures to record properly and verify a large number of transactions and events, and these policies and procedures may not be fully effective. Our trading risk management strategies and techniques also seek to balance our ability to profit from trading positions with our exposure to potential losses. While we employ a broad and diversified set of risk monitoring and risk mitigation techniques, those techniques and the judgments that accompany their application cannot anticipate every economic and financial outcome or the timing of such outcomes. For example, to the extent that our trading or investing activities involve less liquid trading markets or are otherwise subject to restrictions on sale or hedging, we may not be able to reduce our positions and therefore reduce our risk associated with such positions. We may, therefore, incur losses in the course of our trading or investing activities. For more information on how we monitor and manage market and certain other risks, see “Quantitative and Qualitative Disclosures about Market Risk—Risk Management—Market Risk” in Part II, Item 7A herein.

 

LOGO	 	30	 	
Table of Contents
Competitive Environment.

 

We face strong competition from other financial services firms, which could lead to pricing pressures that could materially adversely affect our revenue and profitability.

 

The financial services industry and all aspects of our businesses are intensely competitive, and we expect them to remain so. We compete with commercial banks, brokerage firms, insurance companies, electronic trading and clearing platforms, financial data repositories, sponsors of mutual funds, hedge funds, energy companies and other companies offering financial or ancillary services in the U.S., globally and through the internet. We compete on the basis of several factors, including transaction execution, capital or access to capital, products and services, innovation, reputation, risk appetite and price. Over time, certain sectors of the financial services industry have become more concentrated, as institutions involved in a broad range of financial services have left businesses, been acquired by or merged into other firms or have declared bankruptcy. Such changes could result in our remaining competitors gaining greater capital and other resources, such as the ability to offer a broader range of products and services and geographic diversity, or new competitors may emerge. We have experienced and may continue to experience pricing pressures as a result of these factors and as some of our competitors seek to obtain market share by reducing prices. In addition, certain of our competitors may be subject to different, and in some cases, less stringent, legal and regulatory regimes, than we are, thereby putting us at a competitive disadvantage. For more information regarding the competitive environment in which we operate, see “Business—Competition” and “Business—Supervision and Regulation” in Part I, Item 1 herein.

 

Automated trading markets may adversely affect our business and may increase competition.

 

We have experienced intense price competition in some of our businesses in recent years. In particular, the ability to execute securities trades electronically on exchanges and through other automated trading markets has increased the pressure on trading commissions or comparable fees. The trend toward direct access to automated, electronic markets will likely continue and will likely increase as additional markets move to more automated trading platforms. We have experienced and it is likely that we will continue to experience competitive pressures in these and other areas in the future as some of our competitors may seek to obtain market share by reducing prices (in the form of commissions or pricing).

 

Our ability to retain and attract qualified employees is critical to the success of our business and the failure to do so may materially adversely affect our performance.

 

Our people are our most important resource and competition for qualified employees is intense. In order to attract and retain qualified employees, we must compensate such employees at market levels. Typically, those levels have caused employee compensation to be our greatest expense as compensation is highly variable and changes based on business and individual performance and market conditions. If we are unable to continue to attract and retain highly qualified employees, or do so at rates or in forms necessary to maintain our competitive position, or if compensation costs required to attract and retain employees become more expensive, our performance, including our competitive position, could be materially adversely affected. The financial industry has and may continue to experience more stringent regulation of employee compensation, including limitations relating to incentive-based compensation, clawback requirements and special taxation, which could have an adverse effect on our ability to hire or retain the most qualified employees.

 

International Risk.

 

We are subject to numerous political, economic, legal, operational, franchise and other risks as a result of our international operations which could adversely impact our businesses in many ways.

 

We are subject to political, economic, legal, tax, operational, franchise and other risks that are inherent in operating in many countries, including risks of possible nationalization, expropriation, price controls, capital controls, exchange controls, increased taxes and levies and other restrictive governmental actions, as well as the outbreak of hostilities or political and governmental instability. In many countries, the laws and regulations applicable to the securities and financial services industries are uncertain and evolving, and it may be difficult for

 

 	31	 	LOGO
Table of Contents
us to determine the exact requirements of local laws in every market. Our inability to remain in compliance with local laws in a particular market could have a significant and negative effect not only on our business in that market but also on our reputation generally. We are also subject to the enhanced risk that transactions we structure might not be legally enforceable in all cases.

 

Various emerging market countries have experienced severe political, economic and financial disruptions, including significant devaluations of their currencies, defaults or potential defaults on sovereign debt, capital and currency exchange controls, high rates of inflation and low or negative growth rates in their economies. Crime and corruption, as well as issues of security and personal safety, also exist in certain of these countries. These conditions could adversely impact our businesses and increase volatility in financial markets generally.

 

The emergence of a disease pandemic or other widespread health emergency, or concerns over the possibility of such an emergency as well as natural disasters, terrorist activities or military actions, could create economic and financial disruptions in emerging markets and other areas throughout the world, and could lead to operational difficulties (including travel limitations) that could impair our ability to manage our businesses around the world.

 

As a U.S. company, we are required to comply with the economic sanctions and embargo programs administered by OFAC and similar multi-national bodies and governmental agencies worldwide, as well as applicable anti-corruption laws in the jurisdictions in which we operate. A violation of a sanction, embargo program, or anti-corruption law, could subject us, and individual employees, to a regulatory enforcement action as well as significant civil and criminal penalties.

 

Acquisition and Joint Venture Risk.

 

We may be unable to fully capture the expected value from acquisitions, divestitures, joint ventures, minority stakes and strategic alliances.

 

In connection with past or future acquisitions, divestitures, joint ventures or strategic alliances (including with MUFG), we face numerous risks and uncertainties combining, transferring, separating or integrating the relevant businesses and systems, including the need to combine or separate accounting and data processing systems and management controls and to integrate relationships with clients, trading counterparties and business partners. In the case of joint ventures and minority stakes, we are subject to additional risks and uncertainties because we may be dependent upon, and subject to liability, losses or reputational damage relating to, systems, controls and personnel that are not under our control.

 

For example, the ownership arrangements relating to the Company’s joint venture in Japan with MUFG of their respective investment banking and securities businesses are complex. MUFG and the Company have integrated their respective Japanese securities businesses by forming two joint venture companies, MUMSS and MSMS. See “Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations—Other Matters—Japanese Securities Joint Venture” in Part II, Item 7 herein.

 

In addition, conflicts or disagreements between us and any of our joint venture partners may negatively impact the benefits to be achieved by the relevant joint venture.

 

There is no assurance that any of our acquisitions will be successfully integrated or yield all of the positive benefits anticipated. If we are not able to integrate successfully our past and future acquisitions, there is a risk that our results of operations, financial condition and cash flows may be materially and adversely affected.

 

Certain of our business initiatives, including expansions of existing businesses, may bring us into contact, directly or indirectly, with individuals and entities that are not within our traditional client and counterparty base and may expose us to new asset classes and new markets. These business activities expose us to new and enhanced risks, greater regulatory scrutiny of these activities, increased credit-related, sovereign and operational risks, and reputational concerns regarding the manner in which these assets are being operated or held.

 

For more information regarding the regulatory environment in which we operate, see also “Business—Supervision and Regulation” in Part I, Item 1 herein.

 

LOGO	 	32	 	
Table of Contents
Item 1B.    Unresolved Staff Comments.

 

The Company, like other well-known seasoned issuers, from time to time receives written comments from the staff of the SEC regarding its periodic or current reports under the Exchange Act. There are no comments that remain unresolved that the Company received not less than 180 days before the end of the year to which this report relates that the Company believes are material.

 

 	33	 	LOGO
Table of Contents
Item 2.	Properties.
 

The Company has offices, operations and data centers located around the world. The Company’s properties that are not owned are leased on terms and for durations that are reflective of commercial standards in the communities where these properties are located. The Company believes the facilities it owns or occupies are adequate for the purposes for which they are currently used and are well maintained. The Company’s principal offices consist of the following properties:

 

Location	  	
Owned/

Leased

 	Lease Expiration	 	 	Approximate Square Footage
as of December 31, 2013(A)	 
 
U.S. Locations

  

 	 	 	 
1585 Broadway

New York, New York

(Global Headquarters and Institutional Securities Headquarters)

  	Owned	 	 	N/A	  	 	 	1,346,500 square feet	  
 	 		 
2000 Westchester Avenue

Purchase, New York

(Wealth Management Headquarters)

  	Owned	 	 	N/A	  	 	 	597,400 square feet	  
 	 		 
522 Fifth Avenue

New York, New York

(Investment Management Headquarters)

  	Owned	 	 	N/A	  	 	 	581,250 square feet	  
 	 		 
New York, New York

(Several locations)

  	Leased	 	 	2014 – 2029	  	 	 
2,394,600 square feet
  
 	 		 
Brooklyn, New York

(Several locations)

  	Leased	 	 	2014 – 2023	  	 	 	344,100 square feet	  
 	 		 
Jersey City, New Jersey

(Several locations)

  	Leased	 	 	2014	  	 	 	369,200 square feet	  
 			 
International Locations

  	 	 	 	 	 	 	 	 	 
 	 		 
20 Bank Street

London

(London Headquarters)

  	Leased	 	 	2038	  	 	 	546,500 square feet	  
 	 		 
Canary Wharf

London

  	Leased(B)	 	 	2020	  	 	 	454,600 square feet	  
 	 		 
1 Austin Road West

Kowloon

(Hong Kong Headquarters)

  	Leased	 	 	2019	  	 	 	572,600 square feet	  
 	 		 
Sapporo’s Yebisu Garden Place

Ebisu, Shibuya-ku

  	Leased	 	 	2013	(C) 	 	 	300,700 square feet	  
 	 		 
Otemachi Financial City South Tower

Otemachi, Chiyoda-ku

(Tokyo Headquarters)

  	Leased	 	 	2028	(C) 	 	 	246,700 square feet	  
 

 

(A)	The indicated total aggregate square footage leased does not include space occupied by Morgan Stanley branch offices.
(B)	The Company holds the freehold interest in the land and building.
(C)	The Company began relocating its Tokyo headquarters from Yebisu Garden Place to Otemachi Financial City South Tower beginning in December 2013. The relocation will be complete by March 31, 2014.
 

34

LOGO

Table of Contents
Item 3.	Legal Proceedings.
 

In addition to the matters described below, in the normal course of business, the Company has been named, from time to time, as a defendant in various legal actions, including arbitrations, class actions and other litigation, arising in connection with its activities as a global diversified financial services institution. Certain of the actual or threatened legal actions include claims for substantial compensatory and/or punitive damages or claims for indeterminate amounts of damages. In some cases, the entities that would otherwise be the primary defendants in such cases are bankrupt or in financial distress.

 

The Company is also involved, from time to time, in other reviews, investigations and proceedings (both formal and informal) by governmental and self-regulatory agencies regarding the Company’s business, and involving, among other matters, sales and trading activities, financial products or offerings sponsored, underwritten or sold by the Company, and accounting and operational matters, certain of which may result in adverse judgments, settlements, fines, penalties, injunctions or other relief.

 

The Company contests liability and/or the amount of damages as appropriate in each pending matter. Where available information indicates that it is probable a liability had been incurred at the date of the consolidated financial statements and the Company can reasonably estimate the amount of that loss, the Company accrues the estimated loss by a charge to income. The Company expects future litigation accruals in general to continue to be elevated and the changes in accruals from period to period may fluctuate significantly, given the current environment regarding government investigations and private litigation affecting global financial services firms, including the Company.

 

In many proceedings and investigations, however, it is inherently difficult to determine whether any loss is probable or even possible or to estimate the amount of any loss. The Company cannot predict with certainty if, how or when such proceedings or investigations will be resolved or what the eventual settlement, fine, penalty or other relief, if any, may be, particularly for proceedings and investigations where the factual record is being developed or contested or where plaintiffs or government entities seek substantial or indeterminate damages, restitution, disgorgement or penalties. Numerous issues may need to be resolved, including through potentially lengthy discovery and determination of important factual matters, determination of issues related to class certification and the calculation of damages or other relief, and by addressing novel or unsettled legal questions relevant to the proceedings or investigations in question, before a loss or additional loss or range of loss or additional loss can be reasonably estimated for a proceeding or investigation. Subject to the foregoing, the Company believes, based on current knowledge and after consultation with counsel, that the outcome of such proceedings and investigations will not have a material adverse effect on the consolidated financial condition of the Company, although the outcome of such proceedings or investigations could be material to the Company’s operating results and cash flows for a particular period depending on, among other things, the level of the Company’s revenues or income for such period.

 

Over the last several years, the level of litigation and investigatory activity (both formal and informal) by government and self-regulatory agencies has increased materially in the financial services industry. As a result, the Company expects that it may become the subject of increased claims for damages and other relief and, while the Company has identified below certain proceedings that the Company believes to be material, individually or collectively, there can be no assurance that additional material losses will not be incurred from claims that have not yet been asserted or are not yet determined to be material.

 

Residential Mortgage and Credit Crisis Related Matters.

 

Regulatory and Governmental Matters.    The Company is responding to subpoenas and requests for information from certain federal and state regulatory and governmental entities, including among others various members of the RMBS Working Group of the Financial Fraud Enforcement Task Force, concerning the origination, financing, purchase, securitization and servicing of subprime and non-subprime residential mortgages and related matters such as residential mortgage backed securities (“RMBS”), collateralized debt obligations (“CDOs”), structured investment vehicles (“SIVs”) and credit default swaps backed by or referencing mortgage pass-

 

35

LOGO

Table of Contents
through certificates. These matters include, but are not limited to, investigations related to the Company’s due diligence on the loans that it purchased for securitization, the Company’s communications with ratings agencies, the Company’s disclosures to investors, and the Company’s handling of servicing and foreclosure related issues.

 

On January 30, 2014, the Company reached an agreement in principle with the Staff of the Enforcement Division of the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission (the “SEC”) to resolve an investigation related to certain subprime RMBS transactions sponsored and underwritten by the Company in 2007. Pursuant to the agreement in principle, the Company would be charged with violating Sections 17(a)(2) and 17(a)(3) of the Securities Act, and the Company would pay disgorgement and penalties in an amount of $275 million and would neither admit nor deny the SEC’s findings. The SEC has not yet presented the proposed settlement to the Commission and no assurance can be given that it will be accepted.

 

Class Actions.    Beginning in December 2007, several purported class action complaints were filed in the United States District Court for the Southern District of New York (the “SDNY”) asserting claims on behalf of participants in the Company’s 401(k) plan and employee stock ownership plan against the Company and other parties, including certain present and former directors and officers, under the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974 (“ERISA”). In February 2008, these actions were consolidated in a single proceeding, styled In re Morgan Stanley ERISA Litigation. The consolidated complaint relates in large part to the Company’s subprime and other mortgage related losses, but also includes allegations regarding the Company’s disclosures, internal controls, accounting and other matters. On March 16, 2011, a purported class action, styled Coulter v. Morgan Stanley & Co. Incorporated et al., was filed in the SDNY asserting claims on behalf of participants in the Company’s 401(k) plan and employee stock ownership plan against the Company and certain current and former officers and directors for breach of fiduciary duties under ERISA. The complaint alleges, among other things, that defendants knew or should have known that from January 2, 2008 to December 31, 2008, the plans’ investment in Company stock was imprudent given the extraordinary risks faced by the Company and its common stock during that period. On March 28, 2013, the court granted defendants’ motions to dismiss both actions. Plaintiffs filed notices of appeal on June 27, 2013 in the United States Court of Appeals for the Second Circuit (the “Second Circuit”) in both matters, which have been consolidated on appeal.

 

On February 12, 2008, a purported class action, styled Joel Stratte-McClure, et al. v. Morgan Stanley, et al., was filed in the SDNY against the Company and certain present and former executives asserting claims on behalf of a purported class of persons and entities who purchased shares of the Company’s common stock during the period June 20, 2007 to December 19, 2007 and who suffered damages as a result of such purchases. The allegations in the amended complaint related in large part to the Company’s subprime and other mortgage related losses, and also included allegations regarding the Company’s disclosures, internal controls, accounting and other matters. On August 8, 2011, defendants filed a motion to dismiss the second amended complaint, which was granted on January 18, 2013. On May 29, 2013, the plaintiffs filed an appeal in the Second Circuit, which appeal is pending.

 

On May 7, 2009, the Company was named as a defendant in a purported class action lawsuit brought under Sections 11, 12 and 15 of the Securities Act of 1933, as amended (the “Securities Act”), which is now styled In re Morgan Stanley Mortgage Pass-Through Certificates Litigation and is pending in the SDNY. The third amended complaint, filed on September 30, 2011, alleges, among other things, that the registration statements and offering documents related to the offerings of certain mortgage pass-through certificates in 2006 contained false and misleading information concerning the pools of residential loans that backed these securitizations. The plaintiffs seek, among other relief, class certification, unspecified compensatory and rescissionary damages, costs, interest and fees. On January 31, 2013, plaintiffs filed a fourth amended complaint, in which they purport to represent investors who purchased approximately $7.82 billion in mortgage pass-through certificates issued in 2006 by 13 trusts. On August 30, 2013, plaintiffs filed a motion for class certification.

 

On May 14, 2009, the Company was named as one of several underwriter defendants in a purported class action lawsuit brought under Sections 11, 12 and 15 of the Securities Act which is now styled In re IndyMac Mortgage-Backed Securities Litigation and is pending in the SDNY. The claims against the Company relate to offerings of mortgage pass-through certificates issued by several trusts sponsored by affiliates of IndyMac Bancorp during

 

36

LOGO

Table of Contents
2006 and 2007. Plaintiff alleges, among other things, that the registration statements and offering documents related to the offerings of certain mortgage pass-through certificates contained false and misleading information concerning the pools of residential loans that backed these securitizations. The plaintiffs seek, among other relief, class certification, unspecified compensatory and rescissionary damages, costs, interest and fees. The amount of the certificates underwritten by the Company at issue in the litigation was approximately $1.68 billion. On August 17, 2012, the court granted class certification with respect to one offering underwritten by the Company. On August 30, 2013, plaintiffs filed a motion to expand the certified class to include additional offerings. IndyMac Bank, which was the sponsor of these securitizations, filed for bankruptcy on July 31, 2008, and the Company’s ability to be indemnified by IndyMac Bank is limited.

 

On October 25, 2010, the Company, certain affiliates and Pinnacle Performance Limited, a special purpose vehicle (“SPV”), were named as defendants in a purported class action related to securities issued by the SPV in Singapore, commonly referred to as Pinnacle Notes. The case is styled Ge Dandong, et al. v. Pinnacle Performance Ltd., et al. and is pending in the SDNY. An amended complaint was filed on October 22, 2012. The court denied defendants’ motion to dismiss the amended complaint on August 22, 2013 and granted class certification on October 17, 2013. On October 30, 2013, defendants filed a petition for permission to appeal the court’s decision granting class certification. On January 31, 2014, plaintiffs filed a second amended complaint. The second amended complaint alleges that the defendants engaged in a fraudulent scheme to defraud investors by structuring the Pinnacle Notes to fail and benefited subsequently from the securities’ failure. In addition, the second amended complaint alleges that the securities’ offering materials contained material misstatements or omissions regarding the securities’ underlying assets and the alleged conflicts of interest between the defendants and the investors. The second amended complaint asserts common law claims of fraud, aiding and abetting fraud, fraudulent inducement, aiding and abetting fraudulent inducement, and breach of the implied covenant of good faith and fair dealing. Plaintiffs seek damages of approximately $138.7 million, rescission, punitive damages, and interest.

 

Other Litigation.    On December 23, 2009, the Federal Home Loan Bank of Seattle filed a complaint against the Company and another defendant in the Superior Court of the State of Washington, styled Federal Home Loan Bank of Seattle v. Morgan Stanley & Co. Inc., et al. The amended complaint, filed on September 28, 2010, alleges that defendants made untrue statements and material omissions in the sale to plaintiff of certain mortgage pass-through certificates backed by securitization trusts containing residential mortgage loans. The total amount of certificates allegedly sold to plaintiff by the Company was approximately $233 million. The complaint raises claims under the Washington State Securities Act and seeks, among other things, to rescind the plaintiff’s purchase of such certificates. On October 18, 2010, defendants filed a motion to dismiss the action. By orders dated June 23, 2011 and July 18, 2011, the court denied defendants’ omnibus motion to dismiss plaintiff’s amended complaint and on August 15, 2011, the court denied the Company’s individual motion to dismiss the amended complaint.

 

On March 15, 2010, the Federal Home Loan Bank of San Francisco filed two complaints against the Company and other defendants in the Superior Court of the State of California. These actions are styled Federal Home Loan Bank of San Francisco v. Credit Suisse Securities (USA) LLC, et al., and Federal Home Loan Bank of San Francisco v. Deutsche Bank Securities Inc. et al., respectively. Amended complaints were filed on June 10, 2010. The amended complaints allege that defendants made untrue statements and material omissions in connection with the sale to plaintiff of a number of mortgage pass-through certificates backed by securitization trusts containing residential mortgage loans. The amount of certificates allegedly sold to plaintiff by the Company in these cases was approximately $704 million and $276 million, respectively. The complaints raise claims under both the federal securities laws and California law and seek, among other things, to rescind the plaintiff’s purchase of such certificates. On August 11, 2011, plaintiff’s Securities Act claims were dismissed with prejudice. The defendants filed answers to the amended complaints on October 7, 2011. On February 9, 2012, defendants’ demurrers with respect to all other claims were overruled. On December 20, 2013, plaintiff’s negligent misrepresentation claims were dismissed with prejudice. A bellwether trial is currently scheduled to begin in September 2014. The Company is not a defendant in connection with the securitizations at issue in that trial.

 

37

LOGO

Table of Contents
On July 15, 2010, The Charles Schwab Corp. filed a complaint against the Company and other defendants in the Superior Court of the State of California, styled The Charles Schwab Corp. v. BNP Paribas Securities Corp., et al. The complaint alleges that defendants made untrue statements and material omissions in the sale to one of plaintiff’s subsidiaries of a number of mortgage pass-through certificates backed by securitization trusts containing residential mortgage loans. The total amount of certificates allegedly sold to plaintiff’s subsidiary by the Company was approximately $180 million. The complaint raises claims under both the federal securities laws and California law and seeks, among other things, to rescind the plaintiff’s purchase of such certificates. Plaintiff filed an amended complaint on August 2, 2010. On September 22, 2011, defendants filed demurrers to the amended complaint. On October 13, 2011, plaintiff voluntarily dismissed its claims brought under the Securities Act. On January 27, 2012, the court, in a ruling from the bench, substantially overruled defendants’ demurrers. On March 5, 2012, the plaintiff filed a second amended complaint. On April 10, 2012, the Company filed a demurrer to certain causes of action in the second amended complaint, which the court overruled on July 24, 2012. The Company filed its answer to the second amended complaint on August 3, 2012. An initial trial of certain of plaintiff’s claims is scheduled to begin in July 2015.

 

On July 15, 2010, China Development Industrial Bank (“CDIB”) filed a complaint against the Company, which is styled China Development Industrial Bank v. Morgan Stanley & Co. Incorporated and is pending in the Supreme Court of NY. The Complaint relates to a $275 million credit default swap referencing the super senior portion of the STACK 2006-1 CDO. The complaint asserts claims for common law fraud, fraudulent inducement and fraudulent concealment and alleges that the Company misrepresented the risks of the STACK 2006-1 CDO to CDIB, and that the Company knew that the assets backing the CDO were of poor quality when it entered into the credit default swap with CDIB. The complaint seeks compensatory damages related to the approximately $228 million that CDIB alleges it has already lost under the credit default swap, rescission of CDIB’s obligation to pay an additional $12 million, punitive damages, equitable relief, fees and costs. On March 10, 2011, the Company filed its answer to the complaint.

 

On October 15, 2010, the Federal Home Loan Bank of Chicago filed a complaint against the Company and other defendants in the Circuit Court of the State of Illinois, styled Federal Home Loan Bank of Chicago v. Bank of America Funding Corporation et al. The complaint alleges that defendants made untrue statements and material omissions in the sale to plaintiff of a number of mortgage pass-through certificates backed by securitization trusts containing residential mortgage loans and asserts claims under Illinois law. The total amount of certificates allegedly sold to plaintiff by the Company at issue in the action was approximately $203 million. The complaint seeks, among other things, to rescind the plaintiff’s purchase of such certificates. On March 24, 2011, the court presiding over Federal Home Loan Bank of Chicago v. Bank of America Funding Corporation et al. granted plaintiff leave to file an amended complaint. The Company filed its answer on December 21, 2012. On December 13, 2013, the court entered an order dismissing all claims related to one of the securitizations at issue.

 

On April 20, 2011, the Federal Home Loan Bank of Boston filed a complaint against the Company and other defendants in the Superior Court of the Commonwealth of Massachusetts styled Federal Home Loan Bank of Boston v. Ally Financial, Inc. F/K/A GMAC LLC et al. An amended complaint was filed on June 19, 2012 and alleges that defendants made untrue statements and material omissions in the sale to plaintiff of certain mortgage pass-through certificates backed by securitization trusts containing residential mortgage loans. The total amount of certificates allegedly issued by the Company or sold to plaintiff by the Company was approximately $385 million. The amended complaint raises claims under the Massachusetts Uniform Securities Act, the Massachusetts Consumer Protection Act and common law and seeks, among other things, to rescind the plaintiff’s purchase of such certificates. On May 26, 2011, defendants removed the case to the United States District Court for the District of Massachusetts. On October 11, 2012, defendants filed motions to dismiss the amended complaint, which was granted in part and denied in part on September 30, 2013. The defendants filed an answer to the amended complaint on December 16, 2013.

 

On July 5, 2011, Allstate Insurance Company and certain of its affiliated entities filed a complaint against the Company in the Supreme Court of NY, styled Allstate Insurance Company, et al. v. Morgan Stanley, et al. An amended complaint was filed on September 9, 2011 and alleges that defendants made untrue statements and

 

38

LOGO

Table of Contents
material omissions in the sale to plaintiff of certain mortgage pass-through certificates backed by securitization trusts containing residential mortgage loans. The total amount of certificates allegedly issued and/or sold to plaintiffs by the Company was approximately $104 million. The complaint raises common law claims of fraud, fraudulent inducement, aiding and abetting fraud and negligent misrepresentation and seeks, among other things, compensatory and/or rescissionary damages associated with plaintiffs’ purchases of such certificates. On March 15, 2013, the court denied in substantial part the defendants’ motion to dismiss the amended complaint, which order the Company appealed on April 11, 2013. On May 3, 2013, the Company filed its answer to the amended complaint.

 

On July 18, 2011, the Western and Southern Life Insurance Company and certain affiliated companies filed a complaint against the Company and other defendants in the Court of Common Pleas in Ohio, styled Western and Southern Life Insurance Company, et al. v. Morgan Stanley Mortgage Capital Inc., et al. An amended complaint was filed on April 2, 2012 and alleges that defendants made untrue statements and material omissions in the sale to plaintiffs of certain mortgage pass-through certificates backed by securitization trusts containing residential mortgage loans. The amount of the certificates allegedly sold to plaintiffs by the Company was approximately $153 million. The amended complaint raises claims under the Ohio Securities Act, federal securities laws, and common law and seeks, among other things, to rescind the plaintiffs’ purchases of such certificates. The Company filed its answer on August 17, 2012. Trial is currently scheduled to begin in May 2015.

 

On November 4, 2011, the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation (“FDIC”), as receiver for Franklin Bank S.S.B, filed two complaints against the Company in the District Court of the State of Texas. Each was styled Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, as Receiver for Franklin Bank S.S.B v. Morgan Stanley & Company LLC F/K/A Morgan Stanley & Co. Inc. and alleged that the Company made untrue statements and material omissions in connection with the sale to plaintiff of mortgage pass-through certificates backed by securitization trusts containing residential mortgage loans. The amount of certificates allegedly underwritten and sold to plaintiff by the Company in these cases was approximately $67 million and $35 million, respectively. The complaints each raised claims under both federal securities law and the Texas Securities Act and each seeks, among other things, compensatory damages associated with plaintiff’s purchase of such certificates. On March 20, 2012, the Company filed answers to the complaints in both cases. On June 7, 2012, the two cases were consolidated. On January 10, 2013, the Company filed a motion for summary judgment and special exceptions with respect to plaintiff’s claims. On February 6, 2013, the FDIC filed an amended consolidated complaint. On February 25, 2013, the Company filed a motion for summary judgment and special exceptions, which motion was denied in substantial part on April 26, 2013. On May 3, 2013, the FDIC filed a second amended consolidated complaint. Trial is currently scheduled to begin in November 2014.

 

On January 20, 2012, Sealink Funding Limited filed a complaint against the Company in the Supreme Court of NY, styled Sealink Funding Limited v. Morgan Stanley, et al. Plaintiff purports to be the assignee of claims of certain special purpose vehicles (“SPVs”) formerly sponsored by SachsenLB Europe. An amended complaint was filed on May 21, 2012 and alleges that defendants made untrue statements and material omissions in the sale to the SPVs of certain mortgage pass-through certificates backed by securitization trusts containing residential mortgage loans. The total amount of certificates allegedly issued by the Company and/or sold by the Company was approximately $507 million. The amended complaint raises common law claims of fraud, fraudulent inducement, and aiding and abetting fraud and seeks, among other things, compensatory and/or rescissionary damages as well as punitive damages associated with plaintiffs’ purchases of such certificates. On March 20, 2013, plaintiff filed a second amended complaint. On May 3, 2013, the Company filed a motion to dismiss the second amended complaint.

 

On January 25, 2012, Dexia SA/NV and certain of its affiliated entities filed a complaint against the Company in the Supreme Court of NY, styled Dexia SA/NV et al. v. Morgan Stanley, et al. An amended complaint was filed on May 24, 2012 and alleges that defendants made untrue statements and material omissions in the sale to plaintiffs of certain mortgage pass-through certificates backed by securitization trusts containing residential mortgage loans. The total amount of certificates allegedly issued by the Company and/or sold to plaintiffs by the

 

39

LOGO

Table of Contents
Company was approximately $626 million. The amended complaint raises common law claims of fraud, fraudulent inducement, and aiding and abetting fraud and seeks, among other things, compensatory and/or rescissionary damages as well as punitive damages associated with plaintiffs’ purchases of such certificates. On October 16, 2013, the court granted the defendants’ motion to dismiss the amended complaint. On November 18, 2013, plaintiffs filed a notice of appeal of the dismissal and a motion to renew their opposition to defendants’ motion to dismiss.

 

On April 25, 2012, The Prudential Insurance Company of America and certain affiliates filed a complaint against the Company and certain affiliates in the Superior Court of the State of New Jersey, styled The Prudential Insurance Company of America, et al. v. Morgan Stanley, et al. The complaint alleges that defendants made untrue statements and material omissions in connection with the sale to plaintiffs of certain mortgage pass-through certificates backed by securitization trusts containing residential mortgage loans. The total amount of certificates allegedly sponsored, underwritten and/or sold by the Company is approximately $1 billion. The complaint raises claims under the New Jersey Uniform Securities Law, as well as common law claims of negligent misrepresentation, fraud and tortious interference with contract and seeks, among other things, compensatory damages, punitive damages, rescission and rescissionary damages associated with plaintiffs’ purchases of such certificates. On October 16, 2012, plaintiffs filed an amended complaint which, among other things, increases the total amount of the certificates at issue by approximately $80 million, adds causes of action for fraudulent inducement, equitable fraud, aiding and abetting fraud, and violations of the New Jersey RICO statute, and includes a claim for treble damages. On March 15, 2013, the court denied the defendants’ motion to dismiss the amended complaint. On April 26, 2013, the defendants filed an answer to the amended complaint.

 

On August 7, 2012, U.S. Bank, in its capacity as Trustee, filed a complaint on behalf of Morgan Stanley Mortgage Loan Trust 2006-4SL and Mortgage Pass-Through Certificates, Series 2006-4SL (together, the “Trust”) against the Company. The matter is styled Morgan Stanley Mortgage Loan Trust 2006-4SL, et al. v. Morgan Stanley Mortgage Capital Inc. and is pending in the Supreme Court of NY. The complaint asserts claims for breach of contract and alleges, among other things, that the loans in the Trust, which had an original principal balance of approximately $303 million, breached various representations and warranties. The complaint seeks, among other relief, rescission of the mortgage loan purchase agreement underlying the transaction, specific performance and unspecified damages and interest. On October 8, 2012, the Company filed a motion to dismiss the complaint.

 

On August 8, 2012, U.S. Bank, in its capacity as Trustee, filed a complaint on behalf of Morgan Stanley Mortgage Loan Trust 2006-14SL, Mortgage Pass-Through Certificates, Series 2006-14SL, Morgan Stanley Mortgage Loan Trust 2007-4SL and Mortgage Pass-Through Certificates, Series 2007-4SL against the Company. The complaint is styled Morgan Stanley Mortgage Loan Trust 2006-14SL, et al. v. Morgan Stanley Mortgage Capital Holdings LLC, as successor in interest to Morgan Stanley Mortgage Capital Inc. and is pending in the Supreme Court of NY. The complaint asserts claims for breach of contract and alleges, among other things, that the loans in the trusts, which had original principal balances of approximately $354 million and $305 million respectively, breached various representations and warranties. The complaint seeks, among other relief, rescission of the mortgage loan purchase agreements underlying the transactions, specific performance and unspecified damages and interest. On October 9, 2012, the Company filed a motion to dismiss the complaint. On August 16, 2013, the court granted in part and denied in part the Company’s motion to dismiss the complaint. On September 17, 2013, the Company filed its answer to the complaint. On September 26, 2013, and October 7, 2013, the Company and the plaintiffs, respectively, filed notices of appeal with respect to the court’s August 16, 2013 decision.

 

On August 10, 2012, the FDIC, as receiver for Colonial Bank, filed a complaint against the Company in the Circuit Court of Montgomery, Alabama styled Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation as Receiver for Colonial Bank v. Citigroup Mortgage Loan Trust Inc. et al.. The complaint alleges that the Company made untrue statements and material omissions in connection with the sale to Colonial Bank of a mortgage pass-through certificate backed by a securitization trust containing residential loans. The complaint raises claims under federal

 

40

LOGO

Table of Contents
securities law and the Alabama Securities Act and seeks, among other things, compensatory damages. The total amount of the certificate allegedly sponsored, underwritten and/or sold by the Company to Colonial Bank was approximately $65 million. On September 13, 2013, the plaintiff filed an amended complaint. Defendants filed a motion to dismiss the amended complaint on November 12, 2013.

 

On September 28, 2012, U.S. Bank, in its capacity as Trustee, filed a complaint on behalf of Morgan Stanley Mortgage Loan Trust 2006-13ARX against the Company styled Morgan Stanley Mortgage Loan Trust 2006-13ARX v. Morgan Stanley Mortgage Capital Holdings LLC, as successor in interest to Morgan Stanley Mortgage Capital Inc., pending in the Supreme Court of NY. U.S. Bank filed an amended complaint on January 17, 2013, which asserts claims for breach of contract and alleges, among other things, that the loans in the trust, which had an original principal balance of approximately $609 million, breached various representations and warranties. The amended complaint seeks, among other relief, declaratory judgment relief, specific performance and unspecified damages and interest. On March 18, 2013, the Company filed a motion to dismiss the complaint.

 

On October 22, 2012, Asset Management Fund d/b/a AMF Funds and certain of its affiliated funds filed a complaint against the Company in the Supreme Court of NY, styled Asset Management Fund d/b/a AMF Funds et al v. Morgan Stanley et al. The complaint alleges that defendants made material misrepresentations and omissions in the sale to plaintiffs of certain mortgage pass-through certificates backed by securitization trusts containing residential mortgage loans. The total amount of certificates allegedly sponsored, underwritten and/or sold by the Company to plaintiffs was approximately $122 million. The complaint asserts causes of action against the Company for, among other things, common law fraud, fraudulent concealment, aiding and abetting fraud, and negligent misrepresentation, and seeks, among other things, monetary and punitive damages. On December 3, 2012, the Company filed a motion to dismiss the complaint. On July 18, 2013, the court dismissed claims with respect to seven certificates purchased by the plaintiff. The remaining claims relate to certificates with an original balance of $10.6 million. On September 12, 2013, plaintiffs filed a notice of appeal concerning the court’s decision granting in part and denying in part the defendants’ motion to dismiss. Defendants filed a notice of cross-appeal on September 26, 2013.

 

On December 14, 2012, Royal Park Investments SA/NV filed a complaint against the Company, certain affiliates, and other defendants in the Supreme Court of NY, styled Royal Park Investments SA/NV v. Merrill Lynch et al. The complaint alleges that defendants made material misrepresentations and omissions in the sale to plaintiff of certain mortgage pass-through certificates backed by securitization trusts containing residential mortgage loans totaling approximately $628 million. On March 15, 2013, defendants filed a motion to dismiss the complaint. On June 17, 2013, the court signed a joint proposed order and stipulation allowing plaintiffs to replead their complaint and defendants to withdraw their motion to dismiss without prejudice. On October 24, 2013, plaintiff filed a new complaint against the Company in the Supreme Court of NY, styled Royal Park Investments SA/NV v. Morgan Stanley et al. The new complaint alleges that defendants made material misrepresentations and omissions in the sale to plaintiff of certain mortgage pass-through certificates backed by securitization trusts containing residential mortgage loans. The total amount of certificates allegedly sponsored, underwritten and/or sold by the Company to plaintiff was approximately $597 million. The complaint raises common law claims of fraud, fraudulent inducement, negligent misrepresentation, and aiding and abetting fraud and seeks, among other things, compensatory and punitive damages. On February 3, 2014, the Company filed a motion to dismiss the complaint.

 

On January 10, 2013, U.S. Bank, in its capacity as Trustee, filed a complaint on behalf of Morgan Stanley Mortgage Loan Trust 2006-10SL and Mortgage Pass-Through Certificates, Series 2006-10SL against the Company. The complaint is styled Morgan Stanley Mortgage Loan Trust 2006-10SL, et al. v. Morgan Stanley Mortgage Capital Holdings LLC, as successor in interest to Morgan Stanley Mortgage Capital Inc. and is pending in the Supreme Court of NY. The complaint asserts claims for breach of contract and alleges, among other things, that the loans in the trust, which had an original principal balance of approximately $300 million, breached various representations and warranties. The complaint seeks, among other relief, an order requiring the Company to comply with the loan breach remedy procedures in the transaction documents, unspecified damages, and interest. On March 11, 2013, the Company filed a motion to dismiss the complaint.

 

41

LOGO

Table of Contents
On January 31, 2013, HSH Nordbank AG and certain affiliates filed a complaint against the Company, certain affiliates, and other defendants in the Supreme Court of NY, styled HSH Nordbank AG et al. v. Morgan Stanley et al. The complaint alleges that defendants made material misrepresentations and omissions in the sale to plaintiffs of certain mortgage pass-through certificates backed by securitization trusts containing residential mortgage loans. The total amount of certificates allegedly sponsored, underwritten and/or sold by the Company to plaintiff was approximately $524 million. The complaint alleges causes of action against the Company for common law fraud, fraudulent concealment, aiding and abetting fraud, negligent misrepresentation, and rescission and seeks, among other things, compensatory and punitive damages. On April 12, 2013, defendants filed a motion to dismiss the complaint.

 

On February 14, 2013, Bank Hapoalim B.M. filed a complaint against the Company and certain affiliates in the Supreme Court of NY, styled Bank Hapoalim B.M. v. Morgan Stanley et al. The complaint alleges that defendants made material misrepresentations and omissions in the sale to plaintiff of certain mortgage pass-through certificates backed by securitization trusts containing residential mortgage loans. The total amount of certificates allegedly sponsored, underwritten and/or sold by the Company to plaintiff was approximately $141 million. The complaint alleges causes of action against the Company for common law fraud, fraudulent concealment, aiding and abetting fraud, and negligent misrepresentation, and seeks, among other things, compensatory and punitive damages. On April 26, 2013, defendants filed a motion to dismiss the complaint.

 

On March 7, 2013, the Federal Housing Finance Agency filed a summons with notice on behalf of the trustee of the Saxon Asset Securities Trust, Series 2007-1, against the Company and an affiliate. The matter is styled Federal Housing Finance Agency, as Conservator for the Federal Home Loan Mortgage Corporation, on behalf of the Trustee of the Saxon Asset Securities Trust, Series 2007-1 v. Saxon Funding Management LLC and Morgan Stanley and is pending in the Supreme Court of NY. The notice asserts claims for breach of contract and alleges, among other things, that the loans in the trust, which had an original principal balance of approximately $593 million, breached various representations and warranties. The notice seeks, among other relief, specific performance of the loan breach remedy procedures in the transaction documents, unspecified damages, indemnity, and interest.

 

On May 3, 2013, plaintiffs in Deutsche Zentral-Genossenschaftsbank AG et al. v. Morgan Stanley et al. filed a complaint against the Company, certain affiliates, and other defendants in the Supreme Court of NY. The complaint alleges that defendants made material misrepresentations and omissions in the sale to plaintiffs of certain mortgage pass-through certificates backed by securitization trusts containing residential mortgage loans. The total amount of certificates allegedly sponsored, underwritten and/or sold by the Company to plaintiff was approximately $694 million. The complaint alleges causes of action against the Company for common law fraud, fraudulent concealment, aiding and abetting fraud, negligent misrepresentation, and rescission and seeks, among other things, compensatory and punitive damages. On July 12, 2013, defendants filed a motion to dismiss the complaint.

 

On May 17, 2013, plaintiff in IKB International S.A. in Liquidation, et al. v. Morgan Stanley, et al. filed a complaint against the Company and certain affiliates in the Supreme Court of NY. The complaint alleges that defendants made material misrepresentations and omissions in the sale to plaintiff of certain mortgage pass-through certificates backed by securitization trusts containing residential mortgage loans. The total amount of certificates allegedly sponsored, underwritten and/or sold by the Company to plaintiff was approximately $132 million. The complaint alleges causes of action against the Company for common law fraud, fraudulent concealment, aiding and abetting fraud, and negligent misrepresentation, and seeks, among other things, compensatory and punitive damages. On July 26, 2013, defendants filed a motion to dismiss the complaint.

 

On July 2, 2013, the trustee, Deutsche Bank became the named plaintiff in Federal Housing Finance Agency, as Conservator for the Federal Home Loan Mortgage Corporation, on behalf of the Trustee of the Morgan Stanley ABS Capital I Inc. Trust, Series 2007-NC1 (MSAC 2007-NC1) v. Morgan Stanley ABS Capital I Inc., and filed a complaint in the Supreme Court of NY under the caption Deutsche Bank National Trust Company, as Trustee for the Morgan Stanley ABS Capital I Inc. Trust, Series 2007-NC1 v. Morgan Stanley ABS Capital I, Inc. On

 

42

LOGO

Table of Contents
February 3, 2014, the plaintiff filed an amended complaint, which asserts claims for breach of contract and breach of the implied covenant of good faith and fair dealing and alleges, among other things, that the loans in the trust, which had an original principal balance of approximately $1.25 billion, breached various representations and warranties. The amended complaint seeks, among other relief, specific performance of the loan breach remedy procedures in the transaction documents, unspecified damages, rescission and interest.

 

On July 8, 2013, plaintiff filed a complaint in Morgan Stanley Mortgage Loan Trust 2007-2AX, by U.S. Bank National Association, solely in its capacity as Trustee v. Morgan Stanley Mortgage Capital Holdings LLC, as successor-by-merger to Morgan Stanley Mortgage Capital Inc., and Greenpoint Mortgage Funding, Inc. The complaint, filed in the Supreme Court of NY, asserts claims for breach of contract and alleges, among other things, that the loans in the Trust, which had an original principal balance of approximately $650 million, breached various representations and warranties. The complaint seeks, among other relief, specific performance of the loan breach remedy procedures in the transaction documents, unspecified damages and interest. On August 22, 2013, the Company a filed a motion to dismiss the complaint.

 

On August 5, 2013, Landesbank Baden-Württemberg and two affiliates filed a complaint against the Company and certain affiliates in the Supreme Court of NY styled Landesbank Baden-Württemberg et al. v. Morgan Stanley et al. The complaint alleges that defendants made material misrepresentations and omissions in the sale to plaintiffs of certain mortgage pass-through certificates backed by securitization trusts containing residential mortgage loans. The total amount of certificates allegedly sponsored, underwritten and/or sold by the Company to plaintiffs was approximately $50 million. The complaint alleges causes of action against the Company for, among other things, common law fraud, fraudulent concealment, aiding and abetting fraud, negligent misrepresentation, and rescission based upon mutual mistake, and seeks, among other things, rescission, compensatory damages, and punitive damages. On October 4, 2013, defendants filed a motion to dismiss the complaint.

 

On August 16, 2013, plaintiffs in National Credit Union Administration Board v. Morgan Stanley & Co. Incorporated, et al. filed a complaint against the Company and certain affiliates in the United States District Court for the District of Kansas. The complaint alleges that defendants made untrue statements of material fact or omitted to state material facts in the sale to plaintiffs of certain mortgage pass-through certificates issued by securitization trusts containing residential mortgage loans. The total amount of certificates allegedly sponsored, underwritten and/or sold by the Company to plaintiffs was approximately $567 million. The complaint alleges causes of action against the Company for violations of Section 11 and Section 12(a)(2) of the Securities Act of 1933, violations of the California Corporate Securities Law of 1968, and violations of the Kansas Blue Sky Law and seeks, among other things, rescissionary and compensatory damages. The defendants filed a motion to dismiss the complaint on November 4, 2013. On December 27, 2013, the court granted the motion to dismiss in substantial part. The surviving claims relate to one certificate purchased by the plaintiff for approximately $17 million.

 

On August 26, 2013, a complaint was filed against the Company and certain affiliates in the Supreme Court of NY, styled Phoenix Light SF Limited et al v. Morgan Stanley et al. The complaint alleges that defendants made untrue statements and material omissions in the sale to plaintiffs, or their assignors, of certain mortgage pass-through certificates backed by securitization trusts containing residential mortgage loans. The total amount of certificates allegedly issued by the Company and/or sold to plaintiffs or their assignors by the Company was approximately $344 million. The complaint raises common law claims of fraud, fraudulent inducement, aiding and abetting fraud, negligent misrepresentation and rescission based on mutual mistake and seeks, among other things, compensatory damages, punitive damages or alternatively rescission or rescissionary damages associated with the purchase of such certificates. The defendants filed a motion to dismiss on December 13, 2013.

 

On September 23, 2013, plaintiffs in National Credit Union Administration Board v. Morgan Stanley & Co. Inc., et al. filed a complaint against the Company and certain affiliates in the SDNY. The complaint alleges that defendants made untrue statements of material fact or omitted to state material facts in the sale to plaintiffs of certain mortgage pass-through certificates issued by securitization trusts containing residential mortgage loans. The total amount of certificates allegedly sponsored, underwritten and/or sold by the Company to plaintiffs was

 

43

LOGO

Table of Contents
approximately $417 million. The complaint alleges causes of action against the Company for violations of Section 11 and Section 12(a)(2) of the Securities Act of 1933, violations of the Texas Securities Act, and violations of the Illinois Securities Law of 1953 and seeks, among other things, rescissionary and compensatory damages. The defendants filed a motion to dismiss the complaint on November 13, 2013. On January 22, 2014, the court granted defendants’ motion to dismiss with respect to claims arising under the Securities Act of 1933 and denied defendants’ motion to dismiss with respect to claims arising under Texas Securities Act and the Illinois Securities Law of 1953.

 

On November 6, 2013, Deutsche Bank, in its capacity as trustee, became the named plaintiff in Federal Housing Finance Agency, as Conservator for the Federal Home Loan Mortgage Corporation, on behalf of the Trustee of the Morgan Stanley ABS Capital I Inc. Trust, Series 2007-NC3 (MSAC 2007-NC3) v. Morgan Stanley Mortgage Capital Holdings LLC, and filed a complaint in the Supreme Court of NY under the caption Deutsche Bank National Trust Company, solely in its capacity as Trustee for Morgan Stanley ABS Capital I Inc. Trust, Series 2007-NC3 v. Morgan Stanley Mortgage Capital Holdings LLC, as Successor-by-Merger to Morgan Stanley Mortgage Capital Inc. The complaint asserts claims for breach of contract and breach of the implied covenant of good faith and fair dealing and alleges, among other things, that the loans in the trust, which had an original principal balance of approximately $1.3 billion, breached various representations and warranties. The complaint seeks, among other relief, specific performance of the loan breach remedy procedures in the transaction documents, unspecified damages, rescission, interest and costs. On December 16, 2013, the Company filed a motion to dismiss the complaint.

 

On December 24, 2013, Commerzbank AG London Branch filed a summons with notice against the Company and others in the Supreme Court of NY, styled Commerzbank AG London Branch v. UBS AG et al. Plaintiff purports to be the assignee of claims of certain other entities. The notice alleges that defendants made material misrepresentations and omissions in the sale to plaintiff’s assignors of certain mortgage pass-through certificates backed by securitization trusts containing residential mortgage loans. The total amount of certificates allegedly sponsored, underwritten and/or sold by the Company to plaintiffs was approximately $207 million. The notice identifies causes of action against the Company for, among other things, common-law fraud, fraudulent inducement, aiding and abetting fraud, civil conspiracy, tortious interference and unjust enrichment. The notice identifies the relief sought to include, among other things, monetary damages of at least approximately $207 million and punitive damages.

 

On December 30, 2013, Wilmington Trust Company, in its capacity as trustee for Morgan Stanley Mortgage Loan Trust 2007-12, filed a complaint against the Company. The matter is styled Wilmington Trust Company v. Morgan Stanley Mortgage Capital Holdings LLC et al. and is pending in the Supreme Court of NY. The complaint asserts claims for breach of contract and alleges, among other things, that the loans in the trust, which had an original principal balance of approximately $516 million, breached various representations and warranties. The complaint seeks, among other relief, unspecified damages, interest and costs.

 

On January 15, 2014, the FDIC, as receiver for United Western Bank filed a complaint against the Company and others in the District Court of the State of Colorado, styled Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, as Receiver for United Western Bank v. Banc of America Funding Corp., et al. The complaint alleges that the Company made untrue statements and material omissions in connection with the sale to United Western Bank of mortgage pass-through certificates backed by securitization trusts containing residential mortgage loans. The amount of certificates allegedly sponsored, underwritten and/or sold to United Western Bank by the Company was approximately $75 million. The complaint raises claims under both federal securities law and the Colorado Securities Act and seeks, among other things, compensatory damages associated with plaintiff’s purchase of such certificates.

 

Other Matters.    On a case-by-case basis the Company has entered into agreements to toll the statute of limitations applicable to potential civil claims related to RMBS, CDOs and other mortgage-related products and services when the Company has concluded that it is in its interest to do so.

 

44

LOGO

Table of Contents
On October 18, 2011, the Company received a letter from Gibbs & Bruns LLP (the “Law Firm”), which is purportedly representing a group of investment advisers and holders of mortgage pass-through certificates issued by RMBS trusts that were sponsored or underwritten by the Company. The letter asserted that the Law Firm’s clients collectively hold 25% or more of the voting rights in 17 RMBS trusts sponsored or underwritten by the Company and that these trusts have an aggregate outstanding balance exceeding $6 billion. The letter alleged generally that large numbers of mortgages in these trusts were sold or deposited into the trusts based on false and/or fraudulent representations and warranties by the mortgage originators, sellers and/or depositors. The letter also alleged generally that there is evidence suggesting that the Company has failed prudently to service mortgage loans in these trusts. On January 31, 2012, the Law Firm announced that its clients hold over 25% of the voting rights in 69 RMBS trusts securing over $25 billion of RMBS sponsored or underwritten by the Company, and that its clients had issued instructions to the trustees of these trusts to open investigations into allegedly ineligible mortgages held by these trusts. The Law Firm’s press release also indicated that the Law Firm’s clients anticipate that they may provide additional instructions to the trustees, as needed, to further the investigations. On September 19, 2012, the Company received two purported Notices of Non-Performance from the Law Firm purportedly on behalf of the holders of significant voting rights in various trusts securing over $28 billion of residential mortgage backed securities sponsored or underwritten by the Company. The Notice purports to identify certain covenants in Pooling and Servicing Agreements (“PSAs”) that the holders allege that the Servicer and Master Servicer failed to perform, and alleges that each of these failures has materially affected the rights of certificateholders and constitutes an ongoing event of default under the relevant PSAs. On November 2, 2012, the Company responded to the letters, denying the allegations therein.

 

Commercial Mortgage Related Matter.

 

On January 25, 2011, the Company was named as a defendant in The Bank of New York Mellon Trust, National Association v. Morgan Stanley Mortgage Capital, Inc., a litigation pending in the SDNY. The suit, brought by the trustee of a series of commercial mortgage pass-through certificates, alleges that the Company breached certain representations and warranties with respect to an $81 million commercial mortgage loan that was originated and transferred to the trust by the Company. The complaint seeks, among other things, to have the Company repurchase the loan and pay additional monetary damages. On June 27, 2011, the court denied the Company’s motion to dismiss, but directed the filing of an amended complaint. On July 29, 2011, the Company filed its answer to the first amended complaint. On June 20, 2013, the court granted in part and denied in part the Company’s motion for summary judgment, and denied the plaintiff’s motion for summary judgment. On October 30, 2013, the Company filed a supplemental motion for summary judgment.

 

Matters Related to the CDS Market.

 

On July 1, 2013, the European Commission (“EC”) issued a Statement of Objections (“SO”) addressed to twelve financial firms (including the Company), the International Swaps and Derivatives Association, Inc. (“ISDA”) and Markit Group Limited (“Markit”) and various affiliates alleging that, between 2006 and 2009, the recipients breached European Union competition law by taking and refusing to take certain actions in an effort to prevent the development of exchange traded credit default swap (“CDS”) products. The SO indicates that the EC plans to impose remedial measures and fines on the recipients. The Company and the other recipients filed a response to the SO on January 21, 2014. The Company and others have also responded to an investigation by the Antitrust Division of the United States Department of Justice related to the CDS market.

 

Beginning in May 2013, twelve financial firms (including the Company), as well as ISDA and Markit, were named as defendants in multiple purported antitrust class actions now consolidated into a single proceeding in the SDNY styled In Re: Credit Default Swaps Antitrust Litigation. Plaintiffs allege that defendants violated United States antitrust laws from 2008 to present in connection with their alleged efforts to prevent the development of exchange traded CDS products. The complaints seek, among other relief, certification of a class of plaintiffs who purchased CDS from defendants in the United States, treble damages and injunctive relief.

 

 	45	 	LOGO
Table of Contents
The following matters were terminated during or following the quarter ended December 31, 2013:

 

In re: Lehman Brothers Equity/Debt Securities Litigation, which had been pending in the SDNY, related to several offerings of debt and equity securities issued by Lehman Brothers Holdings Inc. during 2007 and 2008. A group of underwriter defendants, including the Company, settled the main litigation on December 2, 2012. The remaining opt-out claims and appeals have now been resolved.

 

Stichting Pensioenfonds ABP v. Morgan Stanley, et al., which had been pending in the Supreme Court of NY, involved allegations that the defendants made untrue statements and material omissions to plaintiff in connection with the sale of certain mortgage pass-through certificates backed by securitization trusts containing residential mortgage loans. On November 15, 2013, the parties entered into an agreement to settle the litigation. On December 3, 2013, the court dismissed the action.

 

Bayerische Landesbank, New York Branch v. Morgan Stanley, et al., which had been pending in the Supreme Court of NY, involved allegations that the defendants made untrue statements and material omissions to plaintiff in connection with the sale of certain mortgage pass-through certificates backed by securitization trusts containing residential mortgage loans. On December 6, 2013, the parties entered into an agreement to settle the litigation. On January 2, 2014, the court dismissed the action.

 

Seagull Point, LLC, individually and on behalf of Morgan Stanley ABS Capital I Inc. Trust 2007 HE-5 v. WMC Mortgage Corp., et al., which had been pending in the Supreme Court of NY, involved allegations that the loans in the trust breached various representations and warranties. On January 9, 2014, plaintiff filed a notice of discontinuance, dismissing the action against all defendants.

 

Federal Home Loan Bank of Chicago v. Bank of America Securities LLC, et al., which had been pending in the Superior Court of the State of California, involved allegations that the defendants made untrue statements and material omissions to plaintiff in connection with the sale of certain mortgage pass-through certificates backed by securitization trusts containing residential mortgage loans. On December 6, 2013, plaintiff filed a request for dismissal of all of its claims against the Company. On January 27, 2014, the court dismissed the action.

 

Metropolitan Life Insurance Company, et al. v. Morgan Stanley, et al., which had been pending in the Supreme Court of NY, involved allegations that the defendants made untrue statements and material omissions to plaintiffs in connection with the sale of certain mortgage pass-through certificates backed by securitization trusts containing residential mortgage loans. On January 23, 2014, the parties reached an agreement in principle to settle the litigation.

 

Cambridge Place Investment Management Inc. v. Morgan Stanley & Co., Inc., et al., which had been pending in the Superior Court of the Commonwealth of Massachusetts, involved allegations that the defendants made untrue statements and material omissions to plaintiff in connection with the sale of certain mortgage pass-through certificates backed by securitization trusts containing residential mortgage loans. On February 11, 2014, the parties entered into an agreement to settle the litigation. On February 20, 2014, the court dismissed the action.

 

Federal Housing Finance Agency, as Conservator v. Morgan Stanley et al., which had been pending in the SDNY, involved allegations that the defendants made untrue statements and material omissions to plaintiff in connection with the sale of certain mortgage pass-through certificates backed by securitization trusts containing residential mortgage loans. On February 7, 2014, the parties entered into an agreement to settle the litigation. On February 20, 2014, the court dismissed the action.

 

On December 12, 2013, the Company entered into an agreement with American International Group, Inc. (“AIG”) to resolve AIG’s potential claims against the Company related to AIG’s purchases of certain mortgage pass-through certificates sponsored or underwritten by the Company backed by securitization trusts containing residential mortgage loans.

 

Item 4.    Mine Safety Disclosures

 

Not applicable.

 

LOGO	 	46	 	
Table of Contents
Part II

 

Item 5.	Market for Registrant’s Common Equity, Related Stockholder Matters and Issuer Purchases of Equity Securities.
 

Morgan Stanley’s common stock trades on the NYSE under the symbol “MS.” As of February 19, 2014, the Company had 79,140 holders of record; however, the Company believes the number of beneficial owners of common stock exceeds this number.

 

The table below sets forth, for each of the last eight quarters, the low and high sales prices per share of the Company’s common stock as reported by Bloomberg Financial Markets and the amount of any cash dividends per share of the Company’s common stock declared by its Board of Directors for such quarter.

 

 	  	Low
Sale Price	 	  	High
Sale Price	 	 	Dividends	 
2013:

  				  				 			
Fourth Quarter

  	$	26.41	  	  	$	31.85	  	 	$	0.05	  
Third Quarter

  	$	23.83	  	  	$	29.50	  	 	$	0.05	  
Second Quarter

  	$	20.16	  	  	$	27.17	  	 	$	0.05	  
First Quarter

  	$	19.32	  	  	$	24.47	  	 	$	0.05	  
2012:

  				  				 			
Fourth Quarter

  	$	13.49	  	  	$	19.45	  	 	$	0.05	  
Third Quarter

  	$	12.29	  	  	$	18.50	  	 	$	0.05	  
Second Quarter

  	$	12.26	  	  	$	20.05	  	 	$	0.05	  
First Quarter

  	$	13.49	  	  	$	21.19	  	 	$	0.05	  
 

 	47	 	LOGO
Table of Contents
The table below sets forth the information with respect to purchases made by or on behalf of the Company of its common stock during the fourth quarter of the year ended December 31, 2013.

 

Issuer Purchases of Equity Securities

(dollars in millions, except per share amounts)

 

Period

 	Total
Number
of
Shares
Purchased	 	 	Average
Price
Paid Per
Share	 	 	Total Number of
Shares Purchased
As Part of Publicly
Announced Plans
or Programs(C)	 	 	Approximate Dollar
Value of Shares
that May Yet Be
Purchased Under
the Plans or
Programs	 
Month #1 (October 1, 2013—October 31, 2013)

 				 				 				 			
Share Repurchase Program(A)

 	 	1,495,000	  	 	$	29.26	  	 	 	1,495,000	  	 	$	1,394	  
Employee Transactions(B)

 	 	172,249	  	 	$	27.46	  	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 
Month #2 (November 1, 2013—November 30, 2013)

 				 				 				 			
Share Repurchase Program(A)

 	 	4,038,832	  	 	$	29.65	  	 	 	4,038,832	  	 	$	1,274	  
Employee Transactions(B)

 	 	56,206	  	 	$	30.10	  	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 
Month #3 (December 1, 2013—December 31, 2013)

 				 				 				 			
Share Repurchase Program(A)

 	 	2,087,000	  	 	$	30.81	  	 	 	2,087,000	  	 	$	1,210	  
Employee Transactions(B)

 	 	170,552	  	 	$	31.19	  	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 
Total

 				 				 				 			
Share Repurchase Program(A)

 	 	7,620,832	  	 	$	29.89	  	 	 	7,620,832	  	 	$	1,210	  
Employee Transactions(B)

 	 	399,007	  	 	$	29.43	  	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 
 

(A)	On December 19, 2006, the Company announced that its Board of Directors authorized the repurchase of up to $6 billion of the Company’s outstanding stock under a share repurchase program (the “Share Repurchase Program”). The Share Repurchase Program is a program for capital management purposes that considers, among other things, business segment capital needs, as well as equity-based compensation and benefit plan requirements. The Share Repurchase Program has no set expiration or termination date. Share repurchases by the Company are subject to regulatory approval. In July 2013, the Company received no objection from the Federal Reserve to repurchase up to $500 million of the Company’s outstanding common stock under rules permitting annual capital distributions (12 Code of Federal Regulations 225.8, Capital Planning), of which approximately $150 million as of December 31, 2013 may yet be purchased until March 31, 2014. For further information, see “Liquidity and Capital Resources—Capital Management” in Part I, Item 2.
(B)	Includes: (1) shares delivered or attested in satisfaction of the exercise price and/or tax withholding obligations by holders of employee and director stock options (granted under employee and director stock compensation plans) who exercised options; (2) shares withheld, delivered or attested (under the terms of grants under employee and director stock compensation plans) to offset tax withholding obligations that occur upon vesting and release of restricted shares; (3) shares withheld, delivered and attested (under the terms of grants under employee and director stock compensation plans) to offset tax withholding obligations that occur upon the delivery of outstanding shares underlying restricted stock units; and (4) shares withheld, delivered and attested (under the terms of grants under employee and director stock compensation plans) to offset the cash payment for fractional shares. The Company’s employee and director stock compensation plans provide that the value of the shares withheld, delivered or attested, shall be valued using the fair market value of the Company’s common stock on the date the relevant transaction occurs, using a valuation methodology established by the Company.
(C)	Share purchases under publicly announced programs are made pursuant to open-market purchases, Rule 10b5-1 plans or privately negotiated transactions (including with employee benefit plans) as market conditions warrant and at prices the Company deems appropriate.
 

***

 

48

LOGO

Table of Contents
Stock performance graph. The following graph compares the cumulative total shareholder return (rounded to the nearest whole dollar) of the Company’s common stock, the S&P 500 Stock Index (“S&P 500”) and the S&P 500 Financials Index (“S5FINL”) for the last five years. The graph assumes a $100 investment at the closing price on December 31, 2008 and reinvestment of dividends on the respective dividend payment dates without commissions. This graph does not forecast future performance of the Company’s common stock.

 

LOGO

 

 	  	MS	 	  	S&P 500	 	  	S5FINL	 
12/31/2008

  	$	100.00	  	  	$	100.00	  	  	$	100.00	  
12/31/2009

  	$	187.93	  	  	$	126.45	  	  	$	117.15	  
12/31/2010

  	$	174.03	  	  	$	145.49	  	  	$	131.36	  
12/31/2011

  	$	97.59	  	  	$	148.55	  	  	$	108.95	  
12/30/2012

  	$	124.84	  	  	$	172.31	  	  	$	140.27	  
12/31/2013

  	$	206.40	  	  	$	228.10	  	  	$	190.19	  
 

 	49	 	LOGO
Table of Contents
Item 6.	Selected Financial Data.
 

MORGAN STANLEY

 

SELECTED FINANCIAL DATA

(dollars in millions, except share and per share data)

 

 	  	2013	 	 	2012	 	 	2011	 	 	2010	 	  	2009	 
Income Statement Data:

  				 				 				 				  			
Revenues:

  				 				 				 				  			
Investment banking

  	$	5,246	 	 	$	4,758	 	 	$	4,991	 	 	$	5,122	 	  	$	5,020	 
Trading

  	 	9,359	 	 	 	6,990	 	 	 	12,384	 	 	 	9,393	 	  	 	7,723	 
Investments

  	 	1,777	 	 	 	742	 	 	 	573	 	 	 	1,825	 	  	 	(1,034	) 
Commissions and fees

  	 	4,629	 	 	 	4,253	 	 	 	5,343	 	 	 	4,909	 	  	 	4,210	 
Asset management, distribution and administration fees

  	 	9,638	 	 	 	9,008	 	 	 	8,409	 	 	 	7,843	 	  	 	5,802	 
Other

  	 	990	 	 	 	556	 	 	 	176	 	 	 	1,235	 	  	 	672	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 
Total non-interest revenues

  	 	31,639	 	 	 	26,307	 	 	 	31,876	 	 	 	30,327	 	  	 	22,393	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 
Interest income

  	 	5,209	 	 	 	5,692	 	 	 	7,234	 	 	 	7,288	 	  	 	7,468	 
Interest expense

  	 	4,431	 	 	 	5,897	 	 	 	6,883	 	 	 	6,394	 	  	 	6,678	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 
Net interest

  	 	778	 	 	 	(205	) 	 	 	351	 	 	 	894	 	  	 	790	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 
Net revenues

  	 	32,417	 	 	 	26,102	 	 	 	32,227	 	 	 	31,221	 	  	 	23,183	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 
Non-interest expenses:

  				 				 				 				  			
Compensation and benefits

  	 	16,277	 	 	 	15,615	 	 	 	16,325	 	 	 	15,860	 	  	 	14,287	 
Other

  	 	11,658	 	 	 	9,967	 	 	 	9,792	 	 	 	9,154	 	  	 	7,753	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 
Total non-interest expenses

  	 	27,935	 	 	 	25,582	 	 	 	26,117	 	 	 	25,014	 	  	 	22,040	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 
Income from continuing operations before income taxes

  	 	4,482	 	 	 	520	 	 	 	6,110	 	 	 	6,207	 	  	 	1,143	 
Provision for (benefit from) income taxes

  	 	826	 	 	 	(237	) 	 	 	1,414	 	 	 	743	 	  	 	(298	) 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 
Income from continuing operations

  	 	3,656	 	 	 	757	 	 	 	4,696	 	 	 	5,464	 	  	 	1,441	 
Discontinued operations(1):

  				 				 				 				  			
Gain (loss) from discontinued operations

  	 	(72	) 	 	 	(48	) 	 	 	(170	) 	 	 	600	 	  	 	(127	) 
Provision for (benefit from) income taxes

  	 	(29	) 	 	 	(7	) 	 	 	(119	) 	 	 	362	 	  	 	(92	) 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 
Net gain (loss) from discontinued operations

  	 	(43	) 	 	 	(41	) 	 	 	(51	) 	 	 	238	 	  	 	(35	) 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 
Net income

  	 	3,613	 	 	 	716	 	 	 	4,645	 	 	 	5,702	 	  	 	1,406	 
Net income applicable to redeemable noncontrolling interests(2)

  	 	222	 	 	 	124	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	  	 	—  	 
Net income applicable to nonredeemable noncontrolling interests(2)

  	 	459	 	 	 	524	 	 	 	535	 	 	 	999	 	  	 	60	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 
Net income applicable to Morgan Stanley

  	$	2,932	 	 	$	68	 	 	$	4,110	 	 	$	4,703	 	  	$	1,346	 
Preferred stock dividends

  	 	277	 	 	 	98	 	 	 	2,043	 	 	 	1,109	 	  	 	2,253	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 
Earnings (loss) applicable to Morgan Stanley common shareholders(3)

  	$	2,655	 	 	$	(30	) 	 	$	2,067	 	 	$	3,594	 	  	$	(907	) 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 
Amounts applicable to Morgan Stanley:

  				 				 				 				  			
Income from continuing operations

  	$	2,975	 	 	$	138	 	 	$	4,168	 	 	$	4,478	 	  	$	1,404	 
Net gain (loss) from discontinued operations

  	 	(43	) 	 	 	(70	) 	 	 	(58	) 	 	 	225	 	  	 	(58	) 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 
Net income applicable to Morgan Stanley

  	$	2,932	 	 	$	68	 	 	$	4,110	 	 	$	4,703	 	  	$	1,346	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 
 

50

LOGO

Table of Contents
 	  	2013	 	 	2012	 	 	2011	 	 	2010	 	 	2009	 
Per Share Data:

  				 				 				 				 			
Earnings (loss) per basic common share(4):

  				 				 				 				 			
Income (loss) from continuing operations

  	$	1.42	 	 	$	0.02	 	 	$	1.28	 	 	$	2.49	 	 	$	(0.72	) 
Net gain (loss) from discontinued operations

  	 	(0.03	)	 	 	(0.04	)	 	 	(0.03	)	 	 	0.15	 	 	 	(0.05	)
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Earnings (loss) per basic common share

  	$	1.39	 	 	$	(0.02	)	 	$	1.25	 	 	$	2.64	 	 	$	(0.77	) 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Earnings (loss) per diluted common share(4):

  				 				 				 				 			
Income (loss) from continuing operations

  	$	1.38	 	 	$	0.02	 	 	$	1.27	 	 	$	2.45	 	 	$	(0.72	) 
Net gain (loss) from discontinued operations

  	 	(0.02	)	 	 	(0.04	)	 	 	(0.04	)	 	 	0.18	 	 	 	(0.05	)
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Earnings (loss) per diluted common share

  	$	1.36	 	 	$	(0.02	)	 	$	1.23	 	 	$	2.63	 	 	$	(0.77	) 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Book value per common share(5)

  	$	32.24	 	 	$	30.70	 	 	$	31.42	 	 	$	31.49	 	 	$	27.26	 
Dividends declared per common share

  	$	0.20	 	 	$	0.20	 	 	$	0.20	 	 	$	0.20	 	 	$	0.17	 
Balance Sheet and Other Operating Data:

  				 				 				 				 			
Total assets

  	$	832,702	 	 	$	780,960	 	 	$	749,898	 	 	$	807,698	 	 	$	771,462	 
Total deposits

  	 	112,379	 	 	 	83,266	 	 	 	65,662	 	 	 	63,812	 	 	 	62,215	 
Long-term borrowings

  	 	153,575	 	 	 	169,571	 	 	 	184,234	 	 	 	192,457	 	 	 	193,374	 
Morgan Stanley shareholders’ equity

  	 	65,921	 	 	 	62,109	 	 	 	62,049	 	 	 	57,211	 	 	 	46,688	 
Return on average common equity(6)

  	 	4.3	% 	 	 	N/M	  	 	 	3.8	% 	 	 	9.0	% 	 	 	N/M	  
Average common shares outstanding(3):

  				 				 				 				 			
Basic

  	 	1,905,823,882	 	 	 	1,885,774,276	 	 	 	1,654,708,640	 	 	 	1,361,670,938	 	 	 	1,185,414,871	 
Diluted

  	 	1,956,519,738	 	 	 	1,918,811,270	 	 	 	1,675,271,669	 	 	 	1,411,268,971	 	 	 	1,185,414,871	 
 

N/M—Not Meaningful.

(1)	Prior-period amounts have been recast for discontinued operations. See Note 1 to the consolidated financial statements in Item 8 for information on discontinued operations.
(2)	Information includes 100%, 65% and 51% ownership of the retail securities joint venture between the Company and Citigroup Inc. (the “Wealth Management JV”) effective June 28, 2013, September 17, 2012 and May 31, 2009, respectively (see Note 3 to the consolidated financial statements in Item 8).
(3)	Amounts shown are used to calculate earnings per basic and diluted common share.
(4)	For the calculation of basic and diluted earnings per common share, see Note 16 to the consolidated financial statements in Item 8.
(5)	Book value per common share equals common shareholders’ equity of $62,701 million at December 31, 2013, $60,601 million at December 31, 2012, $60,541 million at December 31, 2011, $47,614 million at December 31, 2010 and $37,091 million at December 31, 2009, divided by common shares outstanding of 1,945 million at December 31, 2013, 1,974 million at December 31, 2012, 1,927 million at December 31, 2011, 1,512 million at December 31, 2010 and 1,361 million at December 31, 2009.
(6)	The calculation of return on average common equity uses net income applicable to Morgan Stanley less preferred dividends as a percentage of average common equity. The return on average common equity is a non-generally accepted accounting principle financial measure that the Company considers to be a useful measure to the Company and investors to assess operating performance.
 

 	51	 	LOGO
Table of Contents
Item 7.	Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations.
 

Introduction.

 

Morgan Stanley, a financial holding company, is a global financial services firm that maintains significant market positions in each of its business segments—Institutional Securities, Wealth Management and Investment Management. The Company, through its subsidiaries and affiliates, provides a wide variety of products and services to a large and diversified group of clients and customers, including corporations, governments, financial institutions and individuals. Unless the context otherwise requires, the terms “Morgan Stanley” or the “Company” mean Morgan Stanley (the “Parent”) together with its consolidated subsidiaries.

 

Effective with the quarter ended June 30, 2013, the Global Wealth Management Group and Asset Management business segments were re-titled Wealth Management and Investment Management, respectively.

 

A summary of the activities of each of the Company’s business segments is as follows:

 

Institutional Securities provides financial advisory and capital-raising services, including: advice on mergers and acquisitions, restructurings, real estate and project finance; corporate lending; sales, trading, financing and market-making activities in equity and fixed income securities and related products, including foreign exchange and commodities; and investment activities.

 

Wealth Management provides brokerage and investment advisory services to individual investors and small-to-medium sized businesses and institutions covering various investment alternatives; financial and wealth planning services; annuity and other insurance products; credit and other lending products; cash management services; retirement services; and engages in fixed income trading, which primarily facilitates clients’ trading or investments in such securities.

 

Investment Management provides a broad array of investment strategies that span the risk/return spectrum across geographies, asset classes, and public and private markets to a diverse group of clients across the institutional and intermediary channels as well as high net worth clients.

 

See Note 1 to the consolidated financial statements in Item 8 for a discussion of the Company’s discontinued operations.

 

The results of operations in the past have been, and in the future may continue to be, materially affected by many factors, including: the effect of economic and political conditions and geopolitical events; the effect of market conditions, particularly in the global equity, fixed income, credit and commodities markets, including corporate and mortgage (commercial and residential) lending and commercial real estate markets; the impact of current, pending and future legislation (including the Dodd-Frank Wall Street Reform and Consumer Protection Act (the “Dodd-Frank Act”)), regulation (including capital, leverage and liquidity requirements), policies (including fiscal and monetary) and legal and regulatory actions in the United States of America (“U.S.”) and worldwide; the level and volatility of equity, fixed income, and commodity prices, interest rates, currency values and other market indices; the availability and cost of both credit and capital as well as the credit ratings assigned to the Company’s unsecured short-term and long-term debt; investor, consumer and business sentiment and confidence in the financial markets; the performance of the Company’s acquisitions, divestitures, joint ventures, strategic alliances or other strategic arrangements; the Company’s reputation; inflation, natural disasters and acts of war or terrorism; the actions and initiatives of current and potential competitors as well as governments, regulators and self-regulatory organizations; the effectiveness of the Company’s risk management policies; technological changes and risks, including cybersecurity risks; or a combination of these or other factors. In addition, legislative, legal and regulatory developments related to the Company’s businesses are likely to increase costs, thereby affecting results of operations. These factors also may have an adverse impact on the Company’s ability to achieve its strategic objectives. For a further discussion of these and other important factors that could affect the Company’s business, see “Business—Competition” and “Business—Supervision and Regulation” in Part I, Item 1, “Risk Factors” in Part I, Item 1A and “Other Matters” herein.

 

52

LOGO

Table of Contents
The discussion of the Company’s results of operations below may contain forward-looking statements. These statements, which reflect management’s beliefs and expectations, are subject to risks and uncertainties that may cause actual results to differ materially. For a discussion of the risks and uncertainties that may affect the Company’s future results, see “Forward-Looking Statements” immediately preceding “Business—Competition” and “Business—Supervision and Regulation” in Part I, Item 1, “Risk Factors” in Part I, Item 1A and “Executive Summary—Significant Items” and “Other Matters” herein.

 

 	53	 	LOGO
Table of Contents
Executive Summary.

 

Financial Information and Statistical Data (dollars in millions, except where noted and per share amounts).

 

 	  	2013	 	 	2012	 	 	2011	 
Net revenues:

  				 				 			
Institutional Securities(1)

  	$	15,443	 	 	$	11,025	 	 	$	17,683	 
Wealth Management(1)

  	 	14,214	 	 	 	13,034	 	 	 	12,772	 
Investment Management

  	 	2,988	 	 	 	2,219	 	 	 	1,887	 
Intersegment Eliminations

  	 	(228	) 	 	 	(176	) 	 	 	(115	) 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Consolidated net revenues

  	$	32,417	 	 	$	26,102	 	 	$	32,227	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Net income

  	$	3,613	 	 	$	716	 	 	$	4,645	 
Net income applicable to redeemable noncontrolling interests(2)

  	 	222	 	 	 	124	 	 	 	—  	 
Net income applicable to nonredeemable noncontrolling interests(2)

  	 	459	 	 	 	524	 	 	 	535	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Net income applicable to Morgan Stanley

  	$	2,932	 	 	$	68	 	 	$	4,110	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Income (loss) from continuing operations applicable to Morgan Stanley:

  				 				 			
Institutional Securities(1)

  	$	984	 	 	$	(797	) 	 	$	3,450	 
Wealth Management(1)

  	 	1,488	 	 	 	803	 	 	 	683	 
Investment Management

  	 	503	 	 	 	136	 	 	 	35	 
Intersegment Eliminations

  	 	—  	 	 	 	(4	) 	 	 	—  	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Income from continuing operations applicable to Morgan Stanley

  	$	2,975	 	 	$	138	 	 	$	4,168	 
Net gain (loss) from discontinued operations applicable to Morgan Stanley(3)

  	 	(43	) 	 	 	(70	) 	 	 	(58	) 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Net income applicable to Morgan Stanley

  	$	2,932	 	 	$	68	 	 	$	4,110	 
Preferred stock dividends

  	 	277	 	 	 	98	 	 	 	2,043	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Earnings (loss) applicable to Morgan Stanley common shareholders

  	$	2,655	 	 	$	(30	) 	 	$	2,067	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Earnings (loss) per basic common share:

  				 				 			
Income from continuing operations

  	$	1.42	 	 	$	0.02	 	 	$	1.28	 
Net gain (loss) from discontinued operations(3)

  	 	(0.03	)	 	 	(0.04	)	 	 	(0.03	)
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Earnings (loss) per basic common share(4)

  	$	1.39	 	 	$	(0.02	)	 	$	1.25	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Earnings (loss) per diluted common share:

  				 				 			
Income from continuing operations

  	$	1.38	 	 	$	0.02	 	 	$	1.27	 
Net gain (loss) from discontinued operations(3)

  	 	(0.02	)	 	 	(0.04	)	 	 	(0.04	)
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Earnings (loss) per diluted common share(4)

  	$	1.36	 	 	$	(0.02	)	 	$	1.23	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Regional net revenues(5):

  				 				 			
Americas

  	$	23,282	 	 	$	20,200	 	 	$	22,306	 
Europe, Middle East and Africa

  	 	4,542	 	 	 	3,078	 	 	 	6,619	 
Asia

  	 	4,593	 	 	 	2,824	 	 	 	3,302	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Net revenues

  	$	32,417	 	 	$	26,102	 	 	$	32,227	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
 

54

LOGO

Table of Contents
Financial Information and Statistical Data (dollars in millions, except where noted and per share amounts)—(Continued).

 

 	  	2013	 	 	2012	 	 	2011	 
Average common equity (dollars in billions):

  				 				 			
Institutional Securities

  	$	37.9	 	 	$	29.0	 	 	$	32.7	 
Wealth Management

  	 	13.2	 	 	 	13.3	 	 	 	13.2	 
Investment Management

  	 	2.8	 	 	 	2.4	 	 	 	2.6	 
Parent capital

  	 	8.0	  	 	 	16.1	 	 	 	5.9	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Consolidated average common equity

  	$	61.9	 	 	$	60.8	 	 	$	54.4	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Return on average common equity(6):

  				 				 			
Institutional Securities

  	 	2.3	% 	 	 	N/M	  	 	 	5.1	% 
Wealth Management

  	 	10.0	% 	 	 	6.0	% 	 	 	3.4	% 
Investment Management

  	 	17.6	% 	 	 	5.4	% 	 	 	N/M	  
Consolidated

  	 	4.4	% 	 	 	0.1	% 	 	 	4.0	% 
Book value per common share(7)

  	$	32.24	 	 	$	30.70	 	 	$	31.42	 
Average tangible common equity (dollars in billions)(8)

  	$	53.0	 	 	$	53.9	 	 	$	47.5	 
Return on average tangible common equity(9)

  	 	5.1	% 	 	 	0.1	% 	 	 	4.5	% 
Tangible book value per common share(10)

  	$	27.16	 	 	$	26.86	 	 	$	27.95	 
Effective income tax rate from continuing operations(11)

  	 	18.4	% 	 	 	(45.6	)% 	 	 	23.1	% 
Worldwide employees at December 31, 2013, 2012 and 2011

  	 	55,794	 	 	 	57,061	 	 	 	61,546	 
Global Liquidity Reserve held by bank and non-bank legal entities at December 31, 2013, 2012 and 2011 (dollars in billions)(12)

  	$	202	 	 	$	182	 	 	$	182	 
Average Global Liquidity Reserve (dollars in billions)(12):

  				 				 			
Bank legal entities

  	$	75	 	 	$	63	 	 	$	64	 
Non-bank legal entities

  	 	117	 	 	 	113	 	 	 	113	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Total average Global Liquidity Reserve

  	$	192	 	 	$	176	 	 	$	177	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Long-term borrowings at December 31, 2013, 2012 and 2011

  	$	153,575	 	 	$	169,571	 	 	$	184,234	 
Maturities of long-term borrowings outstanding at December 31, 2013, 2012 and 2011 (next 12 months)

  	$	24,193	 	 	$	25,303	 	 	$	35,082	 
Capital ratios at December 31, 2013, 2012 and 2011:

  				 				 			
Total capital ratio(13)

  	 	16.9	% 	 	 	18.5	% 	 	 	17.5	% 
Tier 1 common capital ratio(13)

  	 	12.8	% 	 	 	14.6	% 	 	 	12.6	% 
Tier 1 capital ratio(13)

  	 	15.7	% 	 	 	17.7	% 	 	 	16.2	% 
Tier 1 leverage ratio(14)

  	 	7.6	% 	 	 	7.1	% 	 	 	6.6	% 
Consolidated assets under management or supervision at December 31, 2013, 2012 and 2011 (dollars in billions)(15):

  				 				 			
Investment Management(16)

  	$	373	 	 	$	338	 	 	$	287	 
Wealth Management(1)(17)

  	 	692	 	 	 	551	 	 	 	472	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Total

  	$	1,065	 	 	$	889	 	 	$	759	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
 

 	55	 	LOGO
Table of Contents
Financial Information and Statistical Data (dollars in millions, except where noted and per share amounts)—(Continued).

 

 	  	2013	 	 	2012	 	 	2011	 
Institutional Securities(1):

  				 				 			
Pre-tax profit margin(18)

  	 	6	% 	 	 	N/M	  	 	 	26	% 
Wealth Management(1)(17):

  				 				 			
Wealth Management representatives at December 31, 2013, 2012 and 2011(19)

  	 	16,456	 	 	 	16,352	 	 	 	17,033	 
Annual revenues per representative (dollars in thousands)(20)

  	$	867	 	 	$	786	 	 	$	731	 
Assets by client segment at December 31, 2013, 2012 and 2011 (dollars in billions):

  				 				 			
$10 million or more

  	$	678	 	 	$	538	 	 	$	468	 
$1 million to $10 million

  	 	776	 	 	 	699	 	 	 	682	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Subtotal $1 million or more

  	 	1,454	 	 	 	1,237	 	 	 	1,150	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
$100,000 to $1 million

  	 	414	 	 	 	414	 	 	 	375	 
Less than $100,000

  	 	41	 	 	 	45	 	 	 	41	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Total client assets

  	$	1,909	 	 	$	1,696	 	 	$	1,566	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Fee-based client assets as a percentage of total client assets(21)

  	 	37	% 	 	 	33	% 	 	 	30	% 
Client assets per representative(22)

  	$	116	 	 	$	104	 	 	$	92	 
Fee-based client asset flows (dollars in billions)(23)

  	$	51.9	 	 	$	26.9	 	 	$	47.0	 
Bank deposits at December 31, 2013, 2012 and 2011 (dollars in billions)(24)

  	$	134	 	 	$	131	 	 	$	111	 
Retail locations at December 31, 2013, 2012 and 2011

  	 	649	 	 	 	694	 	 	 	734	 
Pre-tax profit margin(18)

  	 	18	% 	 	 	12	% 	 	 	10	% 
Investment Management:

  				 				 			
Pre-tax profit margin(18)

  	 	33	% 	 	 	27	% 	 	 	13	% 
Selected management financial measures, excluding DVA:

  				 				 			
Net revenues, excluding DVA(25)

  	$	33,098	 	 	$	30,504	 	 	$	28,546	 
Income from continuing operations applicable to Morgan Stanley, excluding DVA(25)

  	$	3,427	 	 	$	3,256	 	 	$	1,893	 
Income per diluted common share from continuing operations, excluding DVA(25)

  	$	1.61	 	 	$	1.64	 	 	$	(0.08	)
Return on average common equity, excluding DVA(6)

  	 	5.0	% 	 	 	5.2	% 	 	 	N/M	  
Return on average tangible common equity, excluding DVA(9)

  	 	5.8	% 	 	 	5.9	% 	 	 	N/M	  
 

N/M—Not Meaningful.

DVA—Debt Valuation Adjustment represents the change in the fair value of certain of the Company’s long-term and short-term borrowings resulting from the fluctuation in the Company’s credit spreads and other credit factors.

(1)	On January 1, 2013, the International Wealth Management business was transferred from the Wealth Management business segment to the Equity division within the Institutional Securities business segment. Accordingly, all results and statistical data have been recast for all periods to reflect the International Wealth Management business as part of the Institutional Securities business segment.
(2)	See Notes 2, 3 and 15 to the consolidated financial statements in Item 8 for information on redeemable and nonredeemable noncontrolling interests.
(3)	See Note 1 to the consolidated financial statements in Item 8 for information on discontinued operations.
(4)	For the calculation of basic and diluted earnings per share (“EPS”), see Note 16 to the consolidated financial statements in Item 8.
(5)	Regional net revenues reflect the regional view of the Company’s consolidated net revenues, on a managed basis. For further discussion regarding the geographic methodology for net revenues, see Note 21 to the consolidated financial statements in Item 8.
(6)	
The calculation of each business segment’s return on average common equity uses income from continuing operations applicable to Morgan Stanley less preferred dividends as a percentage of each business segment’s average common equity. The return on average common equity is a non-generally accepted accounting principle (“non-GAAP”) financial measure that the Company considers to be a useful measure to the Company and investors to assess operating performance. The computation of average common equity for each business segment is determined using the Company’s Required Capital framework (“Required Capital Framework”), an internal capital adequacy measure (see “Liquidity and Capital Resources—Regulatory Requirements—Required Capital” herein). The effective tax rates used in the computation of business segments’ return on average common equity were determined on a separate legal entity basis. To

 

56

LOGO

Table of Contents
 	
determine the return on consolidated average common equity, excluding the impact of DVA, also a non-GAAP financial measure, both the numerator and the denominator were adjusted to exclude the impact of DVA. The impact of DVA in 2013, 2012 and 2011 was (0.6)%, (5.1)% and 4.2%, respectively.

(7)	Book value per common share equals common shareholders’ equity of $62,701 million at December 31, 2013, $60,601 million at December 31, 2012 and $60,541 million at December 31, 2011 divided by common shares outstanding of 1,945 million at December 31, 2013, 1,974 million at December 31, 2012 and 1,927 million at December 31, 2011. Book value per common share in 2011 was reduced by approximately $2.61 per share as a result of the Mitsubishi UFJ Financial Group, Inc. (“MUFG”) stock conversion (see “Significant Items—MUFG Stock Conversion” herein).
(8)	Average tangible common equity is a non-GAAP financial measure that the Company considers to be a useful measure that the Company and investors use to assess capital adequacy. For a discussion of tangible common equity, see “Liquidity and Capital Resources—Capital Management” herein.
(9)	Return on average tangible common equity is a non-GAAP financial measure that the Company considers to be a useful measure that the Company and investors use to assess capital adequacy. The calculation of return on average tangible common equity uses income from continuing operations applicable to Morgan Stanley less preferred dividends as a percentage of average tangible common equity. To determine the return on average tangible common equity, excluding the impact of DVA, also a non-GAAP financial measure, both the numerator and the denominator were adjusted to exclude the impact of DVA. The impact of DVA in 2013, 2012 and 2011 was (0.7)%, (5.8)% and 4.8%, respectively.
(10)	Tangible book value per common share equals tangible common equity of $52,828 million at December 31, 2013, $53,014 million at December 31, 2012 and $53,850 million at December 31, 2011 divided by common shares outstanding of 1,945 million at December 31, 2013, 1,974 million at December 31, 2012 and 1,927 million at December 31, 2011. Tangible book value per common share is a non-GAAP financial measure that the Company considers to be a useful measure that the Company and investors use to assess capital adequacy.
(11)	For a discussion of the effective income tax rate, see “Overview of 2013 Financial Results” and “Significant Items—Income Tax Items” herein.
(12)	For a discussion of Global Liquidity Reserve, see “Liquidity and Capital Resources—Liquidity Risk Management Framework—Global Liquidity Reserve” herein.
(13)	As of December 31, 2013, the Company calculated its Total, Tier 1 and Tier 1 common capital ratios and risk-weighted assets (“RWAs”) in accordance with the capital adequacy standards for financial holding companies adopted by the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System (the “Federal Reserve”). These standards are based upon a framework described in the International Convergence of Capital Measurement and Capital Standards, July 1988, as amended, also referred to as Basel I. On January 1, 2013, the U.S. banking regulators’ rules to implement the Basel Committee on Banking Supervision’s market risk capital framework amendment, commonly referred to as “Basel 2.5”, became effective, which increased the capital requirements for securitizations and correlation trading within the Company’s trading book, as well as incorporated add-ons for stressed Value-at-Risk (“VaR”) and incremental risk requirements (“market risk capital framework amendment”). The Company’s Total, Tier 1 and Tier 1 common capital ratios and RWAs for 2013 were calculated under this revised framework. The Company’s Total, Tier 1 and Tier 1 common capital ratios and RWAs for prior periods have not been recalculated under this revised framework. For a discussion of Total, Tier 1 and Tier 1 common capital ratios, see “Liquidity and Capital Resources—Regulatory Requirements” herein.
(14)	For a discussion of Tier 1 leverage ratio, see “Liquidity and Capital Resources—Regulatory Requirements” herein.
(15)	Revenues and expenses associated with these assets are included in the Company’s Wealth Management and Investment Management business segments.
(16)	Amounts exclude the Investment Management business segment’s proportionate share of assets managed by entities in which it owns a minority stake.
(17)	Prior-period amounts have been recast to exclude Quilter & Co. Ltd. (“Quilter”). See Note 1 to the consolidated financial statements in Item 8 for information on discontinued operations.
(18)	Pre-tax profit margin is a non-GAAP financial measure that the Company considers to be a useful measure that the Company and investors use to assess operating performance. Percentages represent income from continuing operations before income taxes as a percentage of net revenues.
(19)	At December 31, 2013, 2012 and 2011, global representatives for the Company were 16,784, 16,780 and 17,512, which include approximately 328, 428 and 479 representatives associated with the International Wealth Management business, the results of which are reported in the Institutional Securities business segment, respectively.
(20)	Annual revenues per representative in 2013, 2012 and 2011 equal Wealth Management business segment’s annual revenues divided by the average representative headcount in 2013, 2012 and 2011, respectively.
(21)	Fee-based client assets represent the amount of assets in client accounts where the basis of payment for services is a fee calculated on those assets. Effective in 2013, client assets also include certain additional non-custodied assets as a result of the completion of the purchase of the remaining interest in the retail securities joint venture between the Company and Citigroup Inc. (“Citi”) (the “Wealth Management JV”) platform conversion.
(22)	Client assets per representative equal total period-end client assets divided by period-end representative headcount.
(23)	Beginning January 1, 2013, the Company enhanced its definition of fee-based asset flows. Fee-based asset flows have been recast for all periods to include dividends, interest and client fees and to exclude cash management related activity.
(24)	
Approximately $104 billion, $72 billion and $56 billion of the bank deposit balances at December 31, 2013, 2012 and 2011, respectively, are held at Company-affiliated depositories with the remainder held at Citi affiliated depositories. The Company considers the remaining deposits held with Citi affiliated depositories a non-GAAP measure, which the Company and investors use to assess deposits in the

 

 	57	 	LOGO
Table of Contents
 	
Wealth Management business segment. The deposit balances are held at certain of the Company’s Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation (the “FDIC”) insured depository institutions for the benefit of the Company’s clients through their accounts. For additional information regarding deposits, see Notes 3, 10 and 25 to the consolidated financial statements in Item 8 and “Liquidity and Capital Resources—Funding Management—Deposits” herein.

(25)	From time to time, the Company may disclose certain “non-GAAP financial measures” in the course of its earnings releases, earnings conference calls, financial presentations and otherwise. For these purposes, “GAAP” refers to generally accepted accounting principles in the U.S. The U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission defines a “non-GAAP financial measure” as a numerical measure of historical or future financial performance, financial positions, or cash flows that excludes or includes amounts or is subject to adjustments that effectively exclude, or include, amounts from the most directly comparable measure calculated and presented in accordance with GAAP. Non-GAAP financial measures disclosed by the Company are provided as additional information to investors in order to provide them with further transparency about, or an alternative method for assessing, our financial condition and operating results. These measures are not in accordance with, or a substitute for, GAAP, and may be different from or inconsistent with non-GAAP financial measures used by other companies. Whenever the Company refers to a non-GAAP financial measure, the Company will also generally present the most directly comparable financial measure calculated and presented in accordance with GAAP, along with a reconciliation of the differences between the non-GAAP financial measure and the GAAP financial measure.
 

 	  	2013	 	 	2012	 	 	2011	 
Reconciliation of Selected Management Financial Measures from a Non-GAAP to a GAAP Basis (dollars in millions, except per share amounts):

  				 				 			
Net revenues

  				 				 			
Net revenues—non-GAAP

  	$	33,098	 	 	$	30,504	 	 	$	28,546	 
Impact of DVA

  	 	(681	) 	 	 	(4,402	) 	 	 	3,681	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Net revenues—GAAP

  	$	32,417	 	 	$	26,102	 	 	$	32,227	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Income (loss) from continuing operations applicable to Morgan Stanley

  				 				 			
Income applicable to Morgan Stanley—non-GAAP

  	$	3,427	 	 	$	3,256	 	 	$	1,893	 
Impact of DVA

  	 	(452	) 	 	 	(3,118	) 	 	 	2,275	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Income applicable to Morgan Stanley—GAAP

  	$	2,975	 	 	$	138	 	 	$	4,168	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Earnings (loss) per diluted common share

  				 				 			
Income from continuing operations per diluted common share—non-GAAP

  	$	1.61	 	 	$	1.64	 	 	$	(0.08	)
Impact of DVA

  	 	(0.23	) 	 	 	(1.62	) 	 	 	1.35	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Income from continuing operations per diluted common share—GAAP

  	$	1.38	 	 	$	0.02	 	 	$	1.27	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Average diluted shares—non-GAAP (in millions)

  	 	1,957	 	 	 	1,919	 	 	 	1,655	 
Impact of DVA (in millions)

  	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	20	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Average diluted shares—GAAP (in millions)

  	 	1,957	 	 	 	1,919	 	 	 	1,675	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
 

58

LOGO

Table of Contents
Global Market and Economic Conditions.

 

During 2013, global market and economic conditions showed improvement from 2012, though significant uncertainty remained. Investor sentiment was boosted by encouraging signs of improvement in the global economy during the second half of 2013. The U.S. economy continued its moderate growth pace, but while as a whole the recession in the euro-area came to an end, significant pockets of slow or negative growth remained in Europe. During 2013, global market and economic conditions were also challenged by investor concerns about the U.S. longer-term budget outlook and the scaling back of monetary stimulus, the remaining European sovereign debt issues and slowing economic growth in emerging markets. Shorter-term concerns over the U.S. budget standoff were resolved in late 2013 as Congress came to a tentative agreement on federal government funding for the next two fiscal years. The agreement was in response to a shut-down of the U.S. federal government that lasted for 16 days during October 2013. Elsewhere, especially in parts of Europe, growth remains stymied by fiscal and longer-term structural issues in the economy.

 

In the U.S., major equity market indices ended the year significantly higher compared with year-end 2012. The U.S. economy continued its moderate growth pace in 2013. Labor market conditions improved as the unemployment rate declined to 6.7% at December 31, 2013 from 7.9% at December 31, 2012. Consumer spending and business investment advanced during 2013. The housing market generally strengthened in 2013, although rising mortgage rates have resulted in recent softness in housing starts and home sales. Apart from fluctuations due to changes in energy prices, inflation has been running below the Federal Reserve’s longer-run objective, but longer-term inflation expectations have remained stable. The Federal Open Market Committee (“FOMC”) of the Federal Reserve kept key interest rates at historically low levels. At December 31, 2013, the federal funds target rate remained between 0.0% and 0.25%, and the discount rate remained at 0.75%. Earlier in 2013 concerns about the Federal Reserve’s plan to scale back its monetary stimulus plan caused investors to sell off holdings. Subsequently, the FOMC announced in December that it would be decreasing its purchases of Treasury and mortgage-backed securities in January 2014. The continuing U.S. recovery, though tepid, is also relieving some of the pressure on the federal budget experienced during the past several years.

 

In Europe, major equity market indices finished 2013 higher compared with year-end 2012. Euro-area gross domestic product started to grow in the second quarter of 2013, and the European Central Bank (“ECB”) views this as a gradual recovery in economic conditions, albeit with significant downside risks. The euro-area unemployment rate increased to 12.0% at December 31, 2013 from 11.9% at 2012 year-end. At December 31, 2013, Bank of England’s benchmark interest rate was 0.5%, which was unchanged from December 31, 2012. To stimulate economic activity in Europe, during 2013 the ECB lowered the benchmark interest rate from 0.75% to 0.25% and indicated it will keep open its special liquidity facilities until at least the middle of 2014.

 

Major equity market indices in Asia ended the year higher, with the notable exception of the Shanghai Stock Exchange Composite Index in China. Japan’s economic activity grew moderately during 2013, primarily resulting from a series of economic stimulus packages announced by the Japanese government and the Bank of Japan (“BOJ”) in early 2013. The BOJ maintained its monetary stimulus plan during the remainder of 2013. The pace of China’s economic growth slowed during 2013, though China’s overall growth was still strong compared with the U.S., Europe and Japan. During 2013, the Chinese government began to implement reforms to restructure its economy away from reliance on exports and investments and toward more sustainable growth driven by domestic consumption.

 

Overview of 2013 Financial Results.

 

Consolidated Results.    The Company recorded net income applicable to Morgan Stanley of $2,932 million on net revenues of $32,417 million in 2013 compared with net income applicable to Morgan Stanley of $68 million on net revenues of $26,102 million in 2012.

 

Net revenues in 2013 included negative revenues due to the impact of DVA of $681 million compared with negative revenues of $4,402 million in 2012. Non-interest expenses increased 9% to $27,935 million in 2013 compared with $25,582 million in 2012. Compensation expenses increased 4% to $16,277 million in 2013

 

 	59	 	LOGO
Table of Contents
compared with $15,615 million in 2012. Non-compensation expenses increased 17% to $11,658 million in 2013 compared with $9,967 million in 2012. The increase in non-compensation expenses primarily reflected higher legal expenses.

 

Earnings (loss) per diluted common share (“diluted EPS”) and diluted EPS from continuing operations were $1.36 and $1.38, respectively, in 2013 compared with $(0.02) and $0.02, respectively, in 2012. The diluted EPS calculation for 2013 included a negative adjustment of approximately $151 million related to the purchase of the remaining interest in the Wealth Management JV, which was completed in June 2013.

 

Excluding the impact of DVA, net revenues were $33,098 million, and diluted EPS from continuing operations was $1.61 per share in 2013 compared with $30,504 million and $1.64 per share, respectively, in 2012.

 

The Company’s effective tax rate from continuing operations was 18.4% for 2013. The effective tax rate included an aggregate discrete net tax benefit of $407 million. Excluding this aggregate discrete net tax benefit, the effective tax rate from continuing operations in 2013 would have been 27.5%.

 

Institutional Securities.    Income from continuing operations before taxes was $869 million in 2013 compared with a loss from continuing operations before taxes of $1,688 million in 2012. Net revenues for 2013 were $15,443 million compared with $11,025 million in 2012. The results in 2013 included negative revenues due to the impact of DVA of $681 million compared with negative revenues of $4,402 million in 2012. Investment banking revenues for 2013 increased 11% from 2012 to $4,377 million, reflecting higher revenues from equity and fixed income underwriting transactions, partially offset by lower advisory revenues. The following sales and trading net revenues results exclude the impact of DVA. Sales and trading net revenues are composed of: trading revenues; commissions and fees; asset management, distribution and administration fees; and net interest revenues (expenses). The presentation of net revenues excluding the impact of DVA is a non-GAAP financial measure that the Company considers useful for the Company and investors to allow further comparability of period-to-period operating performance. Equity sales and trading net revenues, excluding the impact of DVA, of $6,607 million increased 11% from 2012, reflecting strong performance across most products and regions from higher client activity, with particular strength in prime brokerage. Excluding the impact of DVA, fixed income and commodities sales and trading net revenues were $4,197 million in 2013, a decrease of 25% from 2012, reflecting lower levels of client activity across most products. Net investment gains of $707 million were recognized in 2013, compared with net investment gains of $219 million in 2012, primarily reflecting a gain on the disposition of an investment in an insurance broker. Other revenues of $608 million were recognized in 2013 compared with other revenues of $203 million in 2012. Other revenues included income arising from the Company’s 40% stake in Mitsubishi UFJ Morgan Stanley Securities Co., Ltd. (“MUMSS”) (see “Executive Summary—Significant Items—Japanese Securities Joint Venture” herein). Non-interest expenses increased 15% in 2013 to $14,574 million, primarily due to higher non-compensation expenses. Compensation and benefits expenses in 2013 decreased 2% from 2012 to $6,823 million, primarily due to lower headcount. Non-compensation expenses were $7,751 million in 2013 compared with $5,735 million in 2012, reflecting the increased level of legal expenses.

 

Wealth Management.    Income from continuing operations before taxes was $2,629 million in 2013 compared with $1,622 million in 2012. Net revenues were $14,214 million in 2013 compared with $13,034 million in 2012. Transactional revenues, consisting of Trading, Commissions and fees and Investment banking increased 8% from 2012 to $4,293 million. Trading revenues increased 11% from 2012 to $1,161 million in 2013, primarily due to gains related to investments associated with certain employee deferred compensation plans and higher revenues from fixed income products. Commissions and fees revenues increased 6% from 2012 to $2,209 million in 2013, primarily due to higher equity, mutual fund and alternatives activity. Investment banking revenues increased 11% from 2012 to $923 million in 2013, primarily due to higher levels of underwriting activity in closed-end funds and unit trusts. Asset management, distribution and administration fees increased 6% from 2012 to $7,638 million in 2013, primarily due to higher fee-based revenues, partially offset by lower revenues from referral fees from the bank deposit program. Net interest increased 20% from 2012 to $1,880 million in 2013, primarily due to

 

60

LOGO

Table of Contents
higher balances in the bank deposit program and growth in loans and lending commitments in Portfolio Loan Account (“PLA”) securities-based lending products. In addition, interest expense declined in 2013 due to the Company’s redemption of all Class A Preferred Interests owned by Citi and its affiliates, in connection with the Company’s acquisition of 100% ownership of the Wealth Management JV effective at the end of the second quarter of 2013. Total client asset balances were $1,909 billion at December 31, 2013 and client assets in fee-based accounts were $697 billion, or 37% of total client assets. Fee-based client asset flows for 2013 were $51.9 billion compared with $26.9 billion in 2012. Prior period amounts have been recast to reflect the transfer of the International Wealth Management business from the Wealth Management business segment to the Institutional Securities business segment and for the Company’s enhanced definition of fee-based asset flows (see “Business Segments” herein). Compensation and benefits expenses increased 6% from 2012 to $8,271 million in 2013, primarily due to higher compensable revenues. Non-compensation expenses decreased 8% from 2012 to $3,314 million in 2013, primarily driven by the absence of platform integration costs and non-recurring technology write-offs, partially offset by an impairment expense of $36 million related to certain intangible assets (management contracts) associated with alternative investment funds in 2013.

 

Investment Management.    Income from continuing operations before taxes was $984 million in 2013 compared with $590 million in 2012. Net revenues were $2,988 million in 2013 compared with $2,219 million in 2012. The increase in net revenues reflected higher net investment gains predominantly within the Company’s Merchant Banking and Real Estate Investing businesses and higher gains on certain investments associated with the Company’s employee deferred compensation and co-investment plans. Results in 2013 also included an additional allocation of fund income to the Company as general partner, upon exceeding cumulative fund performance thresholds (“carried interest”). Non-interest expenses were $2,004 million in 2013 compared with $1,629 million in 2012. Compensation and benefits expenses increased 41% to $1,183 million in 2013, primarily due to higher net revenues. Non-compensation expenses increased 4% to $821 million in 2013, primarily due to higher brokerage and clearing and professional services expenses, partially offset by lower information processing expenses.

 

Significant Items.

 

Litigation.    The Company incurred litigation expenses of approximately $1,952 million in 2013, $513 million in 2012 and $151 million in 2011. The litigation expenses incurred in 2013 were primarily due to settlements and reserve additions related to residential mortgage-backed securities and credit crisis-related matters (see “Contingencies—Legal” in Note 13 to the consolidated financial statements in Item 8). Litigation expenses are included in Other expenses in the consolidated statements of income. The Company expects future litigation expenses in general to continue to be elevated, and the changes in expenses from period to period may fluctuate significantly, given the current environment regarding financial crisis-related government investigations and private litigation affecting global financial services firms, including the Company.

 

Investment Gains.    The Company’s Investments revenues increased to $1,777 million in 2013 compared with $742 million in 2012. Of this increase, $543 million related to higher net investment gains and to a lesser extent the benefit of carried interest within the Company’s Merchant Banking and Real Estate Investing businesses in the Investment Management business segment. In addition, the increase includes a gain on the disposition of an investment in an insurance broker in 2013 in the Institutional Securities business segment.

 

Japanese Securities Joint Venture.    During 2013, 2012 and 2011, the Company recorded income (loss) of $570 million, $152 million and $(783) million, respectively, within Other revenues in the consolidated statements of income, arising from the Company’s 40% stake in MUMSS. Net income applicable to nonredeemable noncontrolling interests associated with MUFG’s interest in Morgan Stanley MUFG Securities Co., Ltd. (“MSMS”) was $259 million, $163 million and $1 million for 2013, 2012 and 2011, respectively (see Note 22 to the consolidated financial statements in Item 8).

 

In June 2013, MUMSS paid a dividend of approximately $287 million, of which the Company received approximately $115 million for its proportionate share of MUMSS.

 

 	61	 	LOGO
Table of Contents
Income Tax Items.    In 2013, the Company recognized an aggregate discrete net tax benefit of $407 million. This included discrete tax benefits of: $161 million related to the remeasurement of reserves and related interest associated with new information regarding the status of certain tax authority examinations; $92 million related to the establishment of a previously unrecognized deferred tax asset from a legal entity reorganization; $73 million that is attributable to tax planning strategies to optimize foreign tax credit utilization as a result of the anticipated repatriation of earnings from certain non-U.S. subsidiaries; and $81 million due to the retroactive effective date of the American Taxpayer Relief Act of 2012 (the “Relief Act”). The Relief Act that was enacted on January 2, 2013, among other things, extended with retroactive effect to January 1, 2012 a provision of U.S. tax law that defers the imposition of tax on certain active financial services income of certain foreign subsidiaries earned outside the U.S. until such income is repatriated to the U.S. as a dividend.

 

In 2012, the Company recognized an aggregate net tax benefit of $142 million. This included a discrete tax benefit of $299 million related to the remeasurement of reserves and related interest associated with either the expiration of the applicable statute of limitations or new information regarding the status of certain Internal Revenue Service examinations and an aggregate out-of-period net tax provision of $157 million, to adjust the overstatement of deferred tax assets associated with partnership investments, principally in the Company’s Investment Management business segment and repatriated earnings of foreign subsidiaries recorded in prior years. The Company has evaluated the effects of the understatement of the income tax provision both qualitatively and quantitatively and concluded that it did not have a material impact on any prior annual or quarterly consolidated financial statements.

 

Corporate Lending.    The Company recorded the following amounts primarily associated with loans and lending commitments within the Institutional Securities business segment (see “Business Segments—Institutional Securities” herein):

 

 	  	2013	 	 	2012	 	 	2011	 
 	  	(dollars in millions)	 
Other sales and trading:

  				 				 			
Gains (losses) on loans and lending commitments and Net interest(1)

  	$	596	 	 	$	1,650	 	 	$	(699	) 
Gains (losses) on hedges

  	 	(156	) 	 	 	(910	) 	 	 	68	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Total Other sales and trading revenues

  	$	440	 	 	$	740	 	 	$	(631	) 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Other revenues:

  				 				 			
Provision for loan losses

  	$	(46	) 	 	$	(85	) 	 	$	(6	) 
Losses on loans held for sale

  	 	(68	) 	 	 	(54	) 	 	 	—  	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Total Other revenues

  	$	(114	) 	 	$	(139	) 	 	$	(6	) 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Other expenses: Provision for unfunded commitments

  	 	(45	) 	 	 	(71	) 	 	 	(18	) 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Total

  	$	281	 	 	$	530	 	 	$	(655	) 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
 

(1)	Effective April 2012, the Company began accounting for all new originated loans and lending commitments as either held for investment or held for sale.
 

Wealth Management JV.    The Company completed the purchase of the remaining 35% interest in the Wealth Management JV from Citi on June 28, 2013 for the previously established price of $4.725 billion. The Company recorded a negative adjustment to retained earnings of approximately $151 million (net of tax) in 2013 to reflect the difference between the purchase price for the 35% interest in the joint venture and its carrying value. In 2012, the Company purchased an additional 14% stake in the Wealth Management JV from Citi for $1.89 billion, increasing the Company’s interest from 51% to 65%. The Company recorded a negative adjustment to Paid-in-capital of approximately $107 million (net of tax) to reflect the difference between the purchase price for the 14% interest in the Wealth Management JV and its carrying value. Also in 2012, the Wealth Management business segment’s non-interest expenses included approximately $173 million of non-recurring costs related to the Wealth Management JV integration. For more information, see Note 3 to the consolidated statements in Item 8.

 

62

LOGO

Table of Contents
Available for Sale Securities.    During 2013, 2012 and 2011, the available for sale portfolio held within the Wealth Management business segment reported unrealized gains (losses) of $(433) million, $28 million and $87 million, net of tax, respectively, that were included in Accumulated other comprehensive income. The unrealized losses were primarily due to changes in interest rates. The securities in the Company’s available for sale portfolio with an unrealized loss were not other-than-temporarily impaired at December 31, 2013, 2012 and 2011. For more information, see Notes 2 and 5 to the consolidated financial statements in Item 8.

 

Monoline Insurers.    The results for 2011 included losses of $1,838 million related to the Company’s counterparty credit exposures to Monoline Insurers (“Monolines”), principally MBIA Insurance Corporation (“MBIA”).

 

During 2011, the Company announced a comprehensive settlement with MBIA. The settlement terminated outstanding credit default swap (“CDS”) protection purchased from MBIA on commercial mortgage-backed securities and resolved pending litigation between the two parties for consideration of a net cash payment to the Company.

 

MUFG Stock Conversion.    On June 30, 2011, the Company’s outstanding Series B Preferred Stock owned by MUFG with a face value of $7.8 billion (carrying value $8.1 billion) and a 10% dividend was converted into 385,464,097 shares of the Company’s common stock, including approximately 75 million shares resulting from the adjustment to the conversion ratio pursuant to the transaction agreement. As a result of the adjustment to the conversion ratio, the Company incurred a one-time, non-cash negative adjustment of approximately $1.7 billion in its calculation of basic and diluted earnings per share during 2011.

 

European Peripheral Countries.    On December 22, 2011, the Company entered into agreements to restructure certain derivative transactions that decreased its exposure to obligors in Greece, Ireland, Italy, Portugal and Spain (the “European Peripherals”). As a result, the Company’s results in 2011 included interest rate product revenues of approximately $600 million related primarily to the release of credit valuation adjustments associated with the transactions, reported within Trading revenues in the consolidated statement of income.

 

Huaxin Securities Joint Venture.    In June 2011, the Company and Huaxin Securities Co., Ltd. (also known as China Fortune Securities Co., Ltd.) jointly announced the operational commencement of their securities joint venture in China. During 2011, the Company recorded initial costs of $130 million related to the formation of this joint venture in Other expenses in the consolidated statement of income.

 

Business Segments.

 

Substantially all of the Company’s operating revenues and operating expenses are allocated to its business segments. Certain revenues and expenses have been allocated to each business segment, generally in proportion to its respective net revenues, non-interest expenses or other relevant measures.

 

As a result of treating certain intersegment transactions as transactions with external parties, the Company includes an Intersegment Eliminations category to reconcile the business segment results to the Company’s consolidated results. Intersegment Eliminations also reflect the effect of fees paid by the Institutional Securities business segment to the Wealth Management business segment related to the bank deposit program.

 

On January 1, 2013, the International Wealth Management business was transferred from the Wealth Management business segment to the Equity division within the Institutional Securities business segment. Accordingly, all results and statistical data have been recast for all periods to reflect the International Wealth Management business as part of the Institutional Securities business segment.

 

 	63	 	LOGO
Table of Contents
Net Revenues.

 

Trading.    Trading revenues include revenues from customers’ purchases and sales of financial instruments in which the Company acts as a market maker as well as gains and losses on the Company’s related positions. Trading revenues include the realized gains and losses from sales of cash instruments and derivative settlements, unrealized gains and losses from ongoing fair value changes of the Company’s positions related to market-making activities, and gains and losses related to investments associated with certain employee deferred compensation plans. In many markets, the realized and unrealized gains and losses from the purchase and sale transactions will include any spreads between bids and offers. Certain fees received on loans carried at fair value and dividends from equity securities are also recorded in this line item since they relate to market-making positions. Commissions received for purchasing and selling listed equity securities and options are recorded separately in the Commissions and fees line item. Other cash and derivative instruments typically do not have fees associated with them, and fees for related services would be recorded in Commissions and fees.

 

The Company often invests directly, as a principal, in investments or other financial instruments to economically hedge its obligations under its deferred compensation plans. Changes in value of such investments made by the Company are recorded in Trading revenues and Investments revenues. Expenses associated with the related deferred compensation plans are recorded in Compensation and benefits. Compensation expense is calculated based on the notional value of the award granted, adjusted for upward and downward changes in fair value of the referenced investment and is recognized ratably over the prescribed vesting period for the award. Generally, changes in compensation expense resulting from changes in fair value of the referenced investment will be offset by changes in fair value of investments made by the Company. However, there may be a timing difference between the immediate revenue recognition of gains and losses on the Company’s investments and the deferred recognition of the related compensation expense over the vesting period.

 

As a market maker, the Company stands ready to buy, sell or otherwise transact with customers under a variety of market conditions and provide firm or indicative prices in response to customer requests. The Company’s liquidity obligations can be explicit and obligatory in some cases, and in others, customers expect the Company to be willing to transact with them. In order to most effectively fulfill its market-making function, the Company engages in activities, across all of its trading businesses, that include, but are not limited to: (i) taking positions in anticipation of, and in response to, customer demand to buy or sell and—depending on the liquidity of the relevant market and the size of the position—to hold those positions for a period of time; (ii) managing and assuming basis risk (risk associated with imperfect hedging) between customized customer risks and the standardized products available in the market to hedge those risks; (iii) building, maintaining and rebalancing inventory, through trades with other market participants, and engaging in accumulation activities to accommodate anticipated customer demand; (iv) trading in the market to remain current on pricing and trends; and (v) engaging in other activities to provide efficiency and liquidity for markets. Although not included in Trading revenues, interest income and expense are also impacted by market-making activities as debt securities held by the Company earn interest and securities are loaned, borrowed, sold with agreement to repurchase and purchased with agreement to resell.

 

Investments.    The Company’s investments generally are held for long-term appreciation and generally are subject to significant sales restrictions. Estimates of the fair value of the investments may involve significant judgment and may fluctuate significantly over time in light of business, market, economic and financial conditions generally or in relation to specific transactions. In some cases, such investments are required or are a necessary part of offering other products. The revenues recorded are the result of realized gains and losses from sales and unrealized gains and losses from ongoing fair value changes of the Company’s holdings as well as from investments associated with certain employee deferred compensation plans (as mentioned above). Typically, there are no fee revenues from these investments. The sales restrictions on the investments relate primarily to redemption and withdrawal restrictions on investments in real estate funds, hedge funds and private equity funds, which include investments made in connection with certain employee deferred compensation plans (see Note 4 to the consolidated financial statements in Item 8). Restrictions on interests in exchanges and clearinghouses generally include a requirement to hold those interests for the period of time that the Company is clearing trades

 

64

LOGO

Table of Contents
on that exchange or clearinghouse. Additionally, there are certain investments related to assets held by consolidated real estate funds, which are primarily related to holders of noncontrolling interests.

 

Commissions and Fees.    Commission and fee revenues primarily arise from agency transactions in listed and over-the-counter (“OTC”) equity securities, services related to sales and trading activities, and sales of mutual funds, futures, insurance products and options.

 

Asset Management, Distribution and Administration Fees.    Asset management, distribution and administration fees include fees associated with the management and supervision of assets, account services and administration, performance-based fees relating to certain funds, separately managed accounts, shareholder servicing and the distribution of certain open-ended mutual funds.

 

Asset management, distribution and administration fees in the Wealth Management business segment also include revenues from individual investors electing a fee-based pricing arrangement and fees for investment management. Mutual fund distribution fees in the Wealth Management business segment are based on either the average daily fund net asset balances or average daily aggregate net fund sales and are affected by changes in the overall level and mix of assets under management or supervision.

 

Asset management fees in the Investment Management business segment arise from investment management services the Company provides to investment vehicles pursuant to various contractual arrangements. The Company receives fees primarily based upon mutual fund daily average net assets or based on monthly or quarterly invested equity for other vehicles. Performance-based fees in the Investment Management business segment are earned on certain funds as a percentage of appreciation earned by those funds and, in certain cases, are based upon the achievement of performance criteria. These fees are normally earned annually and are recognized on a monthly or quarterly basis.

 

Net Interest.    Interest income and Interest expense are a function of the level and mix of total assets and liabilities, including trading assets and trading liabilities; securities available for sale; securities borrowed or purchased under agreements to resell; securities loaned or sold under agreements to repurchase; loans; deposits; commercial paper and other short-term borrowings; long-term borrowings; trading strategies; customer activity in the Company’s prime brokerage business; and the prevailing level, term structure and volatility of interest rates. Certain Securities purchased under agreements to resell (“reverse repurchase agreements”) and Securities sold under agreements to repurchase (“repurchase agreements”) and Securities borrowed and Securities loaned transactions may be entered into with different customers using the same underlying securities, thereby generating a spread between the interest revenues on the reverse repurchase agreements or securities borrowed transactions and the interest expense on the repurchase agreements or securities loaned transactions.

 

Lending Activities.

 

The Company provides loans to a variety of customers, from large corporate and institutional clients to high net worth individuals, primarily through its U.S. bank subsidiaries, Morgan Stanley Bank, N.A. (“MSBNA”) and Morgan Stanley Private Bank, National Association (“MSPBNA”). The Company’s lending activities in the Institutional Securities business segment primarily include corporate lending activities, in which the Company provides loans or lending commitments to selected corporate clients. In addition to corporate lending activity, the Institutional Securities business segment engages to a lesser extent in other lending activity, including corporate loans purchased and sold in the secondary market. The Company’s lending activities in the Wealth Management business segment principally include margin loans collateralized by securities, securities-based lending that allows clients to borrow money against the value of qualifying securities in PLAs and residential mortgage lending. The Company’s lending activities have grown during 2013 and 2012 and the Company expects this trend to continue. For a further discussion of the Company’s credit risks, see “Quantitative and Qualitative Disclosures about Market Risk—Risk Management—Credit Risk” in Item 7A. See also Notes 8 and 13 to the consolidated financial statements in Item 8 for additional information about the Company’s financing receivables and lending commitments, respectively.

 

 	65	 	LOGO
Table of Contents
INSTITUTIONAL SECURITIES

 

INCOME STATEMENT INFORMATION

 

 	  	2013	 	 	2012(1)	 	 	2011(1)	 
 	  	(dollars in millions)	 
Revenues:

  				 				 			
Investment banking

  	$	4,377	 	 	$	3,930	 	 	$	4,240	 
Trading

  	 	8,147	 	 	 	6,002	 	 	 	11,425	 
Investments

  	 	707	 	 	 	219	 	 	 	239	 
Commissions and fees

  	 	2,425	 	 	 	2,176	 	 	 	2,849	 
Asset management, distribution and administration fees

  	 	280	 	 	 	242	 	 	 	206	 
Other

  	 	608	 	 	 	203	 	 	 	(236	) 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Total non-interest revenues

  	 	16,544	 	 	 	12,772	 	 	 	18,723	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Interest income

  	 	3,572	 	 	 	4,224	 	 	 	5,860	 
Interest expense

  	 	4,673	 	 	 	5,971	 	 	 	6,900	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Net interest

  	 	(1,101	) 	 	 	(1,747	) 	 	 	(1,040	) 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Net revenues

  	 	15,443	 	 	 	11,025	 	 	 	17,683	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Compensation and benefits

  	 	6,823	 	 	 	6,978	 	 	 	7,567	 
Non-compensation expenses

  	 	7,751	 	 	 	5,735	 	 	 	5,566	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Total non-interest expenses

  	 	14,574	 	 	 	12,713	 	 	 	13,133	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Income (loss) from continuing operations before income taxes

  	 	869	 	 	 	(1,688	) 	 	 	4,550	 
Provision for (benefit from) income taxes

  	 	(393	) 	 	 	(1,061	) 	 	 	880	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Income (loss) from continuing operations

  	 	1,262	 	 	 	(627	) 	 	 	3,670	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Discontinued operations:

  				 				 			
Gain (loss) from discontinued operations

  	 	(81	) 	 	 	(158	) 	 	 	(216	) 
Provision for (benefit from) income taxes

  	 	(29	) 	 	 	(36	) 	 	 	(110	) 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Net gains (losses) on discontinued operations

  	 	(52	) 	 	 	(122	) 	 	 	(106	) 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Net income (loss)

  	 	1,210	 	 	 	(749	) 	 	 	3,564	 
Net income applicable to redeemable noncontrolling interests

  	 	1	 	 	 	4	 	 	 	—  	 
Net income applicable to nonredeemable noncontrolling interests

  	 	277	 	 	 	170	 	 	 	220	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Net income (loss) applicable to Morgan Stanley

  	$	932	 	 	$	(923	) 	 	$	3,344	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Amounts applicable to Morgan Stanley:

  				 				 			
Income (loss) from continuing operations

  	$	984	 	 	$	(797	) 	 	$	3,450	 
Net gains (losses) from discontinued operations

  	 	(52	) 	 	 	(126	) 	 	 	(106	) 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Net income (loss) applicable to Morgan Stanley

  	$	932	 	 	$	(923	) 	 	$	3,344	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
 

(1)	Prior-period amounts have been recast to reflect the transfer of the International Wealth Management business from the Wealth Management business segment to the Institutional Securities business segment.
 

Supplemental Financial Information.

 

Investment Banking.    Investment banking revenues are composed of fees from advisory services and revenues from the underwriting of securities offerings and syndication of loans, net of syndication expenses.

 

66

LOGO

Table of Contents
Investment banking revenues were as follows:

 

 	  	2013	 	  	2012	 	  	2011	 
 	  	(dollars in millions)	 
Advisory revenues

  	$	1,310	 	  	$	1,369	 	  	$	1,737	 
Underwriting revenues:

  				  				  			
Equity underwriting revenues

  	 	1,262	 	  	 	892	 	  	 	1,144	 
Fixed income underwriting revenues

  	 	1,805	 	  	 	1,669	 	  	 	1,359	 
  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 
Total underwriting revenues

  	 	3,067	 	  	 	2,561	 	  	 	2,503	 
  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 
Total investment banking revenues

  	$	4,377	 	  	$	3,930	 	  	$	4,240	 
  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 
 

The following table presents the Company’s volumes of announced and completed mergers and acquisitions, equity and equity-related offerings, and fixed income offerings:

 

 	  	2013(1)	 	  	2012(1)	 	  	2011(1)	 
 	  	(dollars in billions)	 
Announced mergers and acquisitions(2)

  	$	520	 	  	$	464	 	  	$	510	 
Completed mergers and acquisitions(2)

  	 	508	 	  	 	391	 	  	 	657	 
Equity and equity-related offerings(3)

  	 	61	 	  	 	52	 	  	 	47	 
Fixed income offerings(4)

  	 	287	 	  	 	284	 	  	 	231	 
 

(1)	Source: Thomson Reuters, data at January 14, 2014. Announced and completed mergers and acquisitions volumes are based on full credit to each of the advisors in a transaction. Equity and equity-related offerings and fixed income offerings are based on full credit for single book managers and equal credit for joint book managers. Transaction volumes may not be indicative of net revenues in a given period. In addition, transaction volumes for prior periods may vary from amounts previously reported due to the subsequent withdrawal or change in the value of a transaction.
(2)	Amounts include transactions of $100 million or more. Announced mergers and acquisitions exclude terminated transactions.
(3)	Amounts include Rule 144A and public common stock, convertible and rights offerings.
(4)	Amounts include non-convertible preferred stock, mortgage-backed and asset-backed securities and taxable municipal debt. Amounts also include publicly registered and Rule 144A issues. Amounts exclude leveraged loans and self-led issuances.
 

Sales and Trading Net Revenues.

 

Sales and trading net revenues are composed of Trading revenues; Commissions and fees; Asset management, distribution and administration fees; and Net interest revenues (expenses). See “Business Segments—Net Revenues” herein for information about the composition of the above-referenced components of sales and trading revenues. In assessing the profitability of its sales and trading activities, the Company views these net revenues in the aggregate. In addition, decisions relating to trading are based on an overall review of aggregate revenues and costs associated with each transaction or series of transactions. This review includes, among other things, an assessment of the potential gain or loss associated with a transaction, including any associated commissions and fees, dividends, the interest income or expense associated with financing or hedging the Company’s positions, and other related expenses. See Note 12 to the consolidated financial statements in Item 8 for further information related to gains (losses) on derivative instruments.

 

 	67	 	LOGO
Table of Contents
Sales and trading net revenues were as follows:

 

 	  	2013	 	 	2012(1)	 	 	2011(1)	 
 	  	(dollars in millions)	 
Trading

  	$	8,147	 	 	$	6,002	 	 	$	11,425	 
Commissions and fees

  	 	2,425	 	 	 	2,176	 	 	 	2,849	 
Asset management, distribution and administration fees

  	 	280	 	 	 	242	 	 	 	206	 
Net interest

  	 	(1,101	) 	 	 	(1,747	) 	 	 	(1,040	) 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Total sales and trading net revenues

  	$	9,751	 	 	$	6,673	 	 	$	13,440	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
 

(1)	All prior-year amounts have been recast to conform to the current year’s presentation. For further information, see “Business Segments” herein and Note 1 to the consolidated financial statements in Item 8.
 

Sales and trading net revenues by business were as follows:

 

 	  	2013	 	 	2012(1)	 	 	2011(1)	 
 	  	(dollars in millions)	 
Equity

  	$	6,529	 	 	$	4,811	 	 	$	7,263	 
Fixed income and commodities

  	 	3,594	 	 	 	2,358	 	 	 	7,506	 
Other(2)

  	 	(372	) 	 	 	(496	) 	 	 	(1,329	) 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Total sales and trading net revenues

  	$	9,751	 	 	$	6,673	 	 	$	13,440	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
 

(1)	All prior-year amounts have been recast to conform to the current year’s presentation. For further information, see “Business Segments” herein and Note 1 to the consolidated financial statements in Item 8.
(2)	Other sales and trading net revenues include net losses associated with costs related to the amount of liquidity held (“negative carry”), net gains (losses) on economic hedges related to the Company’s long-term debt and net gains (losses) from certain loans and lending commitments and related hedges associated with the Company’s lending activities.
 

The following sales and trading net revenues results exclude the impact of DVA (see footnote 2 in the following table). The reconciliation of sales and trading, including equity sales and trading and fixed income and commodities sales and trading net revenues, from a non-GAAP to a GAAP basis is as follows:

 

 	  	2013	 	 	2012(1)	 	 	2011(1)	 
 	  	(dollars in millions)	 
Total sales and trading net revenues—non-GAAP(2)

  	$	10,432	 	 	$	11,075	 	 	$	9,759	 
Impact of DVA

  	 	(681	) 	 	 	(4,402	) 	 	 	3,681	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Total sales and trading net revenues

  	$	9,751	 	 	$	6,673	 	 	$	13,440	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Equity sales and trading net revenues—non-GAAP(2)

  	$	6,607	 	 	$	5,941	 	 	$	6,644	 
Impact of DVA

  	 	(78	) 	 	 	(1,130	) 	 	 	619	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Equity sales and trading net revenues

  	$	6,529	 	 	$	4,811	 	 	$	7,263	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Fixed income and commodities sales and trading net revenues

  				 				 			
—non-GAAP(2)

  	$	4,197	 	 	$	5,630	 	 	$	4,444	 
Impact of DVA

  	 	(603	) 	 	 	(3,272	) 	 	 	3,062	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Fixed income and commodities sales and trading net revenues

  	$	3,594	 	 	$	2,358	 	 	$	7,506	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
 

(1)	All prior-year amounts have been recast to conform to the current year’s presentation. For further information, see “Business Segments” herein and Note 1 to the consolidated financial statements in Item 8.
(2)	Sales and trading net revenues, including fixed income and commodities and equity sales and trading net revenues that exclude the impact of DVA, are non-GAAP financial measures that the Company considers useful for the Company and investors to allow further comparability of period-to-period operating performance.
 

68

LOGO

Table of Contents
2013 Compared with 2012.

 

Investment Banking.    Investment banking revenues in 2013 increased 11% from 2012, reflecting higher revenues from equity and fixed income underwriting transactions, partially offset by lower advisory revenues. Overall, underwriting revenues of $3,067 million increased 20% from 2012. Equity underwriting revenues increased 41% to $1,262 million in 2013, largely driven by increased client activity across Europe, Asia and the Americas. Fixed income underwriting revenues were $1,805 million in 2013, an increase of 8% from 2012, reflecting a continued favorable debt underwriting environment. Advisory revenues from merger, acquisition and restructuring transactions (“M&A”) were $1,310 million in 2013, a decrease of 4% from 2012, reflective of the lower level of deal activity in 2013. Industry-wide announced M&A activity for 2013 was relatively flat compared with 2012, with increases in the Americas offset by decreases in Europe, Middle East and Africa.

 

Sales and Trading Net Revenues.    Total sales and trading net revenues increased to $9,751 million in 2013 from $6,673 million in 2012, reflecting higher revenues in equity and fixed income sales and trading net revenues and lower losses in other sales and trading net revenues.

 

Equity.    Equity sales and trading net revenues increased to $6,529 million in 2013 from $4,811 million in 2012. The results in equity sales and trading net revenues included negative revenue due to the impact of DVA of $78 million in 2013 compared with negative revenue of $1,130 million in 2012. Equity sales and trading net revenues, excluding the impact of DVA, increased 11% to $6,607 million in 2013 from 2012, reflecting strong performance across most products and regions, from higher client activity with particular strength in prime brokerage.

 

In 2013, equity sales and trading net revenues also reflected gains of $37 million related to changes in the fair value of net derivative contracts attributable to the tightening of counterparties’ CDS spreads and other factors compared with gains of $68 million in 2012. The Company also recorded losses of $15 million in 2013 related to changes in the fair value of net derivative contracts attributable to the tightening of the Company’s CDS spreads and other factors compared with losses of $243 million in 2012. The gains and losses on CDS spreads and other factors include gains and losses on related hedging instruments.

 

Fixed Income and Commodities.    Fixed income and commodities sales and trading net revenues were $3,594 million in 2013 compared with net revenues of $2,358 million in 2012. Results in 2013 included negative revenue of $603 million due to the impact of DVA compared with negative revenue of $3,272 million in 2012. Fixed income product net revenues, excluding the impact of DVA, in 2013 decreased 26% over 2012, primarily reflecting lower levels of client activity across most products and significant revenue declines in interest rate products. Commodity net revenues, excluding the impact of DVA, in 2013 decreased 38% over 2012, primarily reflecting lower levels of client activity across energy markets.

 

In 2013, fixed income and commodities sales and trading net revenues reflected gains of $127 million related to changes in the fair value of net derivative contracts attributable to the tightening of counterparties’ CDS spreads and other factors compared with losses of $128 million in 2012 due to the widening of such spreads and other factors. The Company also recorded losses of $114 million in 2013 related to changes in the fair value of net derivative contracts attributable to the tightening of the Company’s CDS spreads and other factors compared with losses of $482 million in 2012. The gains and losses on CDS spreads and other factors include gains and losses on related hedging instruments.

 

Other.    In addition to the equity and fixed income and commodities sales and trading net revenues discussed above, sales and trading net revenues included other trading revenues, consisting of costs related to negative carry, gains (losses) on economic hedges related to the Company’s long-term debt and certain activities associated with the Company’s corporate lending activities. Effective April 1, 2012, the Company began accounting for all new corporate loans and lending commitments as either held for investment or held for sale.

 

Other sales and trading net losses were $372 million in 2013 compared with net losses of $496 million in 2012. The results in both periods included net losses related to negative carry and losses on economic hedges and other

 

 	69	 	LOGO
Table of Contents
costs related to the Company’s long-term debt. The results in 2013 and 2012 were partially offset by net gains of $440 million and $740 million, respectively, associated with corporate loans and lending commitments.

 

Net Interest.    Net interest expense decreased to $1,101 million in 2013 from $1,747 million in 2012, primarily due to lower costs associated with the Company’s long-term borrowings.

 

Investments.    See “Business Segments—Net Revenues” herein for further information on what is included in Investments.

 

Net investment gains of $707 million were recognized in 2013 compared with net investment gains of $219 million in 2012. The increase primarily reflected a gain on the disposition of an investment in an insurance broker. The results in 2013 and 2012 included mark-to-market gains on principal investments in real estate funds and net gains from investments associated with the Company’s deferred compensation and co-investment plans.

 

Other.    Other revenues of $608 million were recognized in 2013 compared with other revenues of $203 million in 2012. The results in 2013 primarily included income of $570 million, arising from the Company’s 40% stake in MUMSS, compared with income of $152 million in 2012 (see “Executive Summary—Significant Items—Japanese Securities Joint Venture” herein). The gains in both periods were partially offset by the provision for loan losses and losses associated with investments in low-income housing and alternative energy.

 

Non-interest Expenses.    Non-interest expenses increased 15% in 2013 compared with 2012. The increase was primarily due to higher non-compensation expenses. Compensation and benefits expenses decreased 2% in 2013, primarily due to lower headcount. Results included severance expenses of $141 million related to reductions in force in 2013 compared with $120 million in 2012. Non-compensation expenses increased 35% in 2013 compared with 2012. The increase primarily reflected additions to legal expenses for litigation and investigations related to residential mortgage-backed securities and the credit crisis (see “Contingencies—Legal” in Note 13 to the consolidated financial statements in Item 8). Brokerage, clearing and exchange expenses increased 16% in 2013 compared with 2012 primarily due to higher volumes of activity. Information processing and communications expenses decreased 9% in 2013 compared with 2012 primarily due to lower technology costs. Professional services expenses increased 5% in 2013 compared with 2012 primarily due to higher consulting expenses related to the Company’s technology platform.

 

2012 Compared with 2011.

 

Investment Banking.    Investment banking revenues in 2012 decreased 7% from 2011, reflecting lower revenues from advisory and equity underwriting transactions, partially offset by higher revenues from fixed income underwriting transactions. Advisory revenues from merger, acquisition and restructuring transactions were $1,369 million in 2012, a decrease of 21% from 2011, reflecting lower completed market volumes. Overall, underwriting revenues of $2,561 million increased 2% from 2011. Fixed income underwriting revenues were $1,669 million in 2012, an increase of 23% from 2011, reflecting increased bond issuance volumes. Equity underwriting revenues decreased 22% to $892 million in 2012, reflecting lower levels of market activity.

 

Sales and Trading Net Revenues.    Total sales and trading net revenues decreased to $6,673 million in 2012 from $13,440 million in 2011, reflecting lower revenues in fixed income and commodities sales and trading net revenues and equity sales and trading net revenues, partially offset by lower losses in other sales and trading net revenues.

 

Equity.    Equity sales and trading net revenues decreased 34% to $4,811 million in 2012 from 2011. The results in equity sales and trading net revenues included negative revenue in 2012 of $1,130 million due to the impact of DVA compared with positive revenue of $619 million in 2011 due to the impact of DVA. Equity sales and trading net revenues, excluding the impact of DVA, in 2012 decreased 11% from 2011, reflecting lower revenues in the cash business, as a result of lower volumes.

 

In 2012, equity sales and trading net revenues reflected gains of $68 million related to changes in the fair value of net derivative contracts attributable to the tightening of counterparties’ CDS spreads and other credit factors compared with losses of $38 million in 2011 due to the widening of such spreads and other credit factors. The

 

70

LOGO

Table of Contents
Company also recorded losses of $243 million in 2012 related to changes in the fair value of net derivative contracts attributable to the tightening of the Company’s CDS spreads and other credit factors compared with gains of $182 million in 2011 due to the widening of such spreads and other credit factors. The gains and losses on CDS spreads and other credit factors include gains and losses on related hedging instruments.

 

Fixed Income and Commodities.    Fixed income and commodities sales and trading net revenues were $2,358 million in 2012 compared with net revenues of $7,506 million in 2011. Results in 2012 included negative revenue of $3,272 million due to the impact of DVA, compared with positive revenue of $3,062 million in 2011 due to the impact of DVA. Fixed income product net revenues, excluding the impact of DVA, in 2012 increased 45% over 2011, reflecting higher results in interest rate, foreign exchange and credit products, including higher levels of client activity in securitized products, with results in 2011 being negatively impacted by losses of $1,838 million from Monolines, including a loss approximating $1.7 billion in the fourth quarter of 2011 from the Company’s comprehensive settlement with MBIA (see “Executive Summary—Significant Items—Monoline Insurers” herein for further information). The results in 2011 also included interest rate product revenues of approximately $600 million, primarily related to the release of credit valuation adjustments upon the restructuring of certain derivative transactions that decreased the Company’s exposure to the European Peripherals (see “Executive Summary—Significant Items—European Peripheral Countries” herein for further information). Commodity net revenues, excluding the impact of DVA, decreased 20% in 2012 due to a difficult market environment. Results in the fourth quarter of 2011 included a loss of approximately $108 million upon application of the overnight indexed swap (“OIS”) curve to certain fixed income products (see Note 4 to the consolidated financial statements in Item 8).

 

In 2012, fixed income and commodities sales and trading net revenues reflected losses of $128 million related to changes in the fair value of net derivative contracts attributable to the widening of counterparties’ CDS spreads and other credit factors compared with losses of $1,249 million, including Monolines, in 2011. The Company also recorded losses of $482 million in 2012 related to changes in the fair value of net derivative contracts attributable to the tightening of the Company’s CDS spreads and other credit factors compared with gains of $746 million in 2011 due to the widening of such spreads and other credit factors. The gains and losses on CDS spreads and other factors include gains and losses on related hedging instruments.

 

Other.    Other sales and trading net losses were $496 million in 2012 compared with net losses of $1,329 million in 2011. The results in both years included losses related to negative carry. The 2012 results included losses on economic hedges related to the Company’s long-term debt compared with gains in 2011. Results in 2012 were partially offset by net gains of $740 million associated with loans and lending commitments. Results in 2011 included net losses of approximately $631 million associated with loans and lending commitments. The results in 2012 also included net investment gains in the Company’s deferred compensation and co-investment plans compared with net losses in 2011.

 

Net Interest.    Net interest expense increased to $1,747 million in 2012 from $1,040 million in 2011, primarily due to lower revenues from securities purchased under agreements to resell and securities borrowed transactions.

 

Investments.    Net investment gains of $219 million were recognized in 2012 compared with net investment gains of $239 million in 2011. The gains in 2012 and 2011 primarily included mark-to-market gains on principal investments in real estate funds and net gains from investments associated with the Company’s deferred compensation and co-investment plans.

 

Other.    Other revenues of $203 million were recognized in 2012 compared with other losses of $236 million in 2011. The results in 2012 included income of $152 million, arising from the Company’s 40% stake in MUMSS. The results in 2011 included pre-tax losses of $783 million arising from the Company’s 40% stake in MUMSS (see “Executive Summary—Significant Items—Japanese Securities Joint Venture” herein). The gains in 2012 were partially offset by increases in the provision for loan losses. The results in both periods also included gains from the Company’s retirement of certain of its debt.

 

 	71	 	LOGO
Table of Contents
Non-interest Expenses.    Non-interest expenses decreased 3% in 2012. The decrease was due to lower compensation expenses, partially offset by higher non-compensation expenses. Compensation and benefits expenses decreased 8% in 2012, in part due to lower net revenues, excluding DVA and the comprehensive settlement with MBIA, and were partially offset by severance expenses related to reductions in force during the year. Non-compensation expenses increased 3% in 2012, compared with 2011. Brokerage, clearing and exchange expenses decreased 9% in 2012, primarily due to lower volumes of activity. Information processing and communications expense increased 6% in 2012, primarily due to ongoing investments in technology. Professional services expenses increased 21% in 2012, primarily due to higher legal and regulatory costs and consulting expenses. Other expenses increased 4% in 2012. The results in 2012 included increased litigation expense and a higher provision for unfunded loan commitments. The results in 2011 included the initial costs of $130 million associated with Morgan Stanley Huaxin Securities Company Limited (see “Executive Summary—Significant Items—Huaxin Securities Joint Venture” herein for further information). The results in 2011 also included a charge of $59 million due to the bank levy on relevant liabilities and equities on the consolidated balance sheets of “U.K. Banking Groups” at December 31, 2011 as defined under the bank levy legislation enacted by the U.K. government in July 2011.

 

Income Tax Items.

 

In 2013, the Company recognized in income from continuing operations an aggregate discrete net tax benefit of $407 million attributable to the Institutional Securities business segment. This included discrete tax benefits of: $161 million related to the remeasurement of reserves and related interest associated with new information regarding the status of certain tax authority examinations; $92 million related to the establishment of a previously unrecognized deferred tax asset from a legal entity reorganization; $73 million that is attributable to tax planning strategies to optimize foreign tax credit utilization as a result of the anticipated repatriation of earnings from certain non-U.S. subsidiaries; and $81 million due to the retroactive effective date of the Relief Act.

 

In 2012, the Company recognized in income from continuing operations a net tax benefit of $249 million attributable to the Institutional Securities business segment. This included a discrete tax benefit of $299 million related to the remeasurement of reserves and related interest associated with either the expiration of the applicable statute of limitations or new information regarding the status of certain Internal Revenue Service examinations and an out-of-period net tax provision of $50 million, primarily related to the overstatement of deferred tax assets associated with repatriated earnings of foreign subsidiaries recorded in prior years. The Company has evaluated the effects of the understatement of the income tax provision both qualitatively and quantitatively, and concluded that it did not have a material impact on any prior annual or quarterly consolidated financial statements.

 

Discontinued Operations.

 

For a discussion about discontinued operations, see Note 1 to the consolidated financial statements in Item 8.

 

Nonredeemable Noncontrolling Interests.

 

Nonredeemable noncontrolling interests primarily relate to MUFG’s interest in MSMS (see “Executive Summary—Significant Items—Japanese Securities Joint Venture” herein).

 

Sale of Global Oil Merchanting Business.

 

On December 20, 2013, the Company and a subsidiary of Rosneft Oil Company (“Rosneft”) entered into a Purchase Agreement pursuant to which the Company will sell the global oil merchanting unit of its commodities division to Rosneft. The transaction is subject to regulatory approvals and other customary conditions and is expected to close in the second half of 2014. At December 31, 2013, the transaction does not meet the criteria for discontinued operations and is not expected to have a material impact on the Company’s consolidated financial statements.

 

72

LOGO

Table of Contents
WEALTH MANAGEMENT

 

INCOME STATEMENT INFORMATION

 

 	  	2013	 	 	2012(1)	 	  	2011(1)	 
 	  	(dollars in millions)	 
Revenues:

  				 				  			
Investment banking

  	$	923	 	 	$	835	 	  	$	738	 
Trading

  	 	1,161	 	 	 	1,043	 	  	 	988	 
Investments

  	 	14	 	 	 	10	 	  	 	4	 
Commissions and fees

  	 	2,209	 	 	 	2,080	 	  	 	2,495	 
Asset management, distribution and administration fees

  	 	7,638	 	 	 	7,190	 	  	 	6,709	 
Other

  	 	389	 	 	 	309	 	  	 	406	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 
Total non-interest revenues

  	 	12,334	 	 	 	11,467	 	  	 	11,340	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 
Interest income

  	 	2,100	 	 	 	1,886	 	  	 	1,719	 
Interest expense

  	 	220	 	 	 	319	 	  	 	287	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 
Net interest

  	 	1,880	 	 	 	1,567	 	  	 	1,432	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 
Net revenues

  	 	14,214	 	 	 	13,034	 	  	 	12,772	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 
Compensation and benefits

  	 	8,271	 	 	 	7,796	 	  	 	7,910	 
Non-compensation expenses

  	 	3,314	 	 	 	3,616	 	  	 	3,555	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 
Total non-interest expenses

  	 	11,585	 	 	 	11,412	 	  	 	11,465	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 
Income from continuing operations before income taxes

  	 	2,629	 	 	 	1,622	 	  	 	1,307	 
Provision for income taxes

  	 	920	 	 	 	557	 	  	 	461	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 
Income from continuing operations

  	 	1,709	 	 	 	1,065	 	  	 	846	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 
Discontinued operations:

  				 				  			
Income (loss) from discontinued operations

  	 	(1	) 	 	 	94	 	  	 	21	 
Provision for income taxes

  	 	—  	 	 	 	26	 	  	 	7	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 
Net gain (loss) from discontinued operations

  	 	(1	) 	 	 	68	 	  	 	14	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 
Net income

  	 	1,708	 	 	 	1,133	 	  	 	860	 
Net income applicable to redeemable noncontrolling interests

  	 	221	 	 	 	120	 	  	 	—  	 
Net income applicable to nonredeemable noncontrolling interests

  	 	—  	 	 	 	167	 	  	 	170	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 
Net income applicable to Morgan Stanley

  	$	1,487	 	 	$	846	 	  	$	690	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 
Amounts applicable to Morgan Stanley:

  				 				  			
Income from continuing operations

  	$	1,488	 	 	$	803	 	  	$	683	 
Net gain (loss) from discontinued operations

  	 	(1	) 	 	 	43	 	  	 	7	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 
Net income applicable to Morgan Stanley

  	$	1,487	 	 	$	846	 	  	$	690	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 
 

(1)	Prior-period amounts have been recast to reflect the transfer of the International Wealth Management business from the Wealth Management business segment to the Institutional Securities business segment.
 

73

LOGO

Table of Contents
Net Revenues.    The Wealth Management business segment’s net revenues are composed of Transactional, Asset management, Net interest and Other revenues. Transactional revenues include Investment banking, Trading, and Commissions and fees. Asset management revenues include Asset management, distribution and administration fees, and referral fees related to the bank deposit program. Net interest revenues include net interest revenues related to the bank deposit program, interest on securities available for sale and all other net interest revenues. Other revenues include revenues from available for sale securities, customer account services fees, other miscellaneous revenues and revenues from Investments.

 

 	  	2013	 	  	2012(1)	 	  	2011(1)	 
 	  	(dollars in millions)	 
Net revenues:

  				  				  			
Transactional

  	$	4,293	 	  	$	3,958	 	  	$	4,221	 
Asset management

  	 	7,638	 	  	 	7,190	 	  	 	6,709	 
Net interest

  	 	1,880	 	  	 	1,567	 	  	 	1,432	 
Other

  	 	403	 	  	 	319	 	  	 	410	 
  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 
Net revenues

  	$	14,214	 	  	$	13,034	 	  	$	12,772	 
  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 
 

(1)	Prior-period amounts have been recast to reflect the transfer of the International Wealth Management business from the Wealth Management business segment to the Institutional Securities business segment.
 

Wealth Management JV.    On June 28, 2013, the Company completed the purchase of the remaining 35% stake in the Wealth Management JV for $4.725 billion. As the 100% owner of the Wealth Management JV, the Company retains all of the related net income previously applicable to the noncontrolling interests in the Wealth Management JV, and benefit from the termination of certain related debt and operating agreements with the Wealth Management JV partner.

 

Concurrent with the acquisition of the remaining 35% stake in the Wealth Management JV, the deposit sweep agreement between Citi and the Company was terminated. In 2013, $26 billion of deposits held by Citi relating to customer accounts were transferred to the Company’s depository institutions. At December 31, 2013, approximately $30 billion of additional deposits are scheduled to be transferred to the Company’s depository institutions on an agreed-upon basis through June 2015.

 

For further information, see Note 3 to the consolidated financial statements in Item 8.

 

2013 compared with 2012.

 

Transactional.

 

Investment Banking.    Wealth Management business segment’s investment banking revenues include revenues from the distribution of equity and fixed income securities, including initial public offerings, secondary offerings, closed-end funds and unit trusts. Investment banking revenues increased 11% from 2012 to $923 million in 2013, primarily due to higher levels of underwriting activity in closed-end funds and unit trusts.

 

Trading.    Trading revenues include revenues from customers’ purchases and sales of financial instruments in which the Company acts as principal and gains and losses on the Company’s inventory positions, which are held primarily to facilitate customer transactions and gains and losses associated with certain employee deferred compensation plans. Trading revenues increased 11% from 2012 to $1,161 million in 2013, primarily due to gains related to investments associated with certain employee deferred compensation plans and higher revenues from fixed income products.

 

Commissions and Fees.    Commissions and fees revenues primarily arise from agency transactions in listed and OTC equity securities and sales of mutual funds, futures, insurance products and options. Commissions and fees revenues increased 6% from 2012 to $2,209 million in 2013, primarily due to higher equity, mutual fund and alternatives activity.

 

74

LOGO

Table of Contents
Asset Management.

 

Asset Management, Distribution and Administration Fees.    See “Business Segments—Net Revenues” herein for information about the composition of Asset management, distribution and administration fees.

 

Asset management, distribution and administration fees increased 6% from 2012 to $7,638 million in 2013, primarily due to higher fee-based revenues, partially offset by lower revenues from referral fees from the bank deposit program. The referral fees for deposits placed with Citi-affiliated depository institutions declined to $240 million in 2013 from $383 million in 2012. Lower revenues from the bank deposit program and the decrease in referral fees are both due to the ongoing transfer of deposits to the Company from Citi.

 

Balances in the bank deposit program increased to $134 billion at December 31, 2013 from $131 billion at December 31, 2012, which includes deposits held by Company-affiliated FDIC-insured depository institutions of $104 billion at December 31, 2013 and $72 billion at December 31, 2012. As a result of the Company’s 100% ownership of the Wealth Management JV, the deposits held in non-affiliated depositories will transfer to the Company-affiliated depositories on an agreed-upon basis through June 2015.

 

Client assets in fee-based accounts increased to $697 billion and represented 37% of total client assets at December 31, 2013 compared with $554 billion and 33% at December 31, 2012, respectively. Total client asset balances increased to $1,909 billion at December 31, 2013 from $1,696 billion at December 31, 2012, primarily due to the impact of market conditions and higher fee-based client asset flows. Client asset balances in households with assets greater than $1 million increased to $1,454 billion at December 31, 2013 from $1,237 billion at December 31, 2012. Effective from the quarter ended March 31, 2013, client assets also include certain additional non-custodied assets as a result of the completion of the Wealth Management JV platform conversion. Fee-based client asset flows for 2013 were $51.9 billion compared with $26.9 billion in 2012.

 

Beginning January 1, 2013, the Company enhanced its definition of fee-based asset flows. Fee-based asset flows have been recast for all periods to include dividends, interest and client fees and to exclude cash management related activity.

 

Net Interest.

 

Interest income and Interest expense are a function of the level and mix of total assets and liabilities. Net interest is driven by securities-based lending, mortgage lending, margin loans, securities borrowed and securities loaned transactions and bank deposit program activity.

 

Net interest increased 20% to $1,880 million in 2013 from 2012, primarily due to higher balances in the bank deposit program and growth in loans and lending commitments in PLA securities-based lending products. In addition, interest expense declined in 2013 due to the Company’s redemption of all the Class A Preferred Interests owned by Citi and its affiliates, in connection with the Company’s acquisition of 100% ownership of the Wealth Management JV effective at the end of the second quarter of 2013. The loans and lending commitments in the Company’s Wealth Management business segment have grown in 2013, and the Company expects this trend to continue. See “Business Segments—Lending Activities” herein and “Quantitative and Qualitative Disclosures about Market Risk—Credit Risk” in Item 7A.

 

Other.

 

Other revenues were $389 million in 2013, an increase of 26% from 2012, primarily due to a gain on sale of the global stock plan business and realized gains on securities available for sale.

 

Non-interest Expenses. 

 

Non-interest expenses increased 2% in 2013 from 2012. Compensation and benefits expenses increased 6% in 2013 from 2012, primarily due to higher compensable revenues. Non-compensation expenses decreased 8% in 2013 from 2012, primarily driven by the absence of platform integration costs and non-recurring technology

 

 	75	 	LOGO
Table of Contents
write-offs, partially offset by an impairment expense of $36 million related to certain intangible assets (management contracts) associated with alternative investment funds in 2013 (see Note 9 to the consolidated financial statements in Item 8).

 

2012 Compared with 2011.

 

Transactional.

 

Investment Banking.    Investment banking revenues increased 13% to $835 million in 2012 from 2011, primarily due to higher revenues from closed-end funds and higher fixed income underwriting.

 

Trading.    Trading revenues increased 6% to $1,043 million in 2012 from 2011, primarily due to gains related to investments associated with certain employee deferred compensation plans and higher revenues from structured notes and corporate bonds transactions, partially offset by lower revenues from municipal securities, corporate equity securities, government securities and foreign exchange transactions.

 

Commissions and Fees.    Commissions and fees revenues decreased 17% to $2,080 million in 2012 from 2011, primarily due to lower client activity.

 

Asset Management.

 

Asset Management, Distribution and Administration Fees.    Asset management, distribution and administration fees increased 7% to $7,190 million in 2012 from 2011, primarily due to higher fee-based revenues, and higher revenues from annuities and the bank deposit program held at Citi depositories. The referral fees for deposits placed with Citi-affiliated depository institutions were $383 million and $255 million in 2012 and 2011, respectively.

 

Balances in the bank deposit program increased to $131 billion at December 31, 2012 from $111 billion at December 31, 2011. Deposits held by Company-affiliated FDIC-insured depository institutions were $72 billion at December 31, 2012 and $56 billion at December 31, 2011.

 

Client assets in fee-based accounts increased to $554 billion and represented 33% of total client assets at December 31, 2012 compared with $468 billion and 30% at December 31, 2011, respectively. Total client asset balances increased to $1,696 billion at December 31, 2012 from $1,566 billion at December 31, 2011, primarily due to the impact of market conditions and net new asset inflows. Client asset balances in households with assets greater than $1 million increased to $1,237 billion at December 31, 2012 from $1,150 billion at December 31, 2011. Global fee-based client asset flows for 2012 were $26.9 billion compared with $47.0 billion in 2011.

 

Net Interest.

 

Net interest increased 9% to $1,567 million in 2012 from 2011, primarily resulting from higher revenues from the bank deposit program, interest on the available for sale portfolio and secured financing activities.

 

Other.    Other revenues were $309 million in 2012, a decrease of 24% from 2011, primarily due to lower gains on sales of securities available for sale.

 

Non-interest Expenses.    Non-interest expenses were flat in 2012 from 2011. Compensation and benefits expenses decreased 1% from 2011, primarily due to lower compensable revenues, partially offset by higher expenses associated with certain employee deferred compensation plans. Non-compensation expenses increased 2% in 2012 from 2011. Information processing and communications expenses increased 7% in 2012, primarily due to higher telecommunications and data storage costs. Marketing and business development expenses increased 10% from 2011, primarily due to higher costs associated with advertising and infrastructure, partially offset by lower costs associated with conferences and seminars. Other expenses increased 5% in 2012, primarily

 

76

LOGO

Table of Contents
due to non-recurring costs related to Wealth Management JV integration (see “Executive Summary—Significant Items—Wealth Management JV” herein). Professional services expenses decreased 7% in 2012 from 2011, primarily due to lower technology consulting costs.

 

Discontinued Operations.

 

On April 2, 2012, the Company completed the sale of Quilter, its retail wealth management business in the U.K., resulting in a pre-tax gain of $108 million for the year ended December 31, 2012 in the Wealth Management business segment. The results of Quilter are reported as discontinued operations for all periods presented. See Note 1 to the consolidated financial statements in Item 8.

 

 	77	 	LOGO
Table of Contents
INVESTMENT MANAGEMENT

 

INCOME STATEMENT INFORMATION

 

 	  	2013	 	 	2012	 	 	2011	 
 	  	(dollars in millions)	 
Revenues:

  				 				 			
Investment banking

  	$	11	 	 	$	17	 	 	$	13	 
Trading

  	 	41	 	 	 	(45	) 	 	 	(22	) 
Investments

  	 	1,056	 	 	 	513	 	 	 	330	 
Asset management, distribution and administration fees

  	 	1,853	 	 	 	1,703	 	 	 	1,582	 
Other

  	 	33	 	 	 	55	 	 	 	25	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Total non-interest revenues

  	 	2,994	 	 	 	2,243	 	 	 	1,928	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Interest income

  	 	9	 	 	 	10	 	 	 	10	 
Interest expense

  	 	15	 	 	 	34	 	 	 	51	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Net interest

  	 	(6	) 	 	 	(24	) 	 	 	(41	) 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Net revenues

  	 	2,988	 	 	 	2,219	 	 	 	1,887	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Compensation and benefits

  	 	1,183	 	 	 	841	 	 	 	848	 
Non-compensation expenses

  	 	821	 	 	 	788	 	 	 	786	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Total non-interest expenses

  	 	2,004	 	 	 	1,629	 	 	 	1,634	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Income from continuing operations before income taxes

  	 	984	 	 	 	590	 	 	 	253	 
Provision for income taxes

  	 	299	 	 	 	267	 	 	 	73	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Income from continuing operations

  	 	685	 	 	 	323	 	 	 	180	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Discontinued operations:

  				 				 			
Gain from discontinued operations

  	 	9	 	 	 	13	 	 	 	24	 
Provision for (benefit from) income taxes

  	 	—  	 	 	 	4	 	 	 	(17	) 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Net gain from discontinued operations

  	 	9	 	 	 	9	 	 	 	41	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Net income

  	 	694	 	 	 	332	 	 	 	221	 
Net income applicable to nonredeemable noncontrolling interests

  	 	182	 	 	 	187	 	 	 	145	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Net income applicable to Morgan Stanley

  	$	512	 	 	$	145	 	 	$	76	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Amounts applicable to Morgan Stanley:

  				 				 			
Income from continuing operations

  	$	503	 	 	$	136	 	 	$	35	 
Net gain from discontinued operations

  	 	9	 	 	 	9	 	 	 	41	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Net income applicable to Morgan Stanley

  	$	512	 	 	$	145	 	 	$	76	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
 

78

LOGO

Table of Contents
Statistical Data.

 

The Investment Management business segment’s period-end and average assets under management or supervision were as follows:

 

 	  	At
December  31,	 	  	Average for	 
 	  	2013	 	  	2012	 	  	2013	 	  	2012	 	  	2011	 
 	  	(dollars in billions)	 
Assets under management or supervision by asset class:

  				  				  				  				  			
Traditional Asset Management:

  				  				  				  				  			
Equity

  	$	140	 	  	$	120	 	  	$	130	 	  	$	114	 	  	$	112	 
Fixed income

  	 	60	 	  	 	62	 	  	 	61	 	  	 	59	 	  	 	60	 
Liquidity

  	 	112	 	  	 	100	 	  	 	104	 	  	 	87	 	  	 	66	 
Alternatives(1)

  	 	31	 	  	 	27	 	  	 	29	 	  	 	26	 	  	 	18	 
  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 
Total Traditional Asset Management

  	 	343	 	  	 	309	 	  	 	324	 	  	 	286	 	  	 	256	 
  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 
Real Estate Investing

  	 	21	 	  	 	20	 	  	 	20	 	  	 	19	 	  	 	17	 
  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 
Merchant Banking:

  				  				  				  				  			
Private Equity

  	 	9	 	  	 	9	 	  	 	9	 	  	 	9	 	  	 	9	 
FrontPoint(2)

  	 	—  	 	  	 	—  	 	  	 	—  	 	  	 	—  	 	  	 	1	 
  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 
Total Merchant Banking

  	 	9	 	  	 	9	 	  	 	9	 	  	 	9	 	  	 	10	 
  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 
Total assets under management or supervision

  	$	373	 	  	$	338	 	  	$	353	 	  	$	314	 	  	$	283	 
  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 
Share of minority stake assets(2)(3)

  	$	6	 	  	$	5	 	  	$	6	 	  	$	5	 	  	$	7	 
 

(1)	The alternatives asset class includes a range of investment products such as funds of hedge funds, funds of private equity funds and funds of real estate funds.
(2)	On March 1, 2011, the Company and the principals of FrontPoint Partners LLC (“FrontPoint”) completed a transaction whereby FrontPoint senior management and portfolio managers own a majority equity stake in FrontPoint, and the Company retains a minority stake. At December 31, 2011, the assets under management attributed to FrontPoint are represented within the share of minority stake assets.
(3)	Amounts represent the Investment Management business segment’s proportional share of assets managed by entities in which it owns a minority stake.
 

 	79	 	LOGO
Table of Contents
Activity in the Investment Management business segment’s assets under management or supervision during 2013, 2012 and 2011 was as follows:

 

 	  	2013	 	 	2012	 	 	2011	 
 	  	(dollars in billions)	 
Balance at beginning of period

  	$	338	 	 	$	287	 	 	$	272	 
Net flows by asset class:

  				 				 			
Traditional Asset Management:

  				 				 			
Equity

  	 	(1	) 	 	 	(2	) 	 	 	4	 
Fixed income(1)

  	 	—  	 	 	 	(1	) 	 	 	(6	) 
Liquidity

  	 	12	 	 	 	26	 	 	 	20	 
Alternatives(2)

  	 	2	 	 	 	1	 	 	 	8	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Total Traditional Asset Management

  	 	13	 	 	 	24	 	 	 	26	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Real Estate Investing

  	 	(1	) 	 	 	1	 	 	 	1	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Merchant Banking:

  				 				 			
Private Equity

  	 	1	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 
FrontPoint(3)

  	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	(1	) 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Total Merchant Banking

  	 	1	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	(1	) 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Total net flows

  	 	13	 	 	 	25	 	 	 	26	 
Net market appreciation (depreciation)

  	 	22	 	 	 	26	 	 	 	(7	) 
Decrease due to FrontPoint transaction

  	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	(4	) 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Total net increase

  	 	35	 	 	 	51	 	 	 	15	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Balance at end of period

  	$	373	 	 	$	338	 	 	$	287	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
 

(1)	Fixed income outflows for 2011 include $1.3 billion due to the revised treatment of assets under management previously reported as a net flow.
(2)	The alternatives asset class includes a range of investment products such as funds of hedge funds, funds of private equity funds and funds of real estate funds.
(3)	The amount in 2011 includes two months of net flows related to FrontPoint.
 

2013 Compared with 2012.

 

Investment Banking.    The Investment Management business segment generates investment banking revenues primarily from the placement of investments in real estate and merchant banking funds.

 

Trading.    See “Business Segments—Net Revenues” herein for information about the composition of Trading revenues.

 

The Company recognized gains of $41 million in 2013 compared with losses of $45 million in 2012. Trading results in 2013 primarily reflected gains related to certain consolidated real estate funds sponsored by the Company. Trading results in 2012 primarily reflected losses related to certain consolidated real estate funds sponsored by the Company, as well as losses on hedges on certain investments.

 

Investments.    Real estate and private equity investments generally are held for long-term appreciation and generally are subject to significant sales restrictions. Estimates of the fair value of the investments involve significant judgment and may fluctuate significantly over time in light of business, market, economic and financial conditions generally or in relation to specific transactions.

 

The Company recorded net investment gains of $1,056 million in 2013 compared with gains of $513 million in 2012. The increase in 2013 was primarily related to higher net investment gains predominantly within the

 

80

LOGO

Table of Contents
Company’s Merchant Banking and Real Estate Investing businesses and higher gains on certain investments associated with the Company’s employee deferred compensation and co-investment plans. Results in 2013 also included the benefit of carried interest.

 

Asset Management, Distribution and Administration Fees.    “See Business Segments—Net Revenues” herein for information about the composition of Asset management, distribution and administration fees.

 

Asset management, distribution and administration fees increased 9% to $1,853 million in 2013. The increase primarily reflected higher management and administration revenues, primarily due to higher average assets under management, as well as higher performance fees.

 

The Company’s assets under management increased $35 billion from $338 billion at December 31, 2012 to $373 billion at December 31, 2013, reflecting market appreciation and positive net flows. The Company recorded $22 billion in market appreciation and net inflows of $13 billion in 2013, primarily reflecting net customer inflows in liquidity funds. In 2012, the Company recorded $26 billion in market appreciation and $25 billion in net customer inflows primarily in liquidity funds.

 

Other.    Other revenues were $33 million in 2013 as compared with $55 million in 2012. The results in 2013 included higher revenues associated with the Company’s minority investment in Avenue Capital Group, a New York-based investment manager, partially offset by lower revenues associated with the Company’s minority investment in Lansdowne Partners, a London-based investment manager. The results in 2012 included gains associated with the expiration of a lending facility to a real estate fund sponsored by the Company.

 

Non-interest Expenses.    Non-interest expenses were $2,004 million in 2013 as compared with $1,629 million in 2012. Compensation and benefits expenses increased 41% in 2013, primarily due to higher net revenues. Non-compensation expenses increased 4% in 2013, primarily due to higher brokerage and clearing and professional services expenses, partially offset by lower information processing expenses.

 

2012 Compared with 2011.

 

Trading.    In 2012, the Company recognized losses of $45 million compared with losses of $22 million in 2011. Trading results in 2012 primarily reflected losses related to certain consolidated real estate funds sponsored by the Company, as well as losses on hedges on certain investments. Trading results in 2011 primarily reflected losses related to certain investments associated with the Company’s employee deferred compensation and co-investment plans and certain consolidated real estate funds sponsored by the Company.

 

Investments.    The Company recorded net investment gains of $513 million in 2012 compared with gains of $330 million in 2011. The increase in 2012 was primarily related to higher net gains in the Company’s Merchant Banking business, as well as higher net investment gains associated with certain consolidated real estate funds sponsored by the Company.

 

Asset Management, Distribution and Administration Fees.    Asset management, distribution and administration fees increased 8% to $1,703 million in 2012. The increase in 2012 primarily reflected higher management and administration revenues and higher performance fees.

 

The Company’s assets under management increased $51 billion from $287 billion at December 31, 2011 to $338 billion at December 31, 2012, reflecting $26 billion in market appreciation and net customer inflows of $25 billion primarily in liquidity funds. In 2011, net inflows of $26 billion primarily reflected the sweep of the Wealth Management JV client cash balances of approximately $19 billion into Morgan Stanley managed liquidity funds and inflows of $8 billion into alternatives funds, partially offset by outflows of $6 billion in fixed income products.

 

81

LOGO

Table of Contents
Other.    Other revenues were $55 million in 2012 as compared with $25 million in 2011. The results in 2012 included gains associated with the expiration of a lending facility to a real estate fund sponsored by the Company. The results in 2012 also included lower revenues associated with the Company’s minority investments in Avenue Capital Group and Lansdowne Partners. The results in 2011 were partially offset by a $27 million writedown in the Company’s minority investment in FrontPoint.

 

Non-interest Expenses.    Non-interest expenses were $1,629 million in 2012 as compared with $1,634 million in 2011. Compensation and benefits expenses decreased 1% in 2012. Non-compensation expenses were relatively unchanged in 2012 compared with 2011.

 

Income Tax Items.

 

In 2012, the Company recognized in income from continuing operations an out-of-period net tax provision of $107 million, attributable to the Investment Management business segment, primarily related to the overstatement of deferred tax assets associated with partnership investments in prior years. The Company has evaluated the effects of the understatement of the income tax provision both qualitatively and quantitatively and concluded that it did not have a material impact on any prior annual or quarterly consolidated financial statements.

 

Discontinued Operations.

 

In the fourth quarter of 2011, the Company classified a real estate property management company as held for sale within the Investment Management business segment. The transaction closed during the first quarter of 2012. The results of this company are reported as discontinued operations for all periods presented.

 

For further information on discontinued operations, see Note 1 to the consolidated financial statements in Item 8.

 

Nonredeemable Noncontrolling Interests.

 

Nonredeemable noncontrolling interests are primarily related to the consolidation of certain real estate funds sponsored by the Company. Investment gains associated with these consolidated funds were $151 million, $225 million and $180 million in 2013, 2012 and 2011, respectively.

 

82

LOGO

Table of Contents
Accounting Developments.

 

Reclassification of Residential Real Estate Collateralized Consumer Mortgage Loans upon Foreclosure.

 

In January 2014, the Financial Accounting Standards Board (the “FASB”) issued an accounting update clarifying when an in-substance repossession or foreclosure occurs; that is, when a creditor should be considered to have received physical possession of residential real estate property collateralizing a consumer mortgage loan such that the loan receivable should be derecognized and the real estate property recognized. This guidance is effective for the Company beginning January 1, 2015. This guidance can be applied using either a modified retrospective transition method or a prospective transition method. This guidance is not expected to have a material impact on the Company’s consolidated financial statements.

 

Accounting for Investments in Qualified Affordable Housing Projects.

 

In January 2014, the FASB issued an accounting update providing guidance on accounting for investments by a reporting entity in flow-through limited liability entities that manage or invest in affordable housing projects that qualify for the low-income housing tax credit. The amendments permit reporting entities to make an accounting policy election to account for their investments in qualified affordable housing projects using the proportional amortization method if certain conditions are met. Under the proportional amortization method, an entity amortizes the initial cost of the investment in proportion to the tax credits and other tax benefits received and recognizes the net investment performance in the income statement as a component of income tax expense (benefit). This guidance is effective for the Company retrospectively beginning January 1, 2015. Early adoption is permitted. The Company is currently evaluating the potential impact of adopting this accounting update.

 

Presentation of an Unrecognized Tax Benefit When a Net Operating Loss Carryforward, a Similar Tax Loss, or a Tax Credit Carryforward Exists.

 

In July 2013, the FASB issued an accounting update providing guidance on the financial statement presentation of an unrecognized tax benefit when a net operating loss carryforward, similar tax loss, or tax credit carryforward exists. This guidance requires an unrecognized tax benefit, or a portion of an unrecognized tax benefit, to be presented in the financial statements as a reduction to a deferred tax asset for a net operating loss carryforward, a similar tax loss, or a tax credit carryforward if such settlement is required or expected in the event the uncertain tax position is disallowed. This guidance is effective for the Company beginning January 1, 2014. This guidance is expected to be applied prospectively to all unrecognized tax benefits that exist at the effective date. The adoption of this accounting guidance is not expected to have a material impact on the Company’s consolidated financial statements.

 

Amendments to the Scope, Measurement, and Disclosure Requirements of an Investment Company.

 

In June 2013, the FASB issued an accounting update that modifies the criteria used in defining an investment company under GAAP and sets forth certain measurement and disclosure requirements. This update requires an investment company to measure noncontrolling interests in another investment company at fair value and requires an entity to disclose the fact that it is an investment company, and provide information about changes, if any, in its status as an investment company. An entity will also need to include disclosures around financial support that has been provided or is contractually required to be provided to any of its investees. This guidance is effective for the Company prospectively beginning January 1, 2014. The adoption of this accounting guidance did not have a material impact on the Company’s consolidated financial statements.

 

Parent’s Accounting for the Cumulative Translation Adjustment upon Derecognition of Certain Subsidiaries or Groups of Assets within a Foreign Entity or of an Investment in a Foreign Entity.

 

In March 2013, the FASB issued an accounting update requiring the parent entity to release any related cumulative translation adjustment into net income when the parent ceases to have a controlling financial interest

 

83

LOGO

Table of Contents
in a subsidiary that is a foreign entity. When the parent ceases to have a controlling financial interest in a subsidiary or group of assets that is a business within a foreign entity, the related cumulative translation adjustment would be released into net income only if the sale or transfer results in the complete or substantially complete liquidation of the foreign entity in which the subsidiary or group of assets had resided. This guidance is effective for the Company prospectively beginning on January 1, 2014. The adoption of this accounting guidance did not have a material impact on the Company’s consolidated financial statements.

 

Obligations Resulting from Joint and Several Liability Arrangements for Which the Total Amount of the Obligation Is Fixed at the Reporting Date.

 

In February 2013, the FASB issued an accounting update that requires an entity to measure obligations resulting from joint and several liability arrangements for which the total amount of the obligation is fixed at the reporting date, as the sum of the amount the reporting entity agreed to pay and any additional amount the reporting entity expects to pay on behalf of its co-obligors. This update also requires additional disclosures about those obligations. This guidance is effective for the Company retrospectively beginning on January 1, 2014. The adoption of this accounting guidance is not expected to have a material impact on the Company’s consolidated financial statements.

 

84

LOGO

Table of Contents
Other Matters.

 

Legal Matters.

 

On February 4, 2014, and subsequent to the release of the Company’s 2013 earnings on January 17, 2014, legal reserves were increased, which increased Other expenses within the Institutional Securities business segment in the fourth quarter and year ended December 31, 2013 by $150 million related to the settlement with the Federal Housing Finance Agency (see “Contingencies—Legal” in Note 13 to the consolidated financial statements in Item 8). This decreased diluted EPS and diluted EPS from continuing operations by $0.05 in the fourth quarter and year ended December 31, 2013.

 

Real Estate.

 

The Company acts as the general partner for various real estate funds and also invests in certain of these funds as a limited partner. The Company’s real estate investments at December 31, 2013 and December 31, 2012 are described below. Such amounts exclude investments associated with certain employee deferred compensation and co-investment plans.

 

At December 31, 2013 and December 31, 2012, the consolidated statements of financial condition included amounts representing real estate investment assets of consolidated subsidiaries of approximately $2.2 billion, including noncontrolling interests of approximately $1.8 billion in both periods, for a net amount of $0.5 billion and $0.4 billion, respectively. This net presentation is a non-GAAP financial measure that the Company considers to be a useful measure for the Company and investors to use in assessing the Company’s net exposure. In addition, the Company has contractual capital commitments, guarantees, lending facilities and counterparty arrangements with respect to real estate investments of $0.3 billion at December 31, 2013.

 

In addition to the Company’s real estate investments, the Company engages in various real estate-related activities, including origination of loans secured by commercial and residential properties. The Company also securitizes and trades in a wide range of commercial and residential real estate and real estate-related whole loans, mortgages and other real estate. In connection with these activities, the Company has provided, or otherwise agreed to be responsible for, representations and warranties. Under certain circumstances, the Company may be required to repurchase such assets or make other payments related to such assets if such representations and warranties were breached. The Company continues to monitor its real estate-related activities in order to manage its exposures and potential liability from these markets and businesses. See “Legal Proceedings—Residential Mortgage and Credit Crisis Related Matters” in Part I, Item 3 and Note 13 to the consolidated financial statements in Item 8 for further information.

 

Japanese Securities Joint Venture.

 

The Company holds a 40% voting interest and MUFG holds a 60% voting interest in MUMSS, while the Company holds a 51% voting interest and MUFG holds a 49% voting interest in MSMS. The Company consolidates MSMS in its consolidated financial statements and accounts for its interest in MUMSS as an equity method investment within the Institutional Securities business segment (see Note 22 to the consolidated financial statements in Item 8). During 2013, 2012 and 2011, the Company recorded income (loss) of $570 million, $152 million and $(783) million, respectively, within Other revenues in the consolidated statements of income, arising from the Company’s 40% stake in MUMSS.

 

In order to enhance the risk management at MUMSS, during 2011, the Company entered into a transaction with MUMSS whereby the risk associated with the fixed income trading positions that previously caused the majority of the aforementioned MUMSS losses in 2011 was transferred to MSMS. In return for entering into the transaction, the Company received total consideration of $659 million, which represented the estimated fair value of the fixed income trading positions transferred.

 

To the extent that losses incurred by MUMSS result in a requirement to restore its capital, MUFG is solely responsible for providing this additional capital to a minimum level, whereas the Company is not obligated to

 

 	85	 	LOGO
Table of Contents
contribute additional capital to MUMSS. To the extent that MUMSS is required to increase its capital level due to factors other than losses, such as changes in regulatory requirements, both MUFG and the Company are required to contribute the necessary capital based upon their economic interest as set forth above.

 

In June 2013, MUMSS paid a dividend of approximately $287 million, of which the Company received approximately $115 million for its proportionate share of MUMSS.

 

See Note 22 to the consolidated financial statements in Item 8 and “Executive Summary—Significant Items—Japanese Securities Joint Venture” herein for further information.

 

Defined Benefit Pension and Other Postretirement Plans.

 

Expense.    The Company recognizes the compensation cost of an employee’s pension benefits (including prior-service cost) over the employee’s estimated service period. This process involves making certain estimates and assumptions, including the discount rate and the expected long-term rate of return on plan assets. The defined benefit pension plan that is qualified under Section 401(a) of the Internal Revenue Code (the “U.S. Qualified Plan”) ceased future benefit accruals after December 31, 2010. Any benefits earned by participants under the U.S. Qualified Plan at December 31, 2010 were preserved and will be payable based on the U.S. Qualified Plan’s provisions. Net periodic pension expense for U.S. and non-U.S. plans was $97 million, $99 million and $72 million for 2013, 2012 and 2011, respectively.

 

Contributions.    The Company made contributions of $42 million, $42 million and $57 million to its U.S. and non-U.S. defined benefit pension plans in 2013, 2012 and 2011, respectively. These contributions were funded with cash from operations.

 

The Company determines the amount of its pension contributions to its funded plans by considering several factors, including the level of plan assets relative to plan liabilities, the types of assets in which the plans are invested, expected plan liquidity needs and expected future contribution requirements. The Company’s policy is to fund at least the amounts sufficient to meet minimum funding requirements under applicable employee benefit and tax laws (for example, in the U.S., the minimum required contribution under the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, or “ERISA”). At December 31, 2013, December 31, 2012 and December 31, 2011, there were no minimum required ERISA contributions for the U.S. Qualified Plan. No contributions were made to the U.S. Qualified Plan for 2013, 2012 and 2011.

 

See Note 19 to the consolidated financial statements in Item 8 for more information on the Company’s defined benefit pension and postretirement plans.

 

Income Tax Matters.

 

The income of certain foreign subsidiaries earned outside the United States has been excluded from taxation in the U.S. as a result of a provision of U.S. tax law that defers the imposition of tax on certain active financial services income until such income is repatriated to the United States as a dividend. This provision, which expired for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2014, had previously been extended by Congress on several occasions, including the most recent extension that occurred on January 2, 2013, as part of the Relief Act. If this provision is not extended, the overall financial impact to the Company would depend upon the level, composition and geographic mix of future earnings but could increase the Company’s 2014 annual effective tax rate and have an adverse impact on the Company’s net income, but not its cash flows due to utilization of tax attributes carryforwards.

 

86

LOGO

Table of Contents
Regulatory Outlook.

 

The Dodd-Frank Act was enacted on July 21, 2010. While certain portions of the Dodd-Frank Act became effective immediately, most other portions are effective following transition periods or through numerous rulemakings by multiple governmental agencies, and although a large number of rules have been proposed, many are still subject to final rulemaking or transition periods. U.S. regulators also plan to propose additional regulations to implement the Dodd-Frank Act. Accordingly, it remains difficult to assess fully the impact that the Dodd-Frank Act will have on the Company and on the financial services industry generally. In addition, various international developments, such as the adoption of or further revisions to risk-based capital, leverage and liquidity standards by the Basel Committee, including Basel III, and the implementation of those standards in jurisdictions in which the Company operates, will continue to impact the Company in the coming years.

 

At the end of 2013, the U.S. regulators adopted the final Volcker Rule regulations. Banking entities, including the Company, generally have until July 21, 2015 to bring all of their activities and investments into conformance with the Volcker Rule, subject to possible extensions. The Company is continuing its review of activities that may be affected by the Volcker Rule, including its trading operations and asset management activities, and is taking steps to establish the necessary compliance programs to comply with the Volcker Rule. Given the complexity of the new framework, the full impact of the Volcker Rule is still uncertain, and will ultimately depend on the interpretation and implementation by the five regulatory agencies responsible for its oversight.

 

It is likely that 2014 and subsequent years will see further material changes in the way major financial institutions are regulated in both the U.S. and other markets in which the Company operates, although it remains difficult to predict the exact impact these changes will have on the Company’s business, financial condition, results of operations and cash flows for a particular future period. See also “Business—Supervision and Regulation” in Part I, Item 1.

 

 	87	 	LOGO
Table of Contents
Critical Accounting Policies.

 

The Company’s consolidated financial statements are prepared in accordance with accounting principles generally accepted in the U.S., which require the Company to make estimates and assumptions (see Note 1 to the consolidated financial statements in Item 8). The Company believes that of its significant accounting policies (see Note 2 to the consolidated financial statements in Item 8), the following policies involve a higher degree of judgment and complexity.

 

Fair Value.

 

Financial Instruments Measured at Fair Value.    A significant number of the Company’s financial instruments are carried at fair value. The Company makes estimates regarding valuation of assets and liabilities measured at fair value in preparing the consolidated financial statements. These assets and liabilities include, but are not limited to:

 

 	•	 	
Trading assets and Trading liabilities;

 

 	•	 	
Securities available for sale;

 

 	•	 	
Securities received as collateral and Obligation to return securities received as collateral;

 

 	•	 	
Certain Securities purchased under agreements to resell;

 

 	•	 	
Certain Deposits;

 

 	•	 	
Certain Commercial paper and other short-term borrowings, primarily structured notes;

 

 	•	 	
Certain Securities sold under agreements to repurchase;

 

 	•	 	
Certain Other secured financings; and

 

 	•	 	
Certain Long-term borrowings, primarily structured notes.

 

Fair value is defined as the price that would be received to sell an asset or paid to transfer a liability (i.e., the “exit price”) in an orderly transaction between market participants at the measurement date.

 

In determining fair value, the Company uses various valuation approaches. A hierarchy for inputs is used in measuring fair value that maximizes the use of observable prices and inputs and minimizes the use of unobservable prices and inputs by requiring that the relevant observable inputs be used when available. The hierarchy is broken down into three levels, wherein Level 1 uses observable prices in active markets, and Level 3 consists of valuation techniques that incorporate significant unobservable inputs and, therefore, require the greatest use of judgment. In periods of market disruption, the observability of prices and inputs may be reduced for many instruments. This condition could cause an instrument to be recategorized from Level 1 to Level 2 or Level 2 to Level 3. In addition, a downturn in market conditions could lead to declines in the valuation of many instruments. For further information on the valuation process, fair value definition, Level 1, Level 2, Level 3 and related valuation techniques, and quantitative information about and sensitivity of significant unobservable inputs used in Level 3 fair value measurements, see Notes 2 and 4 to the consolidated financial statements in Item 8.

 

Assets and Liabilities Measured at Fair Value on a Non-recurring Basis.    At December 31, 2013, certain of the Company’s assets were measured at fair value on a non-recurring basis, primarily relating to loans, other investments, premises, equipment and software costs, and intangible assets. The Company incurs losses or gains for any adjustments of these assets to fair value. A downturn in market conditions could result in impairment charges in future periods.

 

For assets and liabilities measured at fair value on a non-recurring basis, fair value is determined by using various valuation approaches. The same hierarchy as described above, which maximizes the use of observable inputs and minimizes the use of unobservable inputs by generally requiring that the observable inputs be used when available, is used in measuring fair value for these items.

 

88

LOGO

Table of Contents
See Note 4 to the consolidated financial statements in Item 8 for further information on assets and liabilities that are measured at fair value on a non-recurring basis.

 

Fair Value Control Processes.    The Company employs control processes to validate the fair value of its financial instruments, including those derived from pricing models. These control processes are designed to ensure that the values used for financial reporting are based on observable inputs wherever possible. In the event that observable inputs are not available, the control processes are designed to assure that the valuation approach utilized is appropriate and consistently applied and that the assumptions are reasonable.

 

See Note 2 to the consolidated financial statements in Item 8 for additional information regarding the Company’s valuation policies, processes and procedures.

 

Goodwill and Intangible Assets.

 

Goodwill.    The Company tests goodwill for impairment on an annual basis on July 1 and on an interim basis when certain events or circumstances exist. The Company tests for impairment at the reporting unit level, which is generally at the level of or one level below its business segments. Goodwill no longer retains its association with a particular acquisition once it has been assigned to a reporting unit. As such, all the activities of a reporting unit, whether acquired or organically developed, are available to support the value of the goodwill. For both the annual and interim tests, the Company has the option to first assess qualitative factors to determine whether the existence of events or circumstances leads to a determination that it is more likely than not that the fair value of a reporting unit is less than its carrying amount. If after assessing the totality of events or circumstances, the Company determines it is more likely than not that the fair value of a reporting unit is greater than its carrying amount, then performing the two-step impairment test is not required. However, if the Company concludes otherwise, then it is required to perform the first step of the two-step impairment test. Goodwill impairment is determined by comparing the estimated fair value of a reporting unit with its respective carrying value. If the estimated fair value exceeds the carrying value, goodwill at the reporting unit level is not deemed to be impaired. If the estimated fair value is below carrying value, however, further analysis is required to determine the amount of the impairment. Additionally, if the carrying value of a reporting unit is zero or a negative value and it is determined that it is more likely than not the goodwill is impaired, further analysis is required. The estimated fair value of the reporting units is derived based on valuation techniques the Company believes market participants would use for each of the reporting units. The estimated fair value is generally determined by utilizing a discounted cash flow methodology or methodologies that incorporate price-to-book and price-to-earnings multiples of certain comparable companies. At each annual goodwill impairment testing date, each of the Company’s reporting units with goodwill had a fair value that was substantially in excess of its carrying value.

 

Intangible Assets.    Amortizable intangible assets are amortized over their estimated useful lives and are reviewed for impairment on an interim basis when certain events or circumstances exist. An impairment exists when the carrying amount of the intangible asset exceeds its fair value. An impairment loss will be recognized only if the carrying amount of the intangible asset is not recoverable and exceeds its fair value. The carrying amount of the intangible asset is not recoverable if it exceeds the sum of the expected undiscounted cash flows.

 

For both goodwill and intangible assets, to the extent an impairment loss is recognized, the loss establishes the new cost basis of the asset. Subsequent reversal of impairment losses is not permitted. For amortizable intangible assets, the new cost basis is amortized over the remaining useful life of that asset. Adverse market or economic events could result in impairment charges in future periods.

 

See Notes 4 and 9 to the consolidated financial statements in Item 8 for additional information about goodwill and intangible assets.

 

89

LOGO

Table of Contents
Legal and Regulatory Contingencies.

 

In the normal course of business, the Company has been named, from time to time, as a defendant in various legal actions, including arbitrations, class actions and other litigation, arising in connection with its activities as a global diversified financial services institution.

 

Certain of the actual or threatened legal actions include claims for substantial compensatory and/or punitive damages or claims for indeterminate amounts of damages. In some cases, the entities that would otherwise be the primary defendants in such cases are bankrupt or in financial distress.

 

The Company is also involved, from time to time, in other reviews, investigations and proceedings (both formal and informal) by governmental and self-regulatory agencies regarding the Company’s business, and involving, among other matters, sales and trading activities, financial products or offerings sponsored, underwritten or sold by the Company, and accounting and operational matters, certain of which may result in adverse judgments, settlements, fines, penalties, injunctions or other relief.

 

Accruals for litigation and regulatory proceedings are generally determined on a case-by-case basis. Where available information indicates that it is probable a liability had been incurred at the date of the consolidated financial statements and the Company can reasonably estimate the amount of that loss, the Company accrues the estimated loss by a charge to income. In many proceedings, however, it is inherently difficult to determine whether any loss is probable or even possible or to estimate the amount of any loss. For certain legal proceedings and investigations, the Company can estimate possible losses, additional losses, ranges of loss or ranges of additional loss in excess of amounts accrued. For certain other legal proceedings and investigations, the Company cannot reasonably estimate such losses, particularly for proceedings and investigations where the factual record is being developed or contested or where plaintiffs or government entities seek substantial or indeterminate damages, restitution, disgorgement or penalties. Numerous issues may need to be resolved, including through potentially lengthy discovery and determination of important factual matters, determination of issues related to class certification and the calculation of damages or other relief, and by addressing novel or unsettled legal questions relevant to the proceedings or investigations in question, before a loss or additional loss or range of loss or additional loss can be reasonably estimated for a proceeding or investigation.

 

Significant judgment is required in deciding when and if to make these accruals and the actual cost of a legal claim or regulatory fine/penalty may ultimately be materially different from the recorded accruals.

 

See Note 13 to the consolidated financial statements in Item 8 for additional information on legal proceedings.

 

Income Taxes.

 

The Company is subject to the income and indirect tax laws of the U.S., its states and municipalities and those of the foreign jurisdictions in which the Company has significant business operations. These tax laws are complex and subject to different interpretations by the taxpayer and the relevant governmental taxing authorities. The Company must make judgments and interpretations about the application of these inherently complex tax laws when determining the provision for income taxes and the expense for indirect taxes and must also make estimates about when certain items affect taxable income in the various tax jurisdictions. Disputes over interpretations of the tax laws may be settled with the taxing authority upon examination or audit. The Company periodically evaluates the likelihood of assessments in each taxing jurisdiction resulting from current and subsequent years’ examinations, and unrecognized tax benefits related to potential losses that may arise from tax audits are established in accordance with the guidance on accounting for unrecognized tax benefits. Once established, unrecognized tax benefits are adjusted when there is more information available or when an event occurs requiring a change.

 

The Company’s provision for income taxes is composed of current and deferred taxes. Current income taxes approximate taxes to be paid or refunded for the current period. The Company’s deferred income taxes reflect the net tax effects of temporary differences between the financial reporting and tax bases of assets and liabilities and are measured using the applicable enacted tax rates and laws that will be in effect when such differences are

 

90

LOGO

Table of Contents
expected to reverse. The Company’s deferred tax balances also include deferred assets related to tax attributes carryforwards, such as net operating losses and tax credits that will be realized through reduction of future tax liabilities and, in some cases, are subject to expiration if not utilized within certain periods. The Company performs regular reviews to ascertain whether deferred tax assets are realizable. These reviews include management’s estimates and assumptions regarding future taxable income and incorporate various tax planning strategies, including strategies that may be available to utilize net operating losses before they expire. Once the deferred tax asset balances have been determined, the Company may record a valuation allowance against the deferred tax asset balances to reflect the amount of these balances (net of valuation allowance) that the Company estimates it is more likely than not to realize at a future date. Both current and deferred income taxes could reflect adjustments related to the Company’s unrecognized tax benefits.

 

Significant judgment is required in estimating the consolidated provision for (benefit from) income taxes, current and deferred tax balances (including valuation allowance, if any), accrued interest or penalties and uncertain tax positions. Revisions in our estimates and/or the actual costs of a tax assessment may ultimately be materially different from the recorded accruals and unrecognized tax benefits, if any.

 

See Note 2 to the consolidated financial statements in Item 8 for additional information on the Company’s significant assumptions, judgments and interpretations associated with the accounting for income taxes and Note 20 to the consolidated financial statements in Item 8 for additional information on the Company’s tax examinations.

 

 	91	 	LOGO
Table of Contents
Liquidity and Capital Resources.

 

The Company’s senior management establishes liquidity and capital policies. Through various risk and control committees, the Company’s senior management reviews business performance relative to these policies, monitors the availability of alternative sources of financing, and oversees the liquidity and interest rate and currency sensitivity of the Company’s asset and liability position. The Company’s Treasury Department, Firm Risk Committee, Asset and Liability Management Committee and other control groups assist in evaluating, monitoring and controlling the impact that the Company’s business activities have on its consolidated statements of financial condition, liquidity and capital structure. Liquidity and capital matters are reported regularly to the Board’s Risk Committee.

 

The Balance Sheet.

 

The Company monitors and evaluates the composition and size of its balance sheet on a regular basis. The Company’s balance sheet management process includes quarterly planning, business specific limits, monitoring of business specific usage versus limits, key metrics and new business impact assessments.

 

The Company establishes balance sheet limits at the consolidated, business segment and business unit levels. The Company monitors balance sheet usage versus limits, and variances resulting from business activity or market fluctuations are reviewed. On a regular basis, the Company reviews current performance versus limits and assesses the need to re-allocate limits based on business unit needs. The Company also monitors key metrics, including asset and liability size, composition of the balance sheet, limit utilization and capital usage.

 

The tables below summarize total assets for the Company’s business segments at December 31, 2013 and December 31, 2012:

 

 	  	At December 31, 2013	 
 	  	Institutional
Securities	 	  	Wealth
Management	 	  	Investment
Management	 	  	Total	 
 	  	(dollars in millions)	 
Assets

  				  				  				  			
Cash and cash equivalents(1)

  	$	30,169	 	  	$	28,967	 	  	$	747	 	  	$	59,883	 
Cash deposited with clearing organizations or segregated under federal and other regulations or requirements(2)

  	 	36,422	 	  	 	2,781	 	  	 	—  	 	  	 	39,203	 
Trading assets

  	 	273,959	 	  	 	2,104	 	  	 	4,681	 	  	 	280,744	 
Securities available for sale

  	 	—  	  	  	 	53,430	 	  	 	—  	 	  	 	53,430	 
Securities received as collateral(2)

  	 	20,508	 	  	 	—  	 	  	 	—  	 	  	 	20,508	 
Federal funds sold and securities purchased under agreements to resell(2)

  	 	106,812	 	  	 	11,318	 	  	 	—  	 	  	 	118,130	 
Securities borrowed(2)

  	 	129,366	 	  	 	341	 	  	 	—  	 	  	 	129,707	 
Customer and other receivables(2)

  	 	33,927	 	  	 	22,493	 	  	 	684	 	  	 	57,104	 
Loans, net of allowance

  	 	17,890	 	  	 	24,984	 	  	 	—  	 	  	 	42,874	 
Other assets(3)

  	 	19,543	 	  	 	10,293	 	  	 	1,283	 	  	 	31,119	 
  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 
Total assets(4)

  	$	668,596	 	  	$	156,711	 	  	$	7,395	 	  	$	832,702	 
  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 
 

92

LOGO

Table of Contents
 	  	At December 31, 2012	 
 	  	Institutional
Securities(5)	 	  	Wealth
Management(5)	 	  	Investment
Management	 	  	Total	 
 	  	(dollars in millions)	 
Assets

  				  				  				  			
Cash and cash equivalents(1)

  	$	33,370	 	  	$	12,714	 	  	$	820	 	  	$	46,904	 
Cash deposited with clearing organizations or segregated under federal and other regulations or requirements(2)

  	 	26,116	 	  	 	4,854	 	  	 	—  	 	  	 	30,970	 
Trading assets

  	 	260,885	 	  	 	2,285	 	  	 	4,433	 	  	 	267,603	 
Securities available for sale

  	 	—  	 	  	 	39,869	 	  	 	—  	 	  	 	39,869	 
Securities received as collateral(2)

  	 	14,278	 	  	 	—  	 	  	 	—  	 	  	 	14,278	 
Federal funds sold and securities purchased under agreements to resell(2)

  	 	120,957	 	  	 	13,455	 	  	 	—  	 	  	 	134,412	 
Securities borrowed(2)

  	 	121,302	 	  	 	399	 	  	 	—  	 	  	 	121,701	 
Customer and other receivables(2)

  	 	39,362	 	  	 	24,161	 	  	 	765	 	  	 	64,288	 
Loans, net of allowance

  	 	12,078	 	  	 	16,968	 	  	 	—  	 	  	 	29,046	 
Other assets(3)

  	 	19,701	 	  	 	10,860	 	  	 	1,328	 	  	 	31,889	 
  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 
Total assets(4)

  	$	648,049	 	  	$	125,565	 	  	$	7,346	 	  	$	780,960	 
  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 
 

(1)	Cash and cash equivalents include Cash and due from banks and Interest bearing deposits with banks.
(2)	Certain of these assets are included in secured financing assets (see “Secured Financing” herein).
(3)	Other assets include Other investments; Premises, equipment and software costs; Goodwill; Intangible assets; and Other assets.
(4)	Total assets include Global Liquidity Reserves of $202 billion and $182 billion at December 31, 2013 and December 31, 2012, respectively. The Global Liquidity Reserve at December 31, 2013 was higher than the preceding year, primarily due to approximately $26 billion of deposits relating to customer accounts that were transferred to the Company’s depository institutions from Citi during 2013 (see Note 3 to the consolidated financial statements in Item 8).
(5)	On January 1, 2013, the International Wealth Management business was transferred from the Wealth Management business segment to the Equity division within the Institutional Securities business segment. Accordingly, prior-period amounts have been recast to reflect the International Wealth Management business as part of the Institutional Securities business segment.
 

A substantial portion of the Company’s total assets consists of liquid marketable securities and short-term receivables arising principally from sales and trading activities in the Institutional Securities business segment. The liquid nature of these assets provides the Company with flexibility in managing the size of its balance sheet. The Company’s total assets increased to $832,702 million at December 31, 2013 from $780,960 million at December 31, 2012. The increase in total assets was primarily due to an increase in Cash and cash equivalents, Securities available for sale and loans, net of allowances (see Notes 3 and 25 to the consolidated financial statements in Item 8).

 

The Company’s assets and liabilities are primarily related to transactions attributable to sales and trading and securities financing activities. At December 31, 2013, securities financing assets and liabilities were $352 billion and $353 billion, respectively. At December 31, 2012, securities financing assets and liabilities were $348 billion and $300 billion, respectively. Securities financing transactions include cash deposited with clearing organizations or segregated under federal and other regulations or requirements, repurchase and resale agreements, securities borrowed and loaned transactions, securities received as collateral and obligation to return securities received, and customer and other receivables and payables. Securities borrowed or purchased under agreements to resell and securities loaned or sold under agreements to repurchase are treated as collateralized financings (see Notes 2 and 6 to the consolidated financial statements in Item 8). Securities sold under agreements to repurchase and Securities loaned were $178 billion at December 31, 2013 and averaged $176 billion during 2013. Securities purchased under agreements to resell and Securities borrowed were $248 billion at December 31, 2013 and averaged $281 billion during 2013. The Securities purchased under agreements to resell and Securities borrowed period-end balance was lower than the average balances during the year ended December 31, 2013 due to a reduction in the Company’s requirements for collateral over the period.

 

 	93	 	LOGO
Table of Contents
Securities financing assets and liabilities also include matched book transactions with minimal market, credit and/or liquidity risk. Matched book transactions accommodate customers, as well as obtain securities for the settlement and financing of inventory positions. The customer receivable portion of the securities financing transactions includes customer margin loans, collateralized by customer-owned securities, and customer cash, which is segregated in accordance with regulatory requirements. The customer payable portion of the securities financing transactions primarily includes customer payables to the Company’s prime brokerage customers. The Company’s risk exposure on these transactions is mitigated by collateral maintenance policies that limit the Company’s credit exposure to customers. Included within securities financing assets were $21 billion and $14 billion at December 31, 2013 and December 31, 2012, respectively, recorded in accordance with accounting guidance for the transfer of financial assets that represented offsetting assets and liabilities for fully collateralized non-cash loan transactions.

 

Liquidity Risk Management Framework.

 

The primary goal of the Company’s liquidity risk management framework is to ensure that the Company has access to adequate funding across a wide range of market conditions. The framework is designed to enable the Company to fulfill its financial obligations and support the execution of the Company’s business strategies.

 

The following principles guide the Company’s liquidity risk management framework:

 

 	•	 	
Sufficient liquid assets should be maintained to cover maturing liabilities and other planned and contingent outflows;

 

 	•	 	
Maturity profile of assets and liabilities should be aligned, with limited reliance on short-term funding;

 

 	•	 	
Source, counterparty, currency, region, and term of funding should be diversified; and

 

 	•	 	
Limited access to funding should be anticipated through the Contingency Funding Plan (“CFP”).

 

The core components of the Company’s liquidity risk management framework are the CFP, Liquidity Stress Tests and the Global Liquidity Reserve (as defined below), which support the Company’s target liquidity profile.

 

Contingency Funding Plan.

 

The Company’s CFP describes the data and information flows, limits, targets, operating environment indicators, escalation procedures, roles and responsibilities, and available mitigating actions in the event of a liquidity stress. The CFP also sets forth the principal elements of the Company’s liquidity stress testing which identifies stress events of different severity and duration, assesses current funding sources and uses and establishes a plan for monitoring and managing a potential liquidity stress event.

 

Liquidity Stress Tests.

 

The Company uses liquidity stress tests to model liquidity outflows across multiple scenarios over a range of time horizons. These scenarios contain various combinations of idiosyncratic and systemic stress events.

 

The assumptions underpinning the Liquidity Stress Tests include, but are not limited to, the following:

 

 	•	 	
No government support;

 

 	•	 	
No access to equity and unsecured debt markets;

 

 	•	 	
Repayment of all unsecured debt maturing within the stress horizon;

 

 	•	 	
Higher haircuts and significantly lower availability of secured funding;

 

 	•	 	
Additional collateral that would be required by trading counterparties, certain exchanges and clearing organizations related to credit rating downgrades;

 

94

LOGO

Table of Contents
 	•	 	
Additional collateral that would be required due to collateral substitutions, collateral disputes and uncalled collateral;

 

 	•	 	
Discretionary unsecured debt buybacks;

 

 	•	 	
Drawdowns on unfunded commitments provided to third parties;

 

 	•	 	
Client cash withdrawals and reduction in customer short positions that fund long positions;

 

 	•	 	
Limited access to the foreign exchange swap markets;

 

 	•	 	
Return of securities borrowed on an uncollateralized basis; and

 

 	•	 	
Maturity roll-off of outstanding letters of credit with no further issuance.

 

The Liquidity Stress Tests are produced for the Parent and major operating subsidiaries, as well as at major currency levels, to capture specific cash requirements and cash availability across the Company. The Liquidity Stress Tests assume that subsidiaries will use their own liquidity first to fund their obligations before drawing liquidity from the Parent. The Parent will support its subsidiaries and will not have access to subsidiaries’ liquidity reserves that are subject to any regulatory, legal or tax constraints.

 

At December 31, 2013, the Company maintained sufficient liquidity to meet current and contingent funding obligations as modeled in its Liquidity Stress Tests.

 

Global Liquidity Reserve.

 

The Company maintains sufficient liquidity reserves (“Global Liquidity Reserve”) to cover daily funding needs and to meet strategic liquidity targets sized by the CFP and Liquidity Stress Tests. The size of the Global Liquidity Reserve is actively managed by the Company. The following components are considered in sizing the Global Liquidity Reserve: unsecured debt maturity profile, balance sheet size and composition, funding needs in a stressed environment inclusive of contingent cash outflows and collateral requirements. In addition, the Global Liquidity Reserve includes an additional reserve, which is primarily a discretionary surplus based on the Company’s risk tolerance and is subject to change dependent on market and firm-specific events.

 

The Global Liquidity Reserve is held within the Parent and major operating subsidiaries. The Global Liquidity Reserve is composed of diversified cash and cash equivalents and highly liquid unencumbered securities. Eligible unencumbered securities include U.S. government securities, U.S. agency securities, U.S. agency mortgage-backed securities, non-U.S. government securities and other highly liquid investment grade securities.

 

Global Liquidity Reserve by Type of Investment.

 

The table below summarizes the Company’s Global Liquidity Reserve by type of investment:

 

 	  	At
December  31,
2013	 
 	  	(dollars in billions)	 
Cash deposits with banks

  	$	18	 
Cash deposits with central banks

  	 	36	 
Unencumbered highly liquid securities:

  			
U.S. government obligations

  	 	84	 
U.S. agency and agency mortgage-backed securities

  	 	23	 
Non-U.S. sovereign obligations(1)

  	 	23	 
Investments in money market funds

  	 	1	 
Other investment grade securities

  	 	17	 
  	
 

 

 
Global Liquidity Reserve

  	$	202	 
  	
 

 

 
 

(1)	Non-U.S. sovereign obligations are composed of unencumbered German, French, Dutch, U.K., Brazilian and Japanese government obligations.
 

 	95	 	LOGO
Table of Contents
The ability to monetize assets during a liquidity crisis is critical. The Company believes that the assets held in the Global Liquidity Reserve can be monetized within five business days in a stressed environment given the highly liquid and diversified nature of the reserves. The currency profile of the Global Liquidity Reserve is consistent with the CFP and Liquidity Stress Tests. In addition to the Global Liquidity Reserve, the Company has other cash and cash equivalents and other unencumbered assets that are available for monetization that are not included in the balances in the table above.

 

Global Liquidity Reserve Held by Bank and Non-Bank Legal Entities.

 

The table below summarizes the Global Liquidity Reserve held by bank and non-bank legal entities:

 

 	  	At December 31,
2013	 	  	Average Balance(1)
2013	 
 	  	(dollars in billions)	 
Bank legal entities:

  				  			
Domestic

  	$	85	 	  	$	70	 
Foreign

  	 	4	 	  	 	5	 
  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 
Total Bank legal entities

  	 	89	 	  	 	75	 
  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 
Non-Bank legal entities:

  				  			
Domestic(2)

  	 	80	 	  	 	83	 
Foreign

  	 	33	 	  	 	34	 
  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 
Total Non-Bank legal entities

  	 	113	 	  	 	117	 
  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 
Total

  	$	202	 	  	$	192	 
  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 
 

(1)	The Company calculates the average Global Liquidity Reserve based upon daily amounts.
(2)	The Parent held $58 billion at December 31, 2013, which averaged $63 billion during 2013.
 

The Company is exposed to intra-day settlement risk in connection with liquidity provided to its major broker-dealer subsidiaries for intra-day clearing and settlement of its securities and financing activity.

 

Basel Liquidity Framework.

 

The Basel Committee has developed two standards intended for use in liquidity risk supervision: the Liquidity Coverage Ratio (“LCR”) and the Net Stable Funding Ratio (“NSFR”).

 

The LCR was developed to ensure banks have sufficient high-quality liquid assets to cover net cash outflows arising from significant stress over 30 calendar days. This standard’s objective is to promote the short-term resilience of the liquidity risk profile of banks and bank holding companies. The Company is compliant with the Basel Committee’s version of the LCR, which stipulates that the ratio of the Company’s portfolio of unencumbered high-quality liquid assets to total net cash outflows over a 30-day standardized supervisory liquidity stress scenario must be at least 100%.

 

The NSFR has a time horizon of one year and is defined as the ratio of the amount of available stable funding to the amount of required stable funding. This standard’s objective is to promote resilience over a longer time horizon. In January 2014, the Basel Committee proposed revisions to the original December 2010 version of the NSFR and continues to contemplate the introduction of the NSFR, including any final revisions, as a minimum standard by January 1, 2018.

 

In late October 2013, the U.S. banking regulators proposed a rule to implement the LCR in the United States (“U.S. LCR proposal”). The U.S. LCR proposal would apply to the Company and MSBNA and MSPBNA (the “Subsidiary Banks”). The U.S. LCR proposal is more stringent in certain respects compared with the Basel Committee’s version of the LCR, and includes a generally narrower definition of high-quality liquid assets, a

 

96

LOGO

Table of Contents
different methodology for calculating net cash outflows during the 30-day stress period as well as a shorter, two-year phase-in period that ends on December 31, 2016. The Company continues to evaluate the U.S. LCR proposal and its potential impact on the Company’s current liquidity and funding requirements.

 

Funding Management.

 

The Company manages its funding in a manner that reduces the risk of disruption to the Company’s operations. The Company pursues a strategy of diversification of secured and unsecured funding sources (by product, by investor and by region) and attempts to ensure that the tenor of the Company’s liabilities equals or exceeds the expected holding period of the assets being financed.

 

The Company funds its balance sheet on a global basis through diverse sources. These sources may include the Company’s equity capital, long-term debt, repurchase agreements, securities lending, deposits, commercial paper, letters of credit and lines of credit. The Company has active financing programs for both standard and structured products targeting global investors and currencies.

 

Secured Financing.    A substantial portion of the Company’s total assets consists of liquid marketable securities and arises principally from its Institutional Securities business segment’s sales and trading activities. The liquid nature of these assets provides the Company with flexibility in funding these assets with secured financing. The Company’s goal is to achieve an optimal mix of durable secured and unsecured financing. Secured financing investors principally focus on the quality of the eligible collateral posted. Accordingly, the Company actively manages its secured financing book based on the quality of the assets being funded.

 

The Company utilizes shorter-term secured financing only for highly liquid assets and has established longer tenor limits for less liquid asset classes, for which funding may be at risk in the event of a market disruption. The Company defines highly liquid assets as those that are consistent with the standards of the Global Liquidity Reserve, and less liquid assets as those that do not meet these standards. At December 31, 2013, the weighted average maturity of the Company’s secured financing against less liquid assets was greater than 120 days. To further minimize the refinancing risk of secured financing for less liquid assets, the Company has established concentration limits to diversify its investor base and reduce the amount of monthly maturities for secured financing of less liquid assets. Furthermore, the Company obtains spare capacity, or term secured funding liabilities in excess of less liquid inventory, as an additional risk mitigant to replace maturing trades in the event that secured financing markets or our ability to access them become limited. Finally, in addition to the above risk management framework, the Company holds a portion of its Global Liquidity Reserve against the potential disruption to its secured financing capabilities.

 

Unsecured Financing.    The Company views long-term debt and deposits as stable sources of funding. Unencumbered securities and non-security assets are financed with a combination of long- and short-term debt and deposits. The Company’s unsecured financings include structured borrowings, whose payments and redemption values are based on the performance of certain underlying assets, including equity, credit, foreign exchange, interest rates and commodities. When appropriate, the Company may use derivative products to conduct asset and liability management and to make adjustments to the Company’s interest rate and structured borrowings risk profile (see Note 12 to the consolidated financial statements in Item 8).

 

Short-Term Borrowings.    The Company’s unsecured short-term borrowings consist of commercial paper, bank loans, bank notes and structured notes with maturities of 12 months or less at issuance.

 

 	97	 	LOGO
Table of Contents
The table below summarizes the Company’s short-term unsecured borrowings:

 

 	  	At
December 31,
2013	 	  	At
December 31,
2012	 
 	  	(dollars in millions)	 
Commercial paper

  	$	8	 	  	$	306	 
Other short-term borrowings

  	 	2,134	 	  	 	1,832	 
  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 
  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 
Total

  	$	2,142	 	  	$	2,138	 
  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 
 

Deposits.    The Company’s bank subsidiaries’ funding sources include time deposits, money market deposit accounts, demand deposit accounts, repurchase agreements, federal funds purchased, commercial paper and Federal Home Loan Bank advances. The vast majority of deposits in the Subsidiary Banks are sourced from the Company’s retail brokerage accounts and are considered to have stable, low-cost funding characteristics. Concurrent with the acquisition of the remaining 35% stake in the Wealth Management JV, the deposit sweep agreement between Citi and the Company was terminated. In 2013, $26 billion of deposits held by Citi relating to customer accounts were transferred to the Company’s depository institutions. At December 31, 2013, approximately $30 billion of additional deposits are scheduled to be transferred to the Company’s depository institutions on an agreed-upon basis through June 2015 (see Note 3 to the consolidated financial statements in Item 8).

 

Deposits were as follows:

 

 	  	At
December 31,
2013(1)	 	  	At
December 31,
2012(1)	 
 	  	(dollars in millions)	 
Savings and demand deposits(2)

  	$	109,908	 	  	$	80,058	 
Time deposits(3)

  	 	2,471	 	  	 	3,208	 
  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 
Total

  	$	112,379	 	  	$	83,266	 
  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 
 

(1)	Total deposits subject to FDIC insurance at December 31, 2013 and December 31, 2012 were $84 billion and $62 billion, respectively.
(2)	There were no non-interest bearing deposits at December 31, 2013. Amounts include non-interest bearing deposits of $1,037 million at December 31, 2012.
(3)	Certain time deposit accounts are carried at fair value under the fair value option (see Note 4 to the consolidated financial statements in Item 8).
 

Senior Indebtedness.    At December 31, 2013, the aggregate outstanding carrying amount of the Company’s senior indebtedness was approximately $143 billion (including guaranteed obligations of the indebtedness of subsidiaries) compared with $158 billion at December 31, 2012. The decrease in the amount of senior indebtedness was primarily due to repayments of notes, offset by new issuances of long-term borrowings.

 

Long-Term Borrowings.    The Company believes that accessing debt investors through multiple distribution channels helps provide consistent access to the unsecured markets. In addition, the issuance of long-term debt allows the Company to reduce reliance on short-term credit sensitive instruments (e.g., commercial paper and other unsecured short-term borrowings). Long-term borrowings are generally managed to achieve staggered maturities, thereby mitigating refinancing risk, and to maximize investor diversification through sales to global institutional and retail clients across regions, currencies and product types. Availability and cost of financing to the Company can vary depending on market conditions, the volume of certain trading and lending activities, the Company’s credit ratings and the overall availability of credit.

 

The Company may engage in various transactions in the credit markets (including, for example, debt retirements) that it believes are in the best interests of the Company and its investors.

 

98

LOGO

Table of Contents
Long-term borrowings at December 31, 2013 consisted of the following:

 

 	  	Parent	 	  	Subsidiaries	 	  	Total	 
 	  	(dollars in millions)	 
Due in 2014

  	$	22,495	 	  	$	1,698	 	  	$	24,193	 
Due in 2015

  	 	19,722	 	  	 	1,368	 	  	 	21,090	 
Due in 2016

  	 	21,142	 	  	 	2,002	 	  	 	23,144	 
Due in 2017

  	 	24,458	 	  	 	1,837	 	  	 	26,295	 
Due in 2018

  	 	13,575	 	  	 	1,733	 	  	 	15,308	 
Thereafter

  	 	41,913	 	  	 	1,632	 	  	 	43,545	 
  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 
Total

  	$	143,305	 	  	$	10,270	 	  	$	153,575	 
  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 
 

Long-Term Borrowing Activity in 2013.    During 2013, the Company issued and reissued notes with a principal amount of approximately $28 billion. This amount included the Company’s issuance of $2.0 billion in subordinated debt on November 22, 2013, $2.0 billion in subordinated debt on May 21, 2013, $3.7 billion in senior unsecured debt on April 25, 2013 and $4.5 billion in senior unsecured debt on February 25, 2013. In connection with the note issuances, the Company generally enters into certain transactions to obtain floating interest rates. The weighted average maturity of the Company’s long-term borrowings, based upon stated maturity dates, was approximately 5.4 years at December 31, 2013. During 2013, approximately $39 billion in aggregate long-term borrowings matured or were retired. Subsequent to December 31, 2013 and through February 10, 2014, the Company’s long-term borrowings (net of issuances) decreased by approximately $2.2 billion. This amount includes the Company’s issuance of $2.8 billion in senior debt on January 24, 2014.

 

Credit Ratings.

 

The Company relies on external sources to finance a significant portion of its day-to-day operations. The cost and availability of financing generally is impacted by the Company’s credit ratings. In addition, the Company’s credit ratings can have an impact on certain trading revenues, particularly in those businesses where longer term counterparty performance is a key consideration, such as OTC derivative transactions, including credit derivatives and interest rate swaps. Rating agencies will look at company specific factors; other industry factors such as regulatory or legislative changes; the macro-economic environment and perceived levels of government support, among other things.

 

Some rating agencies have stated that they currently incorporate various degrees of credit rating uplift from external sources of potential support, as well as perceived government support of systemically important banks, including the credit ratings of the Company. Rating agencies continue to monitor the progress of U.S. financial reform legislation to assess whether the possibility of extraordinary government support for the financial system in any future financial crises is negatively impacted. Legislative and rulemaking outcomes may lead to reduced uplift assumptions for U.S. banks and thereby place downward pressure on credit ratings. For example, in November 2013, Moody’s Investor Services, Inc. (“Moody’s”) took certain ratings actions with respect to eight large U.S. banking groups, including downgrading the Company, to remove certain uplift from the U.S. government support in their ratings. At the same time, proposed and final U.S. financial reform legislation and attendant rulemaking also have positive implications for credit ratings such as higher standards for capital and liquidity levels. The net result on credit ratings and the timing of any change in rating agency views on changes in government support and other financial reform is currently uncertain.

 

 	99	 	LOGO
Table of Contents
At January 31, 2014, the Parent’s and MSBNA’s senior unsecured ratings were as set forth below:

 

 	 	Parent	 	Morgan Stanley Bank, N.A.
 	 	Short-Term
Debt	 	Long-Term
Debt	 	Rating
Outlook	 	Short-Term
Debt	 	Long-Term
Debt	 	Rating
Outlook
DBRS, Inc.

 	R-1 (middle)	 	A (high)	 	Negative	 	—  	 	—  	 	—  
Fitch Ratings, Inc.

 	F1	 	A	 	Stable	 	F1	 	A	 	Stable
Moody’s Investor Services, Inc.(1)

 	P-2	 	Baa2	 	Stable	 	P-2	 	A3	 	Stable
Rating and Investment Information, Inc.

 	a-1	 	A	 	Negative	 	—  	 	—  	 	—  
Standard & Poor’s Financial Services LLC(2)

 	A-2	 	A-	 	Negative	 	A-1	 	A	 	Negative
 

(1)	On August 22, 2013, Moody’s placed the senior and subordinated debt ratings of the holding companies for the six largest U.S. banks on review as it continued to consider reducing its government (or systemic) support assumptions to reflect the impact of U.S. bank resolution policies. As part of this review, Moody’s placed the Company’s “Baa1” long-term senior, “Baa2” long-term subordinated and “P-2” short-term on review for downgrade. On November 14, 2013, Moody’s downgraded the Company’s long-term debt rating one-notch from “Baa1” to “Baa2” and left the short-term rating unchanged at “P-2”. A stable outlook was assigned to the Parent’s rating outlook.
(2)	On June 11, 2013, Standard & Poor’s Financial Services LLC (“S&P”) announced that it continues to assess the degree to which it factors extraordinary government support into its ratings on non-operating bank holding companies and was factoring that assessment into the negative outlooks on the non-operating bank holding companies of the eight U.S. bank groups that S&P classifies as having high systematic importance. S&P’s negative outlook for the Company’s issuer credit ratings reflects not only S&P’s continued assessment of extraordinary government support, but also the impact that recently finalized regulations, particularly the Volcker Rule, could have on the Company’s business.
 

In connection with certain OTC trading agreements and certain other agreements where the Company is a liquidity provider to certain financing vehicles associated with the Institutional Securities business segment, the Company may be required to provide additional collateral or immediately settle any outstanding liability balances with certain counterparties or pledge additional collateral to certain exchanges and clearing organizations in the event of a future credit rating downgrade irrespective of whether the Company is in a net asset or liability position.

 

The additional collateral or termination payments that may be called in the event of a future credit rating downgrade vary by contract and can be based on ratings by either or both of Moody’s and S&P. At December 31, 2013, the future potential collateral amounts and termination payments that could be called or required by counterparties or exchanges and clearing organizations in the event of one-notch or two-notch downgrade scenarios based on the relevant contractual downgrade triggers were $1,522 million and an incremental $3,321 million, respectively.

 

While certain aspects of a credit rating downgrade are quantifiable pursuant to contractual provisions, the impact it will have on the Company’s business and results of operation in future periods is inherently uncertain and will depend on a number of interrelated factors, including, among others, the magnitude of the downgrade, individual client behavior and future mitigating actions the Company may take. The liquidity impact of additional collateral requirements is included in the Company’s Liquidity Stress Tests.

 

Capital Management.

 

The Company’s senior management views capital as an important source of financial strength. The Company actively manages its consolidated capital position based upon, among other things, business opportunities, risks, capital availability and rates of return together with internal capital policies, regulatory requirements and rating agency guidelines and, therefore, in the future may expand or contract its capital base to address the changing needs of its businesses. The Company attempts to maintain total capital, on a consolidated basis, at least equal to the sum of its operating subsidiaries’ equity.

 

At December 31, 2013, the Company had approximately $1.2 billion remaining under its current share repurchase program out of the $6 billion authorized by the Board of Directors in December 2006. The share

 

100

LOGO

Table of Contents
repurchase program is for capital management purposes and considers, among other things, business segment capital needs as well as equity-based compensation and benefit plan requirements. Share repurchases by the Company are subject to regulatory approval.

 

In July 2013, the Company received no objection from the Federal Reserve to repurchase through March 31, 2014, up to $500 million of the Company’s outstanding common stock under rules relating to annual capital distributions (Title 12 of the Code of Federal Regulations, Section 225.8, Capital Planning). Share repurchases are made pursuant to the share repurchase program previously authorized by the Company’s Board of Directors and are exercised from time to time at prices the Company deems appropriate subject to various factors, including the Company’s capital position and market conditions. The share repurchases may be effected through open market purchases or privately negotiated transactions, including through Rule 10b5-1 plans, and may be suspended at any time (see also “Market for Registrant’s Common Equity, Related Stockholder Matters and Issuer Purchases of Equity Securities” in Item 5). During 2013, the Company repurchased approximately $350 million of the Company’s outstanding common stock as part of its share repurchase program.

 

Series E Preferred Stock.    On September 30, 2013, the Company issued 34,500,000 Depositary Shares, for an aggregate price of $862 million. Each Depositary Share represents a 1/1,000th interest in a share of perpetual Series E Fixed-to-Floating Rate Non-Cumulative Preferred Stock, $0.01 par value (“Series E Preferred Stock”). The Series E Preferred Stock is redeemable at the Company’s option, (i) in whole or in part, from time to time, on any dividend payment date on or after October 15, 2023 or (ii) in whole but not in part at any time within 90 days following a regulatory capital treatment event (as described in the terms of that series), in each case at a redemption price of $25,000 per share (equivalent to $25.00 per Depositary Share). The Series E Preferred Stock also has a preference over the Company’s common stock upon liquidation. The Series E Preferred Stock offering (net of related issuance costs) resulted in proceeds of approximately $854 million (see Note 15 to the consolidated financial statements in Item 8).

 

Series F Preferred Stock.    On December 10, 2013, the Company issued 34,000,000 Depositary Shares, for an aggregate price of $850 million. Each Depositary Share represents a 1/1,000th interest in a share of perpetual Series F Fixed-to-Floating Rate Non-Cumulative Preferred Stock, $0.01 par value (“Series F Preferred Stock”). The Series F Preferred Stock is redeemable at the Company’s option, (i) in whole or in part, from time to time, on any dividend payment date on or after January 15, 2024 or (ii) in whole but not in part at any time within 90 days following a regulatory capital treatment event (as described in the terms of that series), in each case at a redemption price of $25,000 per share (equivalent to $25.00 per Depositary Share). The Series F Preferred Stock also has a preference over the Company’s common stock upon liquidation. The Series F Preferred Stock offering (net of related issuance costs) resulted in proceeds of approximately $842 million (see Note 15 to the consolidated financial statements in Item 8).

 

The Board of Directors determines the declaration and payment of dividends on a quarterly basis. In January 2014, the Company announced that its Board of Directors declared a quarterly dividend per common share of $0.05. In December 2013, the Company also announced that the Board of Directors declared a quarterly dividend of $255.56 per share of Series A Floating Rate Non-Cumulative Preferred Stock (represented by Depositary Shares, each representing a 1/1,000th interest in a share of preferred stock and each having a dividend of $0.25556), a quarterly dividend of $25.00 per share of Series C Non-Cumulative Non-Voting Perpetual Preferred Stock, a quarterly dividend of $519.53 per share of Series E Fixed-to-Floating Rate Non-Cumulative Perpetual Preferred Stock and the initial quarterly dividend of $167.10 per share of Series F Fixed-to-Floating Rate Non-Cumulative Perpetual Preferred Stock.

 

 	101	 	LOGO
Table of Contents
The following table sets forth the Company’s tangible Morgan Stanley shareholders’ equity and tangible common equity at December 31, 2013 and December 31, 2012 and average balances during 2013:

 

 	  	Balance at	 	 	Average Balance(1)	 
 	  	December 31,
2013	 	 	December 31,
2012	 	 	2013	 
 	  	(dollars in millions)	 
Common equity

  	$	62,701	 	 	$	60,601	 	 	$	61,895	 
Preferred equity

  	 	3,220	 	 	 	1,508	 	 	 	1,839	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Morgan Stanley shareholders’ equity

  	 	65,921	 	 	 	62,109	 	 	 	63,734	 
Junior subordinated debentures issued to capital trusts

  	 	4,849	 	 	 	4,827	 	 	 	4,826	 
Less: Goodwill and net intangible assets(2)

  	 	(9,873	) 	 	 	(7,587	) 	 	 	(8,900	) 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Tangible Morgan Stanley shareholders’ equity

  	$	60,897	 	 	$	59,349	 	 	$	59,660	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Common equity

  	$	62,701	 	 	$	60,601	 	 	$	61,895	 
Less: Goodwill and net intangible assets(2)

  	 	(9,873	) 	 	 	(7,587	) 	 	 	(8,900	) 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Tangible common equity(3)

  	$	52,828	 	 	$	53,014	 	 	$	52,995	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
 

(1)	The Company calculates its average balances based upon month-end balances.
(2)	The goodwill and net intangible assets deduction exclude mortgage servicing rights (net of disallowable mortgage servicing rights) of $7 million and $6 million at December 31, 2013 and December 31, 2012, respectively, and include only the Company’s share of the Wealth Management JV’s goodwill and intangible assets at each respective period (100% at December 31, 2013 and 65% at December 31, 2012) (see Note 3 to the consolidated financial statements in Item 8). The increase in goodwill and net intangible assets at December 31, 2013 from December 31, 2012 is primarily due to the purchase of the remaining 35% interest in the Wealth Management JV.
(3)	Tangible common equity, a non-GAAP financial measure, equals common equity less goodwill and net intangible assets as defined above. The Company views tangible common equity as a useful measure to investors because it is a commonly utilized metric and reflects the common equity deployed in the Company’s businesses.
 

Capital Covenants.

 

In October 2006 and April 2007, the Company executed replacement capital covenants in connection with offerings by Morgan Stanley Capital Trust VII and Morgan Stanley Capital Trust VIII (the “Capital Securities”), which become effective after the scheduled redemption date in 2046. Under the terms of the replacement capital covenants, the Company has agreed, for the benefit of certain specified holders of debt, to limitations on its ability to redeem or repurchase any of the Capital Securities for specified periods of time. For a complete description of the Capital Securities and the terms of the replacement capital covenants, see the Company’s Current Reports on Form 8-K dated October 12, 2006 and April 26, 2007.

 

Regulatory Requirements.

 

Capital.

 

The Company is a financial holding company under the Bank Holding Company Act of 1956, as amended, and is subject to the regulation and oversight of the Federal Reserve. The Federal Reserve establishes capital requirements for the Company, including well-capitalized standards, and evaluates the Company’s compliance with such capital requirements. The Office of the Comptroller of the Currency (“OCC”) establishes similar capital requirements and standards for the Subsidiary Banks.

 

As of December 31, 2013, the Company calculated its capital ratios and RWAs in accordance with the existing capital adequacy standards for financial holding companies adopted by the Federal Reserve. These existing capital standards are based upon a framework described in the “International Convergence of Capital Measurement and Capital Standards,” July 1988, as amended, also referred to as Basel I. In December 2007, the U.S. banking regulators published final regulations incorporating the Basel II Accord, which requires internationally active U.S. banking organizations, as well as certain of their U.S. bank subsidiaries, to implement

 

102

LOGO

Table of Contents
Basel II standards over the next several years. On January 1, 2013, the U.S. banking regulators’ rules to implement the Basel Committee’s market risk capital framework amendment, commonly referred to as “Basel 2.5”, became effective, which increased the capital requirements for securitizations and correlation trading within the Company’s trading book, as well as incorporated add-ons for stressed VaR and incremental risk requirements (“market risk capital framework amendment”). The Company’s Total, Tier 1 and Tier 1 common capital ratios and RWAs subsequent to the Basel 2.5 effective date were calculated under this revised framework. The Company’s Total, Tier 1 and Tier 1 common capital ratios and RWAs prior to the Basel 2.5 effective date have not been recalculated under the revised framework. RWAs reflect both on- and off-balance sheet risk of the Company. The risk capital calculations will evolve over time as the Company enhances its risk management methodology and incorporates improvements in modeling techniques while maintaining compliance with the regulatory requirements and interpretations.

 

Market RWAs reflect capital charges attributable to the risk of loss resulting from adverse changes in market prices and other factors. For a further discussion of the Company’s market risks and models such as the VaR model, see “Quantitative and Qualitative Disclosures about Market Risk” in Item 7A.

 

Credit RWAs reflect capital charges attributable to the risk of loss arising from a borrower or counterparty failing to meet its financial obligations. For a further discussion of the Company’s credit risks, see “Quantitative and Qualitative Disclosures about Market Risk—Credit Risk” in Item 7A.

 

Existing Regulatory Capital Framework.

 

Under the Federal Reserve’s existing regulatory capital framework, total allowable capital is composed of Tier 1 capital, which includes Tier 1 common capital, and Tier 2 capital. Tier 1 common capital is defined as Tier 1 capital less qualifying perpetual preferred stock and qualifying restricted core capital elements (qualifying trust preferred securities and noncontrolling interests). Tier 1 capital consists predominantly of common shareholders’ equity as well as qualifying preferred stock and qualifying restricted core capital elements less goodwill, non-servicing intangible assets (excluding allowable mortgage servicing rights), net deferred tax assets (recoverable in excess of one year), an after-tax debt valuation adjustment and certain other deductions, including equity investments. The debt valuation adjustment in the table below represents the cumulative change in fair value of certain long-term and short-term borrowings that was attributable to the Company’s own instrument-specific credit spreads and is included in retained earnings. For a further discussion of fair value, see Note 4 to the consolidated financial statements in Item 8.

 

At December 31, 2013, the Company’s capital levels calculated under Basel I, inclusive of the market risk capital framework amendment, were in excess of well-capitalized levels with ratios of Tier 1 capital to RWAs of 15.7% and total capital to RWAs of 16.9% (6% and 10% being well-capitalized for regulatory purposes, respectively). The Company’s ratio of Tier 1 common capital to RWAs was 12.8% (5% under stressed conditions is the current minimum Tier 1 common ratio under the Federal Reserve’s Comprehensive Capital Analysis and Review (“CCAR”) framework). Financial holding companies, including the Company, are subject to a Tier 1 leverage ratio defined by the Federal Reserve. Consistent with the Federal Reserve’s definition, the Company calculated its Tier 1 leverage ratio as Tier 1 capital divided by adjusted average total assets (which reflects adjustments for disallowed goodwill, certain intangible assets, deferred tax assets, and financial and non-financial equity investments). The adjusted average total assets are derived using weekly balances for the period. At December 31, 2013, the Company was in compliance with the Federal Reserve’s Tier 1 leverage requirement with a Tier 1 leverage ratio of 7.6% (5% is the current well-capitalized standard for regulatory purposes).

 

 	103	 	LOGO
Table of Contents
The following table reconciles the Company’s total shareholders’ equity to Tier 1 common, Tier 1, Tier 2 and Total allowable capital as defined by the regulations issued by the Federal Reserve and presents the Company’s consolidated capital ratios at December 31, 2013 and December 31, 2012:

 

 	  	At
December 31,
2013	 	 	At
December 31,
2012	 
 	  	(dollars in millions)	 
Allowable capital

  

Common shareholders’ equity

  	$	62,701	 	 	$	60,601	 
Less: Goodwill

  	 	(6,595	) 	 	 	(6,650	) 
Less: Non-servicing intangible assets

  	 	(3,279	) 	 	 	(3,777	) 
Less: Net deferred tax assets

  	 	(2,879	) 	 	 	(4,785	) 
After-tax debt valuation adjustment

  	 	1,275	 	 	 	823	 
Other deductions

  	 	(1,306	) 	 	 	(1,418	) 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Tier 1 common capital

  	 	49,917	 	 	 	44,794	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Qualifying preferred stock

  	 	3,220	 	 	 	1,508	 
Qualifying restricted core capital elements

  	 	7,870	 	 	 	8,058	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Tier 1 capital

  	 	61,007	 	 	 	54,360	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Qualifying subordinated debt and restricted core capital elements

  	 	5,559	 	 	 	2,783	 
Other qualifying amounts

  	 	284	 	 	 	197	 
Other deductions

  	 	(850	) 	 	 	(714	) 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Tier 2 capital

  	 	4,993	 	 	 	2,266	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Total allowable capital

  	$	66,000	 	 	$	56,626	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Risk-weighted assets(1)

  				 			
Market risk

  	$	133,760	 	 	$	54,042	 
Credit risk

  	 	255,915	 	 	 	252,704	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Total

  	$	389,675	 	 	$	306,746	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Capital ratios

  				 			
Total capital ratio(1)

  	 	16.9	% 	 	 	18.5	% 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Tier 1 common capital ratio(1)

  	 	12.8	% 	 	 	14.6	% 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Tier 1 capital ratio(1)

  	 	15.7	% 	 	 	17.7	% 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Tier 1 leverage ratio

  	 	7.6	% 	 	 	7.1	% 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
 

(1)	Effective January 1, 2013, in accordance with the U.S. banking regulators’ rules the Company implemented the Basel Committee’s market risk capital framework amendment, commonly referred to as “Basel 2.5”, which increased the capital requirement for securitizations and correlation trading within the Company’s trading book as well as incorporated add-ons for stressed VaR and incremental risk requirements. Under the market risk capital framework amendment, total RWAs would have been approximately $424 billion at December 31, 2012. At December 31, 2012, the capital ratios would have been approximately as follows: Total capital ratio 13.4%, Tier 1 common capital ratio 10.6% and Tier 1 capital ratio 12.8%.
 

Capital Plans and Stress Tests.    In November 2011, the Federal Reserve issued a final rule regarding capital plans. The final rule requires large bank holding companies such as the Company to submit annual capital plans in order for the Federal Reserve to assess their systems and processes that incorporate forward-looking projections of revenues and losses to monitor and maintain their internal capital adequacy. The rule also requires that such companies receive no objection from the Federal Reserve before undertaking a capital action.

 

In addition, the Dodd-Frank Act imposes stress test requirements on large bank holding companies, including the Company. In October 2012, the Federal Reserve issued its stress test final rule under the Dodd-Frank Act, which requires the Company to conduct semi-annual company-run stress tests. The rule also subjects the Company to an

 

104

LOGO

Table of Contents
annual supervisory stress test conducted by the Federal Reserve. The capital planning and stress testing requirements for large bank holding companies form part of the Federal Reserve’s annual CCAR process.

 

The Company submitted its 2013 annual capital plan to the Federal Reserve in January 2013. In March 2013, the Federal Reserve published a summary of the supervisory stress test results of each company subject to the final rule, including the Company. The Company received no objection to its 2013 capital plan, including the acquisition of the remaining 35% interest in the Wealth Management JV, which was completed on June 28, 2013.

 

In September 2013, the Federal Reserve issued an interim final rule specifying how large bank holding companies, including the Company, should incorporate the U.S. Basel III capital standards into their 2014 capital plans and 2014 Dodd-Frank Act stress test results. Among other things, the interim final rule requires large bank holding companies to project both Tier 1 Common capital ratio using the methodology currently in effect under existing capital guidelines and Common Equity Tier 1 ratio under the U.S. Basel III capital standards after giving effect to phase-in provisions.

 

As part of the 2014 CCAR process, eight bank holding companies, including the Company, are required to factor in its stress test scenarios the default of its largest counterparty across its derivatives and securities financing transactions. The Company expects that by March 31, 2014, the Federal Reserve will either object or provide notice of non-objection to the Company’s 2014 capital plan that was submitted to the Federal Reserve on January 6, 2014.

 

The Dodd-Frank Act also requires a national bank with total consolidated assets of more than $10 billion to conduct an annual company-run stress test. Beginning in 2012, the OCC’s implementing regulation requires national banks with $50 billion or more in average total consolidated assets, including MSBNA, to conduct its Dodd-Frank Act stress test. MSBNA submitted its company-run stress test results to the OCC and the Federal Reserve on January 6, 2014. The OCC’s regulation also requires a national bank with more than $10 billion but less than $50 billion in average total consolidated assets, including MSPBNA, to submit the results of its Dodd-Frank Act stress test by March 31, 2014. However, MSPBNA was given an exemption by the OCC for the 2014 Dodd-Frank Act stress test.

 

Basel Capital Framework.

 

In December 2010, the Basel Committee reached an agreement on Basel III. In July 2013, the U.S. banking regulators promulgated final rules to implement many aspects of Basel III (the “U.S. Basel III final rule”). The Company became subject to the U.S. Basel III final rule beginning on January 1, 2014. Certain requirements in the U.S. Basel III final rule, including the minimum risk-based capital ratios and new capital buffers, will commence or be phased in over several years.

 

The U.S. Basel III final rule contains new capital standards that raise capital requirements, strengthen counterparty credit risk capital requirements, introduce a leverage ratio as a supplemental measure to the risk-based ratio and replace the use of externally developed credit ratings with alternatives such as the Organisation for Economic Co-operation and Development’s country risk classifications. Under the U.S. Basel III final rule, the Company is subject, on a fully phased in basis, to a minimum Common Equity Tier 1 risk-based capital ratio of 4.5%, a minimum Tier 1 risk-based capital ratio of 6% and a minimum total risk-based capital ratio of 8%. The Company is also subject to a 2.5% Common Equity Tier 1 capital conservation buffer and, if deployed, up to a 2.5% Common Equity Tier 1 countercyclical buffer on a fully phased-in basis by 2019. Failure to maintain such buffers will result in restrictions on the Company’s ability to make capital distributions, including the payment of dividends and the repurchase of stock, and to pay discretionary bonuses to executive officers. In addition, certain new items will be deducted from Common Equity Tier 1 capital and certain existing deductions will be modified. The majority of these capital deductions is subject to a phase-in schedule and will be fully phased in by 2018. Under the U.S. Basel III final rule, unrealized gains and losses on available-for-sale securities will be reflected in Common Equity Tier 1 capital, subject to a phase-in schedule.

 

Pursuant to the U.S. Basel III final rule, existing trust preferred securities will be fully phased out of the Company’s Tier 1 capital by January 1, 2016. Thereafter, existing trust preferred securities that do not satisfy the

 

 	105	 	LOGO
Table of Contents
U.S. Basel III final rule’s eligibility criteria for Tier 2 capital will be phased out of the Company’s regulatory capital by January 1, 2022.

 

U.S. banking regulators have published final regulations implementing a provision of the Dodd-Frank Act requiring that certain institutions supervised by the Federal Reserve, including the Company, be subject to minimum capital requirements that are not less than the generally applicable risk-based capital requirements. Currently, this minimum “capital floor” is based on Basel I. Beginning on January 1, 2015, the U.S. Basel III final rule will replace the current Basel I-based “capital floor” with a standardized approach that, among other things, modifies the existing risk weights for certain types of asset classes. The “capital floor” applies to the calculation of minimum risk-based capital requirements as well as the capital conservation buffer and, if deployed, the countercyclical capital buffer. Accordingly, the methods for calculating the Company’s capital ratios will change as the U.S. Basel III final rule’s revisions to the numerator and denominator are phased in and following the Company’s completion of the U.S. Basel III advanced approach parallel run period. These ongoing methodological changes may result in differences in the Company’s reported capital ratios from one reporting period to the next that are independent of changes to the Company’s capital base, asset composition, off-balance sheet exposures or risk profile.

 

In addition to the U.S. Basel III final rule, the Dodd-Frank Act requires the Federal Reserve to establish more stringent capital requirements for certain bank holding companies, including the Company. The Federal Reserve has indicated that it intends to address this requirement by implementing the Basel Committee’s capital surcharge for global systemically important banks (“G-SIB”). The Financial Stability Board (“FSB”) has provisionally identified the G-SIBs and assigned each G-SIB a Common Equity Tier 1 capital surcharge ranging from 1.0% to 2.5% of RWAs. The Company is provisionally assigned a G-SIB capital surcharge of 1.5%. The FSB has stated that it intends to update the list of G-SIBs annually.

 

The Company estimates its pro forma risk-based Common Equity Tier 1 capital ratio under the U.S. Basel III final rule’s advanced approaches method to be approximately 10.5% as of December 31, 2013. This estimate is based on the Company’s current understanding of the U.S. Basel III final rule and other factors, which may be subject to change as the Company receives additional clarification and implementation guidance from regulators relating to the U.S. Basel III final rule, and as the interpretation of the final rule evolves over time. On February 21, 2014, the Federal Reserve and the OCC approved the Company’s and the Subsidiary Banks’ respective use of the U.S. Basel III advanced approaches method to calculate and publicly disclose their risk-based capital ratios beginning with the second quarter of 2014. One of the stipulations for this approval is that the Company will be required to satisfy certain conditions, as agreed to with the regulators, regarding the modeling used to determine its estimated RWAs associated with operational risk. Pursuant to these conditions, the Company’s estimated operational risk RWAs could increase and thus reduce the pro forma Common Equity Tier 1 capital ratio as of December 31, 2013 by an amount up to approximately 50 basis points. The pro forma risk-based Common Equity Tier 1 capital ratio estimate is a non-GAAP financial measure that the Company considers to be a useful measure for evaluating compliance with new regulatory capital requirements that have not yet become effective. The pro forma risk-based Common Equity Tier 1 capital ratio estimate is based on shareholders’ equity, Common Equity Tier 1 capital, RWAs and certain other data inputs at December 31, 2013. This preliminary estimate is subject to risks and uncertainties that may cause actual results to differ materially and should not be taken as a projection of what the Company’s capital ratios, RWAs, earnings or other results will actually be at future dates. For a discussion of risks and uncertainties that may affect the future results of the Company, see “Risk Factors” in Part I, Item 1A.

 

The U.S. Basel III final rule also subjects certain banking organizations, including the Company, to a minimum supplementary leverage ratio of 3% starting on January 1, 2018. In January 2014, the Basel Committee finalized revisions to the denominator of the Basel III leverage ratio. The revised denominator differs from the supplementary leverage ratio in the U.S. Basel III final rule in the treatment of, among other things, derivatives, securities financing transactions and other off-balance sheet items. U.S. banking regulators may issue regulations to implement the revised Basel III leverage ratio.

 

106

LOGO

Table of Contents
The U.S. banking regulators have also proposed a rule to implement enhanced supplementary leverage standards for certain large bank holding companies and their insured depository institution subsidiaries, including the Company and the Subsidiary Banks. Under this proposal, a covered bank holding company would need to maintain a leverage buffer of Tier 1 capital of greater than 2% in addition to the 3% minimum (for a total of greater than 5%), in order to avoid limitations on capital distributions, including dividends and stock repurchases, and discretionary bonus payments to executive officers. This proposal would further establish a “well-capitalized” threshold based on a supplementary leverage ratio of 6% for insured depository institution subsidiaries, including the Subsidiary Banks. If this proposal is adopted, its requirements would become effective on January 1, 2018 with public disclosure beginning in 2015. Based on a preliminary analysis of the proposed standards, the Company expects to meet the supplementary leverage ratio of greater than 5% in 2015. As the enhanced supplementary leverage standards are currently proposals, and may change based on final rules issued by the U.S. banking regulators, the Company’s expectations are subject to risks and uncertainties that may affect future results of the Company. Further, the expectations should not be taken as a projection of what the Company’s supplemental leverage ratios or earnings or assets will actually be at future dates. For a discussion of risks and uncertainties that may affect the future results of the Company, see “Risk Factors” in Part I, Item 1A.

 

Required Capital.

 

The Company’s required capital (“Required Capital”) estimation is based on the Required Capital Framework, an internal capital adequacy measure. This framework is a risk-based use-of-capital measure, which is compared with the Company’s regulatory capital to ensure the Company maintains an amount of going concern capital after absorbing potential losses from extreme stress events where applicable, at a point in time. The Company defines the difference between its regulatory capital and aggregate Required Capital as Parent capital. Average Tier 1 common capital, aggregate Required Capital and Parent capital for 2013 were approximately $47.7 billion, $38.7 billion and $9.0 billion, respectively. The Company generally holds Parent capital for prospective regulatory requirements, organic growth, acquisitions and other capital needs.

 

Tier 1 common capital and common equity attribution to the business segments is based on capital usage calculated by the Required Capital Framework. In principle, each business segment is capitalized as if it were an independent operating entity with limited diversification benefit between the business segments. Required Capital is assessed at each business segment and further attributed to product lines. This process is intended to align capital with the risks in each business segment in order to allow senior management to evaluate returns on a risk-adjusted basis. The Required Capital Framework will evolve over time in response to changes in the business and regulatory environment and to incorporate enhancements in modeling techniques. The Company will continue to evaluate the framework with respect to the impact of future regulatory requirements, as appropriate.

 

The following table presents the business segments’ and Parent’s average Tier 1 common capital and average common equity for 2013 and 2012:

 

 	  	2013	 	  	2012	 
 	  	Average
Tier 1 Common
Capital	 	  	Average
Common
Equity	 	  	Average
Tier 1 Common
Capital	 	  	Average
Common
Equity	 
 	  	(dollars in billions)	 
Institutional Securities

  	$	32.7	 	  	$	37.9	 	  	$	22.3	 	  	$	29.0	 
Wealth Management

  	 	4.3	 	  	 	13.2	 	  	 	3.7	 	  	 	13.3	 
Investment Management

  	 	1.7	 	  	 	2.8	 	  	 	1.3	 	  	 	2.4	 
Parent capital(1)

  	 	9.0	 	  	 	8.0	 	  	 	15.5	 	  	 	16.1	 
  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 
Total

  	$	47.7	 	  	$	61.9	 	  	$	42.8	 	  	$	60.8	 
  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 
 

(1)	Effective January 2013, the Company updated its Required Capital Framework methodology to coincide with the regulatory changes that became effective in 2013. As a result of this update to the methodology, the majority of which was driven by the implementation of the market risk capital framework amendment, average Institutional Securities capital increased and average Parent capital decreased, partially offset by accretion of net income at December 31, 2013.
 

 	107	 	LOGO
Table of Contents
Off-Balance Sheet Arrangements with Unconsolidated Entities.

 

The Company enters into various arrangements with unconsolidated entities, including variable interest entities, primarily in connection with its Institutional Securities and Investment Management business segments.

 

Institutional Securities Activities.    The Company utilizes special purpose entities (“SPE”) primarily in connection with securitization activities. The Company engages in securitization activities related to commercial and residential mortgage loans, U.S. agency collateralized mortgage obligations, corporate bonds and loans, municipal bonds and other types of financial assets. The Company may retain interests in the securitized financial assets as one or more tranches of the securitization. These retained interests are included in the consolidated statements of financial condition at fair value. Any changes in the fair value of such retained interests are recognized in the consolidated statements of income. Retained interests in securitized financial assets were approximately $2.2 billion and $3.2 billion at December 31, 2013 and December 31, 2012, respectively, substantially all of which were related to U.S. agency collateralized mortgage obligations, commercial mortgage loan and residential mortgage loan securitization transactions. For further information about the Company’s securitization activities, see Note 7 to the consolidated financial statements in Item 8.

 

The Company has entered into liquidity facilities with SPEs and other counterparties, whereby the Company is required to make certain payments if losses or defaults occur. The Company often may have recourse to the underlying assets held by the SPEs in the event payments are required under such liquidity facilities (see Note 13 to the consolidated financial statements in Item 8).

 

Investment Management Activities.    As a general partner in certain private equity and real estate partnerships, the Company receives distributions from the partnerships according to the provisions of the partnership agreements. The Company may, from time to time, be required to return all or a portion of such distributions to the limited partners in the event the limited partners do not achieve a certain return as specified in various partnership agreements, subject to certain limitations. These amounts are noted in the table below under “General partner guarantees”.

 

Guarantees.    The Company discloses information about its obligations under certain guarantee arrangements. Guarantees are defined as contracts and indemnification agreements that contingently require a guarantor to make payments to the guaranteed party based on changes in an underlying measure (such as an interest or foreign exchange rate, a security or commodity price, an index, or the occurrence or non-occurrence of a specified event) related to an asset, liability or equity security of a guaranteed party. Guarantees are also defined as contracts that contingently require the guarantor to make payments to the guaranteed party based on another entity’s failure to perform under an agreement as well as indirect guarantees of the indebtedness of others.

 

The table below summarizes certain information regarding the Company’s obligations under guarantee arrangements at December 31, 2013:

 

 	 	Maximum Potential Payout/Notional	 	 	Carrying
Amount
(Asset)/
Liability	 	 	Collateral/
Recourse	 
 	Years to Maturity	 	 	 	 	 	 
Type of Guarantee

 	Less than 1	 	 	1-3	 	 	3-5	 	 	Over 5	 	 	Total	 	 	 
 	 	(dollars in millions)	 
Credit derivative contracts(1)

 	$	313,836	 	 	$	520,119	 	 	$	500,241	 	 	$	66,594	 	 	$	1,400,790	 	 	$	(16,994	) 	 	$	—  	 
Other credit contracts

 	 	75	 	 	 	441	 	 	 	529	 	 	 	816	 	 	 	1,861	 	 	 	(457	) 	 	 	—  	 
Non-credit derivative contracts(1)

 	 	1,249,932	 	 	 	794,776	 	 	 	353,559	 	 	 	474,921	 	 	 	2,873,188	 	 	 	54,098	 	 	 	—  	 
Standby letters of credit and other financial guarantees issued(2)(3)

 	 	1,024	 	 	 	812	 	 	 	1,205	 	 	 	5,652	 	 	 	8,693	 	 	 	(208	) 	 	 	7,016	 
Market value guarantees

 	 	—  	 	 	 	112	 	 	 	83	 	 	 	515	 	 	 	710	 	 	 	7	 	 	 	106	 
Liquidity facilities

 	 	2,328	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	2,328	 	 	 	(4	) 	 	 	3,042	 
Whole loan sales representations and warranties

 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	23,755	 	 	 	23,755	 	 	 	56	 	 	 	—  	 
Securitization representations and warranties

 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	67,249	 	 	 	67,249	 	 	 	82	 	 	 	—  	 
General partner guarantees

 	 	42	 	 	 	41	 	 	 	62	 	 	 	301	 	 	 	446	 	 	 	73	 	 	 	—  	 
 

108

LOGO

Table of Contents
 

(1)	Carrying amounts of derivative contracts are shown on a gross basis prior to cash collateral or counterparty netting. For further information on derivative contracts, see Note 12 to the consolidated financial statements in Item 8.
(2)	Approximately $2.0 billion of standby letters of credit are also reflected in the “Commitments” table below in primary and secondary lending commitments. Standby letters of credit are recorded at fair value within Trading assets or Trading liabilities in the consolidated statements of financial condition.
(3)	Amounts include guarantees issued by consolidated real estate funds sponsored by the Company of approximately $13.8 million. These guarantees relate to obligations of the fund’s investee entities, including guarantees related to capital expenditures and principal and interest debt payments.
 

In the ordinary course of business, the Company guarantees the debt and/or certain trading obligations (including obligations associated with derivatives, foreign exchange contracts and the settlement of physical commodities) of certain subsidiaries. These guarantees generally are entity or product specific and are required by investors or trading counterparties. The activities of the subsidiaries covered by these guarantees (including any related debt or trading obligations) are included in the Company’s consolidated financial statements.

 

See Note 13 to the consolidated financial statements in Item 8 for information on other guarantees and indemnities.

 

Commitments and Contractual Obligations.

 

The Company’s commitments associated with outstanding letters of credit and other financial guarantees obtained to satisfy collateral requirements, investment activities, corporate lending and financing arrangements, and mortgage lending at December 31, 2013 are summarized below by period of expiration. Since commitments associated with these instruments may expire unused, the amounts shown do not necessarily reflect the actual future cash funding requirements:

 

 	  	Years to Maturity	 	  	Total at
December 31,
2013	 
  	Less
than 1	 	  	1-3	 	  	3-5	 	  	Over 5	 	  
 	  	(dollars in millions)	 
Letters of credit and other financial guarantees obtained to satisfy collateral requirements

  	$	389	 	  	$	1	 	  	$	—  	 	  	$	1	 	  	$	391	 
Investment activities

  	 	518	 	  	 	70	 	  	 	30	 	  	 	447	 	  	 	1,065	 
Primary lending commitments—investment grade(1)

  	 	7,695	 	  	 	14,674	 	  	 	36,224	 	  	 	798	 	  	 	59,391	 
Primary lending commitments—non-investment grade(1)

  	 	1,657	 	  	 	5,402	 	  	 	10,066	 	  	 	2,119	 	  	 	19,244	 
Secondary lending commitments(2)

  	 	44	 	  	 	38	 	  	 	10	 	  	 	72	 	  	 	164	 
Commitments for secured lending transactions

  	 	1,094	 	  	 	166	 	  	 	—  	 	  	 	—  	 	  	 	1,260	 
Forward starting reverse repurchase agreements and securities borrowing agreements(3)(4)

  	 	44,890	 	  	 	—  	 	  	 	—  	 	  	 	—  	 	  	 	44,890	 
Commercial and residential mortgage-related commitments

  	 	1,199	 	  	 	48	 	  	 	301	 	  	 	313	 	  	 	1,861	 
Underwriting commitments

  	 	588	 	  	 	—  	 	  	 	—  	 	  	 	—  	 	  	 	588	 
Other lending commitments

  	 	2,660	 	  	 	340	 	  	 	193	 	  	 	128	 	  	 	3,321	 
  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 
Total

  	$	60,734	 	  	$	20,739	 	  	$	46,824	 	  	$	3,878	 	  	$	132,175	 
  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 
 

(1)	This amount includes $49.4 billion of investment grade and $12 billion of non-investment grade unfunded commitments accounted for as held for investment and $3.5 billion of investment grade and $4.6 billion of non-investment grade unfunded commitments accounted for as held for sale at December 31, 2013. The remainder of these lending commitments is carried at fair value.
(2)	These commitments are recorded at fair value within Trading assets and Trading liabilities in the consolidated statements of financial condition (see Note 4 to the consolidated financial statements in Item 8).
(3)	
The Company enters into forward starting reverse repurchase and securities borrowing agreements (agreements that have a trade date at or prior to December 31, 2013 and settle subsequent to period-end) that are primarily secured by collateral from U.S. government agency

 

 	109	 	LOGO
Table of Contents
 	
securities and other sovereign government obligations. These agreements primarily settle within three business days, and of the total amount at December 31, 2013, $42.9 billion settled within three business days.

(4)	The Company also has a contingent obligation to provide financing to a clearinghouse through which it clears certain transactions. The financing is required only upon the default of a clearinghouse member. The financing takes the form of a reverse repurchase facility, with a maximum amount of approximately $1.1 billion.
 

For further description of these commitments, see Note 13 to the consolidated financial statements in Item 8 and “Quantitative and Qualitative Disclosures about Market Risk—Risk Management—Credit Risk” in Item 7A.

 

In the normal course of business, the Company enters into various contractual obligations that may require future cash payments. Contractual obligations include long-term borrowings, other secured financings, contractual interest payments, contractual payments on time deposits, operating leases and purchase obligations. The Company’s future cash payments associated with certain of its obligations at December 31, 2013 are summarized below:

 

 	  	Payments Due in:	 
At December 31, 2013

  	2014	 	  	2015-2016	 	  	2017-2018	 	  	Thereafter	 	  	Total	 
 	  	(dollars in millions)	 
Long-term borrowings(1)

  	$	24,193	 	  	$	44,234	 	  	$	41,603	 	  	$	43,545	 	  	$	153,575	 
Other secured financings(1)

  	 	3,500	 	  	 	4,848	 	  	 	835	 	  	 	567	 	  	 	9,750	 
Contractual interest payments(2)

  	 	5,458	 	  	 	8,994	 	  	 	5,819	 	  	 	19,673	 	  	 	39,944	 
Time deposits(3)

  	 	2,432	 	  	 	51	 	  	 	—  	 	  	 	—  	 	  	 	2,483	 
Operating leases—office facilities(4)

  	 	672	 	  	 	1,277	 	  	 	1,035	 	  	 	2,712	 	  	 	5,696	 
Operating leases—equipment(4)

  	 	239	  	  	 	241	 	  	 	163	 	  	 	98	  	  	 	741	  
Purchase obligations(5)

  	 	634	 	  	 	597	 	  	 	301	 	  	 	125	 	  	 	1,657	 
  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 
Total(6)

  	$	37,128	  	  	$	60,242	  	  	$	49,756	  	  	$	66,720	  	  	$	213,846	  
  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 
 

(1)	See Note 11 to the consolidated financial statements in Item 8. Amounts presented for Other secured financings are financings with original maturities greater than one year.
(2)	Amounts represent estimated future contractual interest payments related to unsecured long-term borrowings based on applicable interest rates at December 31, 2013. Amounts include stated coupon rates, if any, on structured or index-linked notes.
(3)	Amounts represent contractual principal and interest payments related to time deposits primarily held at the Subsidiary Banks.
(4)	See Note 13 to the consolidated financial statements in Item 8.
(5)	Purchase obligations for goods and services include payments for, among other things, consulting, outsourcing, computer and telecommunications maintenance agreements and certain transmission, transportation and storage contracts related to the commodities business. Purchase obligations at December 31, 2013 reflect the minimum contractual obligation under legally enforceable contracts with contract terms that are both fixed and determinable. These amounts exclude obligations for goods and services that already have been incurred and are reflected on the Company’s consolidated statement of financial condition.
(6)	Amounts exclude unrecognized tax benefits, as the timing and amount of future cash payments are not determinable at this time (see Note 20 to the consolidated financial statements in Item 8 for further information).
 

Effects of Inflation and Changes in Foreign Exchange Rates.

 

To the extent that a worsening inflation outlook results in rising interest rates or has negative impacts on the valuation of financial instruments that exceed the impact on the value of the Company’s liabilities, it may adversely affect the Company’s financial position and profitability. Rising inflation may also result in increases in the Company’s non-interest expenses that may not be readily recoverable in higher prices of services offered.

 

A significant portion of the Company’s business is conducted in currencies other than the U.S. dollar, and changes in foreign exchange rates relative to the U.S. dollar, therefore, can affect the value of non-U.S. dollar net assets, revenues and expenses. Potential exposures as a result of these fluctuations in currencies are closely monitored, and, where cost-justified, strategies are adopted that are designed to reduce the impact of these fluctuations on the Company’s financial performance. These strategies may include the financing of non-U.S. dollar assets with direct or swap-based borrowings in the same currency and the use of currency forward contracts or the spot market in various hedging transactions related to net assets, revenues, expenses or cash flows.

 

110

LOGO

Table of Contents
Item  7A.    Quantitative and Qualitative Disclosures about Market Risk.

 

Risk Management.

 

Overview.

 

Management believes effective risk management is vital to the success of the Company’s business activities. Accordingly, the Company employs an enterprise risk management (“ERM”) framework to integrate the diverse roles of risk management into a holistic enterprise structure and to facilitate the incorporation of risk evaluation into decision-making processes across the Company. The Company has policies and procedures in place to identify, assess, monitor and manage the significant risks involved in the activities of its Institutional Securities, Wealth Management and Investment Management business segments as well as at the holding company level. Principal risks involved in the Company’s business activities include market, credit, capital and liquidity, operational, legal and regulatory risk.

 

The cornerstone of the Company’s risk management philosophy is the execution of risk-adjusted returns through prudent risk-taking that protects the Company’s capital base and franchise. Five key principles underlie this philosophy: comprehensiveness, independence, accountability, defined risk tolerance and transparency. The fast-paced, complex, and constantly evolving nature of global financial markets requires that the Company maintain a risk management culture that is incisive, knowledgeable about specialized products and markets, and subject to ongoing review and enhancement. To help ensure the efficacy of risk management, which is an essential component of the Company’s reputation, senior management requires thorough and frequent communication and the appropriate escalation of risk matters.

 

Risk Governance Structure.

 

Risk management at the Company requires independent company-level oversight, accountability of the Company’s business segments, and effective communication of risk matters to senior management and across the Company. The nature of the Company’s risks, coupled with its risk management philosophy, informs the Company’s risk governance structure. The Company’s risk governance structure is comprised of the Board of Directors; the Risk Committee of the Board (“BRC”), the Audit Committee of the Board (“BAC”), and the Operations and Technology Committee of the Board (“BOTC”); the Firm Risk Committee (“FRC”); functional risk and control committees; senior management oversight (including the Chief Executive Officer, Chief Risk Officer, Chief Financial Officer, Chief Legal Officer and Chief Compliance Officer); the Internal Audit Department and risk managers, committees, and groups within and across the Company’s business segments. A risk governance structure composed of independent but complementary entities facilitates efficient and comprehensive supervision of the Company’s risk exposures and processes.

 

Morgan Stanley Board of Directors.    The Board of Directors has oversight for the Company’s ERM framework and is responsible for helping to ensure that the Company’s risks are managed in a sound manner. The Board has authorized the committees within the ERM framework to help facilitate its risk oversight responsibilities.

 

Risk Committee of the Board.    The BRC is composed of non-management directors. The BRC is responsible for assisting the Board in the oversight of the Company’s risk governance structure; the Company’s risk management and risk assessment guidelines and policies regarding major market, credit, liquidity and funding and reputational risk; the Company’s risk tolerance; and the performance of the Chief Risk Officer. The BRC reports to the full Board on a regular basis.

 

Audit Committee of the Board.    The BAC is composed of independent directors. The BAC is responsible for oversight of the integrity of the Company’s consolidated financial statements, the Company’s compliance with legal and regulatory requirements, the Company’s system of internal controls, the qualifications and independence of the Company’s independent auditor, and the performance of the Company’s internal and independent auditors. In addition, the BAC assists the Board in its oversight of certain aspects of risk

 

 	111	 	LOGO
Table of Contents
management, including review of the major franchise, legal and compliance risk exposures of the Company and the steps management has taken to monitor and control such exposures, as well as guidelines and policies that govern the process for risk assessment and risk management. The BAC reports to the full Board on a regular basis.

 

Operations and Technology Committee of the Board.    The BOTC is composed of non-management directors. The BOTC is responsible for reviewing the major operations and technology risk exposures of the Company and the steps management has taken to monitor and control such exposures. Additionally, the BOTC is responsible for assisting the Board in its oversight of the Company’s operations and technology strategy, including significant investments in support of such strategy. The BOTC is also responsible for the review and approval of operations and technology policies, as well as the review of the Company’s risk management and risk assessment guidelines and policies regarding operations and technology risk. The BOTC reports to the full Board on a regular basis.

 

Firm Risk Committee.    The Board has also authorized the FRC, a management committee appointed and chaired by the Chief Executive Officer, which includes the most senior officers of the Company, including the Chief Risk Officer, Chief Legal Officer and Chief Financial Officer, to oversee the Company’s global risk management structure. The FRC’s responsibilities include oversight of the Company’s risk management principles, procedures and limits and the monitoring of capital levels and material market, credit, liquidity and funding, legal, operational, franchise and regulatory risk matters, and other risks, as appropriate, and the steps management has taken to monitor and manage such risks. The FRC reports to the full Board, the BAC, the BOTC and the BRC through the Company’s Chief Risk Officer and Chief Financial Officer.

 

Functional Risk and Control Committees.    Functional risk and control committees comprising the ERM framework, including the Firm Credit Risk Committee, the Operational Risk Oversight Committee, the Asset Liability Management Committee, the Global Compliance Committee and the Franchise Committee facilitate efficient and comprehensive supervision of the Company’s risk exposures and processes and the Strategic Transactions Committee, comprised of members of management appointed by the Chief Executive Officer, reviews large strategic transactions and principal investments for the Company. In addition, each business segment has a risk committee that is responsible for helping to ensure that the business segment, as applicable, adheres to established limits for market, credit, operational and other risks; implements risk measurement, monitoring, and management policies, procedures, controls and systems that are consistent with the risk framework established by the FRC; and reviews, on a periodic basis, its aggregate risk exposures, risk exception experience, and the efficacy of its risk identification, measurement, monitoring and management policies and procedures, and related controls.

 

Chief Risk Officer.    The Chief Risk Officer, who is independent of business units, reports to the Chief Executive Officer and the BRC. The Chief Risk Officer oversees compliance with the Company’s risk limits; approves exceptions to the Company’s risk limits; independently reviews material market, credit and operational risks; and reviews results of risk management processes with the Board, the BRC, and the BAC, as appropriate. The Chief Risk Officer also coordinates with the Chief Financial Officer regarding capital management and works with the Compensation, Management Development and Succession Committee of the Board to help ensure that the structure and design of incentive compensation arrangements do not encourage unnecessary and excessive risk-taking.

 

Internal Audit Department.    The Internal Audit Department provides independent risk and control assessment and reports to the BAC. The Internal Audit Department provides an independent assessment of the Company’s control environment and risk management processes using a risk-based methodology developed from professional auditing standards. The Internal Audit Department also assists in assessing the Company’s compliance with internal guidelines set for risk management and risk monitoring as well as external rules and regulations governing the industry. It affects these responsibilities through risk-based reviews of the Company’s processes, activities, products or information systems; targeted reviews of specific controls and activities; pre-implementation audits of new or significantly changed processes, activities, products or information systems; and special investigations required as a result of internal factors or regulatory requests.

 

112

LOGO

Table of Contents
Independent Risk Management Functions.    The independent risk management functions (Market Risk, Credit Risk Management, Operational Risk, Corporate Treasury and Bank Resource Management departments) are independent of the Company’s business units. These groups assist senior management and the FRC in monitoring and controlling the Company’s risk through a number of control processes. Each function maintains its own risk governance structure with specified individuals and committees responsible for aspects of managing risk. Further discussion about the responsibilities of the risk management functions may be found below under “Market Risk”, “Credit Risk”, and “Operational Risk” and in “Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations—Liquidity and Capital Resources” in Part II, Item 7.

 

Control Groups.    The Company control groups include the Legal and Compliance Division, Finance, the Tax Department, the Operations Division, the Technology and Data Division, and the Human Resources Department. The Company control groups coordinate with the business segment control groups to review the risk monitoring and risk management policies and procedures relating to, among other things, controls over financial reporting and disclosure; the business segment’s market, credit and operational risk profile; liquidity risks; sales practices; reputational, legal enforceability, compliance and regulatory risk; and operational and technological risks. Participation by the senior officers of the Company and business segment control groups helps ensure that risk policies and procedures, exceptions to risk limits, new products and business ventures, and transactions with risk elements undergo thorough review.

 

Divisional Risk Committees.    Each business segment has a risk committee that is responsible for helping to ensure that the business segment, as applicable, adheres to established limits for market, credit, operational and other risks; implements risk measurement, monitoring, and management policies and procedures that are consistent with the risk framework established by the FRC; and reviews, on a periodic basis, its aggregate risk exposures, risk exception experience, and the efficacy of its risk identification, measurement, monitoring and management policies and procedures, and related controls.

 

Employees.    All employees have accountability for risk management. The Company strives to establish a culture of effective risk management through training and development programs, policies, procedures, and defined roles and responsibilities within the Company. The actions and conduct of each employee are essential to risk management. The Company’s Code of Conduct (the “Code”) has been established to provide a framework and standards for employee conduct that further reinforces the Company’s commitment to integrity and high ethical standards. Every new hire and every employee annually must certify to their understanding of and adherence to the Code. The employee annual review process includes evaluation of adherence to the Code. The Global Incentive Compensation Discretion Policy sets forth standards that specifically provide that managers must consider whether the employee effectively managed and supervised the risk control practices of his/her employee reports during the performance year. The Company has several mutually reinforcing processes to identify incidents of employee conduct that may have an impact on employment status, current year compensation or prior year compensation. The Company’s clawback and cancellation provisions permit recovery of deferred incentive compensation where, for example, there is a failure to appropriately manage or monitor an employee who engaged in conduct detrimental to the Company or conduct constituting ‘cause’ for termination.

 

Stress Value-at-Risk.

 

The Company frequently enhances its market and credit risk management framework to address severe stresses that are observed in global markets during economic downturns. During 2013, the Company expanded and improved its risk measurement processes, including stress tests and scenario analysis, and further refined its market and credit risk limit framework. Stress Value-at-Risk (“S-VaR”), a proprietary methodology that comprehensively measures the Company’s market and credit risks, was further refined and continues to be an important metric used in establishing the Company’s risk appetite and its capital allocation framework. S-VaR simulates many stress scenarios based on more than 25 years of historical data and attempts to capture the different liquidities of various types of general and specific risks. Additionally, S-VaR captures event and default risks that are particularly relevant for credit portfolios.

 

 	113	 	LOGO
Table of Contents
Risk Management Process.

 

The following is a discussion of the Company’s risk management policies and procedures for its principal risks (capital and liquidity risk is discussed in “Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations—Liquidity and Capital Resources” in Item 7). The discussion focuses on the Company’s securities activities (primarily its institutional trading activities) and corporate lending and related activities. The Company believes that these activities generate a substantial portion of its principal risks. This discussion and the estimated amounts of the Company’s risk exposure generated by the Company’s statistical analyses are forward-looking statements. However, the analyses used to assess such risks are not predictions of future events, and actual results may vary significantly from such analyses due to events in the markets in which the Company operates and certain other factors described below.

 

Market Risk.

 

Market risk refers to the risk that a change in the level of one or more market prices, rates, indices, implied volatilities (the price volatility of the underlying instrument imputed from option prices), correlations or other market factors, such as market liquidity, will result in losses for a position or portfolio. Generally, the Company incurs market risk as a result of trading, investing and client facilitation activities, principally within the Institutional Securities business segment where the substantial majority of the Company’s Value-at-Risk (“VaR”) for market risk exposures is generated. In addition, the Company incurs trading-related market risk within the Wealth Management business segment. The Investment Management business segment incurs principally Non-trading market risk primarily from capital investments in real estate funds and investments in private equity vehicles.

 

Sound market risk management is an integral part of the Company’s culture. The various business units and trading desks are responsible for ensuring that market risk exposures are well-managed and prudent. The control groups help ensure that these risks are measured and closely monitored and are made transparent to senior management. The Market Risk Department is responsible for ensuring transparency of material market risks, monitoring compliance with established limits, and escalating risk concentrations to appropriate senior management. To execute these responsibilities, the Market Risk Department monitors the Company’s risk against limits on aggregate risk exposures, performs a variety of risk analyses, routinely reports risk summaries, and maintains the Company’s VaR and scenario analysis systems. These limits are designed to control price and market liquidity risk. Market risk is also monitored through various measures: using statistics (including VaR, S-VaR and related analytical measures); by measures of position sensitivity; and through routine stress testing, which measures the impact on the value of existing portfolios of specified changes in market factors, and scenario analyses conducted by the Market Risk Department in collaboration with the business units. The material risks identified by these processes are summarized in reports produced by the Market Risk Department that are circulated to and discussed with senior management, the FRC, the BRC, and the Board of Directors.

 

The Chief Risk Officer, who reports to the Chief Executive Officer and the BRC, among other things, monitors market risk through the Market Risk Department, which reports to the Chief Risk Officer and is independent of the business units, and has close interactions with senior management and the risk management control groups in the business units. The Chief Risk Officer is a member of the FRC, chaired by the Chief Executive Officer, which includes the most senior officers of the Company, and regularly reports on market risk matters to this committee, as well as to the BRC and the Board of Directors.

 

Sales and Trading and Related Activities.

 

Primary Market Risk Exposures and Market Risk Management.    During 2013, the Company had exposures to a wide range of interest rates, equity prices, foreign exchange rates and commodity prices—and the associated implied volatilities and spreads—related to the global markets in which it conducts its trading activities.

 

The Company is exposed to interest rate and credit spread risk as a result of its market-making activities and other trading in interest rate-sensitive financial instruments (e.g., risk arising from changes in the level or implied

 

LOGO	 	114	 	
Table of Contents
volatility of interest rates, the timing of mortgage prepayments, the shape of the yield curve and credit spreads). The activities from which those exposures arise and the markets in which the Company is active include, but are not limited to, the following: corporate and government debt across both developed and emerging markets and asset-backed debt (including mortgage-related securities).

 

The Company is exposed to equity price and implied volatility risk as a result of making markets in equity securities and derivatives and maintaining other positions (including positions in non-public entities). Positions in non-public entities may include, but are not limited to, exposures to private equity, venture capital, private partnerships, real estate funds and other funds. Such positions are less liquid, have longer investment horizons and are more difficult to hedge than listed equities.

 

The Company is exposed to foreign exchange rate and implied volatility risk as a result of making markets in foreign currencies and foreign currency derivatives, from maintaining foreign exchange positions and from holding non-U.S. dollar-denominated financial instruments.

 

The Company is exposed to commodity price and implied volatility risk as a result of market-making activities and maintaining commodity positions in physical commodities (such as crude and refined oil products, natural gas, electricity, and precious and base metals) and related derivatives. Commodity exposures are subject to periods of high price volatility as a result of changes in supply and demand. These changes can be caused by weather conditions; physical production, transportation and storage issues; or geopolitical and other events that affect the available supply and level of demand for these commodities.

 

The Company manages its trading positions by employing a variety of risk mitigation strategies. These strategies include diversification of risk exposures and hedging. Hedging activities consist of the purchase or sale of positions in related securities and financial instruments, including a variety of derivative products (e.g., futures, forwards, swaps and options). Hedging activities may not always provide effective mitigation against trading losses due to differences in the terms, specific characteristics or other basis risks that may exist between the hedge instrument and the risk exposure that is being hedged. The Company manages the market risk associated with its trading activities on a Company-wide basis, on a worldwide trading division level and on an individual product basis. The Company manages and monitors its market risk exposures in such a way as to maintain a portfolio that the Company believes is well-diversified in the aggregate with respect to market risk factors and that reflects the Company’s aggregate risk tolerance as established by the Company’s senior management.

 

Aggregate market risk limits have been approved for the Company across all divisions worldwide. Additional market risk limits are assigned to trading desks and, as appropriate, products and regions. Trading division risk managers, desk risk managers, traders and the Market Risk Department monitor market risk measures against limits in accordance with policies set by senior management.

 

VaR.    The Company uses the statistical technique known as VaR as one of the tools used to measure, monitor and review the market risk exposures of its trading portfolios. The Market Risk Department calculates and distributes daily VaR-based risk measures to various levels of management.

 

VaR Methodology, Assumptions and Limitations.    The Company estimates VaR using a model based on volatility adjusted historical simulation for general market risk factors and Monte Carlo simulation for name-specific risk in corporate shares, bonds, loans and related derivatives. The model constructs a distribution of hypothetical daily changes in the value of trading portfolios based on the following: historical observation of daily changes in key market indices or other market risk factors; and information on the sensitivity of the portfolio values to these market risk factor changes. The Company’s VaR model uses four years of historical data with a volatility adjustment to reflect current market conditions. The Company’s VaR for risk management purposes (“Management VaR”) is computed at a 95% level of confidence over a one-day time horizon, which is a useful indicator of possible trading losses resulting from adverse daily market moves. The Company’s 95%/one-

 

 	115	 	LOGO
Table of Contents
day VaR corresponds to the unrealized loss in portfolio value that, based on historically observed market risk factor movements, would have been exceeded with a frequency of 5%, or five times in every 100 trading days, if the portfolio were held constant for one day.

 

The Company’s VaR model generally takes into account linear and non-linear exposures to equity and commodity price risk, interest rate risk, credit spread risk and foreign exchange rates. The model also takes into account linear exposures to implied volatility risks for all asset classes and non-linear exposures to implied volatility risks for equity, commodity and foreign exchange referenced products. The VaR model also captures certain implied correlation risks associated with portfolio credit derivatives as well as certain basis risks (e.g., corporate debt and related credit derivatives).

 

The Company uses VaR as one of a range of risk management tools. Among their benefits, VaR models permit estimation of a portfolio’s aggregate market risk exposure, incorporating a range of varied market risks and portfolio assets. One key element of the VaR model is that it reflects risk reduction due to portfolio diversification or hedging activities. However, VaR has various limitations, which include, but are not limited to: use of historical changes in market risk factors, which may not be accurate predictors of future market conditions, and may not fully incorporate the risk of extreme market events that are outsized relative to observed historical market behavior or reflect the historical distribution of results beyond the 95% confidence interval; and reporting of losses in a single day, which does not reflect the risk of positions that cannot be liquidated or hedged in one day. A small proportion of market risk generated by trading positions is not included in VaR. The modeling of the risk characteristics of some positions relies on approximations that, under certain circumstances, could produce significantly different results from those produced using more precise measures. VaR is most appropriate as a risk measure for trading positions in liquid financial markets and will understate the risk associated with severe events, such as periods of extreme illiquidity. The Company is aware of these and other limitations and, therefore, uses VaR as only one component in its risk management oversight process. This process also incorporates stress testing and scenario analyses and extensive risk monitoring, analysis, and control at the trading desk, division and Company levels.

 

The Company’s VaR model evolves over time in response to changes in the composition of trading portfolios and to improvements in modeling techniques and systems capabilities. The Company is committed to continuous review and enhancement of VaR methodologies and assumptions in order to capture evolving risks associated with changes in market structure and dynamics. As part of regular process improvement, additional systematic and name-specific risk factors may be added to improve the VaR model’s ability to more accurately estimate risks to specific asset classes or industry sectors.

 

Since the reported VaR statistics are estimates based on historical data, VaR should not be viewed as predictive of the Company’s future revenues or financial performance or of its ability to monitor and manage risk. There can be no assurance that the Company’s actual losses on a particular day will not exceed the VaR amounts indicated below or that such losses will not occur more than five times in 100 trading days for a 95%/one-day VaR. VaR does not predict the magnitude of losses which, should they occur, may be significantly greater than the VaR amount.

 

VaR statistics are not readily comparable across firms because of differences in the firms’ portfolios, modeling assumptions and methodologies. These differences can result in materially different VaR estimates across firms for similar portfolios. The impact of such differences varies depending on the factor history assumptions, the frequency with which the factor history is updated, and the confidence level. As a result, VaR statistics are more useful when interpreted as indicators of trends in a firm’s risk profile, rather than as an absolute measure of risk to be compared across firms.

 

The Company utilizes the same VaR model for risk management purposes as well as regulatory capital calculations. The Company’s VaR model has been approved by the Company’s regulators for use in regulatory capital calculations.

 

LOGO	 	116	 	
Table of Contents
The portfolio of positions used for the Company’s Management VaR differs from that used for regulatory capital requirements (“Regulatory VaR”), as Management VaR contains certain positions that are excluded from Regulatory VaR. Examples include counterparty credit valuation adjustments, and loans that are carried at fair value and associated hedges. Additionally, the Company’s Management VaR excludes certain risks contained in its Regulatory VaR, such as hedges to counterparty exposures related to the Company’s own credit spread.

 

Table 1 below presents the Management VaR for the Company’s Trading portfolio, on a period-end, annual average and annual high and low basis. The Credit Portfolio is disclosed as a separate category from the Primary Risk Categories, and includes loans that are carried at fair value and associated hedges, as well as counterparty credit valuation adjustments and related hedges.

 

Trading Risks.

 

The table below presents the Company’s 95%/one-day Management VaR:

 

Table 1: 95% Management VaR	  	95%/One-Day VaR for 2013	 	  	95%/One-Day VaR for 2012	 
Market Risk Category

  	Period
End	 	 	Average	 	 	High	 	  	Low	 	  	Period
End	 	 	Average	 	 	High	 	  	Low	 
 	  	(dollars in millions)	 
Interest rate and credit spread

  	$	41	 	 	$	45	 	 	$	76	 	  	$	31	 	  	$	56	 	 	$	56	 	 	$	87	 	  	$	33	 
Equity price

  	 	22	 	 	 	19	 	 	 	43	 	  	 	15	 	  	 	21	 	 	 	26	 	 	 	39	 	  	 	18	 
Foreign exchange rate

  	 	15	 	 	 	14	 	 	 	22	 	  	 	7	 	  	 	10	 	 	 	13	 	 	 	23	 	  	 	7	 
Commodity price

  	 	15	 	 	 	21	 	 	 	31	 	  	 	15	 	  	 	20	 	 	 	24	 	 	 	32	 	  	 	18	 
Less: Diversification benefit(1)(2)

  	 	(44	) 	 	 	(46	) 	 	 	N/A	 	  	 	N/A	 	  	 	(40	) 	 	 	(55	) 	 	 	N/A	 	  	 	N/A	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 				  				  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 				  			
Primary Risk Categories

  	$	49	 	 	$	53	 	 	$	78	 	  	$	42	 	  	$	67	 	 	$	64	 	 	$	98	 	  	$	52	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 				  				  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 				  			
Credit Portfolio

  	 	12	 	 	 	14	 	 	 	18	 	  	 	12	 	  	 	19	 	 	 	26	 	 	 	50	 	  	 	18	 
Less: Diversification benefit(1)(2)

  	 	(8	) 	 	 	(8	) 	 	 	N/A	 	  	 	N/A	 	  	 	(11	) 	 	 	(17	) 	 	 	N/A	 	  	 	N/A	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 				  				  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 				  			
Total Management VaR

  	$	53	 	 	$	59	 	 	$	85	 	  	$	47	 	  	$	75	 	 	$	73	 	 	$	107	 	  	$	57	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 				  				  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 				  			
 

(1)	Diversification benefit equals the difference between the total Management VaR and the sum of the component VaRs. This benefit arises because the simulated one-day losses for each of the components occur on different days; similar diversification benefits also are taken into account within each component.
(2)	N/A–Not Applicable. The high and low VaR values for the total Management VaR and each of the component VaRs might have occurred on different days during the year, and therefore the diversification benefit is not an applicable measure.
 

The Company’s average Management VaR for the Primary Risk Categories for 2013 was $53 million compared with $64 million for 2012. This decrease was primarily driven by reduced exposure to interest rate and credit spread products and reduced exposure to equity products.

 

The average Credit Portfolio VaR for 2013 was $14 million compared with $26 million for 2012. This decrease was primarily driven by decreased counterparty credit exposure.

 

The average Total Management VaR for 2013 was $59 million compared with $73 million for 2012. This decrease was driven by the aforementioned movements.

 

Distribution of VaR Statistics and Net Revenues for 2013.

 

One method of evaluating the reasonableness of the Company’s VaR model as a measure of the Company’s potential volatility of net revenues is to compare the VaR with actual trading revenues. Assuming no intra-day trading, for a 95%/one-day VaR, the expected number of times that trading losses should exceed VaR during the year is 13, and, in general, if trading losses were to exceed VaR more than 21 times in a year, the adequacy of the VaR model could be questioned. The Company evaluates the reasonableness of its VaR model by comparing the

 

 	117	 	LOGO
Table of Contents
potential declines in portfolio values generated by the model with actual trading results for the Company, as well as individual business units. For days where losses exceed the VaR statistic, the Company examines the drivers of trading losses to evaluate the VaR model’s accuracy relative to realized trading results.

 

The distribution of VaR Statistics and Net Revenues is presented in the histograms below for both the Primary Risk Categories and the Total Trading populations.

 

Primary Risk Categories.

 

As shown in Table 1, the Company’s average 95%/one-day Primary Risk Categories VaR for 2013 was $53 million. The histogram below presents the distribution of the Company’s daily 95%/one-day Primary Risk Categories VaR for 2013, which was in a range between $40 million and $60 million for approximately 82% of the trading days during the year.

 

LOGO

 

LOGO	 	118	 	
Table of Contents
The histogram below shows the distribution of daily net trading revenues for the Company’s businesses that comprise the Primary Risk Categories for 2013. This excludes non-trading revenues of these businesses and revenues associated with the Company’s own credit risk. During 2013, the Company’s businesses that comprise the Primary Risk Categories experienced net trading losses on 35 days, of which 1 day was in excess of the 95%/one-day Primary Risk Categories VaR.

 

LOGO

 

 	119	 	LOGO
Table of Contents
Total Trading—including the Primary Risk Categories and the Credit Portfolio.

 

As shown in Table 1, the Company’s average 95%/one-day Total Management VaR, which includes the Primary Risk Categories and the Credit Portfolio, for 2013 was $59 million. The histogram below presents the distribution of the Company’s daily 95%/one-day Total Management VaR for 2013, which was in a range between $45 million and $65 million for approximately 80% of trading days during the year.

 

LOGO

 

120

LOGO

Table of Contents
The histogram below shows the distribution of daily net trading revenues for the Company’s Trading businesses for 2013. This excludes non-trading revenues of these businesses and revenues associated with the Company’s own credit risk. During 2013, the Company experienced net trading losses on 33 days, of which 1 day was in excess of the 95%/one-day Management VaR.

 

LOGO

 

Non-Trading Risks.

 

The Company believes that sensitivity analysis is an appropriate representation of the Company’s non-trading risks. Reflected below is this analysis, which covers substantially all of the non-trading risk in the Company’s portfolio.

 

Counterparty Exposure Related to the Company’s Own Spread.

 

The credit spread risk relating to the Company’s own mark-to-market derivative counterparty exposure is managed separately from VaR. The credit spread risk sensitivity of this exposure corresponds to an increase in value of approximately $5 million and $6 million for each 1 basis point widening in the Company’s credit spread level for December 31, 2013 and December 31, 2012, respectively.

 

Funding Liabilities.

 

The credit spread risk sensitivity of the Company’s mark-to-market funding liabilities corresponded to an increase in value of approximately $11 million and $13 million for each 1 basis point widening in the Company’s credit spread level for December 31, 2013 and December 31, 2012, respectively.

 

Interest Rate Risk Sensitivity on Income from Continuing Operations.

 

The Company measures the interest rate risk of certain assets and liabilities by calculating the hypothetical sensitivity of net interest income to potential changes in the level of interest rates over the next 12 months. This sensitivity analysis includes positions that are mark-to-market, as well as positions that are accounted for on an accrual basis. For interest rate derivatives that are perfect economic hedges to non-mark-to-market assets or liabilities, the disclosed sensitivities include only the impact of the coupon accrual mismatch.

 

 	121	 	LOGO
Table of Contents
Given the currently low interest rate environment, the Company uses the following two interest rate scenarios to quantify the Company’s sensitivity: instantaneous parallel shocks of 100 and 200 basis point increases to all points on all yield curves simultaneously.

 

The hypothetical model does not assume any growth, change in business focus, asset pricing philosophy or asset/liability funding mix and does not capture how the Company would respond to significant changes in market conditions. Furthermore, the model does not reflect the Company’s expectations regarding the movement of interest rates in the near term, nor the actual effect on income from continuing operations before income taxes if such changes were to occur.

 

 	 	December 31, 2013	 	 	December 31, 2012	 
 	 	+100 Basis
Points	 	 	+200 Basis
Points	 	 	+100 Basis
Points	 	 	+200 Basis
Points	 
 	 	(dollars in millions)	 
Impact on income from continuing operations before income taxes

 	$	642	 	 	$	1,102	 	 	$	749	 	 	$	1,140	 
 

Investments.

 

The Company makes investments in both public and private companies. These investments are predominantly equity positions with long investment horizons, the majority of which are for business facilitation purposes. The market risk related to these investments is measured by estimating the potential reduction in net income associated with a 10% decline in investment values.

 

 	  	10% Sensitivity	 
Investments

  	December 31, 2013	 	  	December 31, 2012	 
 	  	(dollars in millions)	 
Investments related to Investment Management activities:

  				  			
Hedge fund investments

  	$	104	 	  	$	120	 
Private equity and infrastructure funds

  	 	148	 	  	 	125	 
Real estate funds

  	 	158	 	  	 	138	 
Other investments:

  				  			
Mitsubishi UFJ Morgan Stanley Securities Co., Ltd.

  	 	161	 	  	 	143	 
Other Company investments

  	 	198	 	  	 	292	 
 

Credit Risk.

 

Credit risk refers to the risk of loss arising when a borrower, counterparty or issuer does not meet its financial obligations. The Company primarily incurs credit risk exposure to institutions and individuals mainly through the Institutional Securities and Wealth Management business segments.

 

The Company may incur credit risk in the Institutional Securities business segment through a variety of activities, including, but not limited to, the following:

 

 	•	 	
entering into swap or other derivative contracts under which counterparties have obligations to make payments to the Company;

 

 	•	 	
extending credit to clients through various lending commitments;

 

 	•	 	
providing short- or long-term funding that is secured by physical or financial collateral whose value may at times be insufficient to fully cover the loan repayment amount;

 

 	•	 	
posting margin and/or collateral to clearinghouses, clearing agencies, exchanges, banks, securities firms and other financial counterparties; and

 

 	•	 	
investing or trading in securities and loan pools, whereby the value of these assets may fluctuate based on realized or expected defaults on the underlying obligations or loans.

 

122

LOGO

Table of Contents
The Company incurs credit risk in the Wealth Management business segment primarily through lending to individuals and entities, including, but not limited to, the following:

 

 	•	 	
margin loans collateralized by securities;

 

 	•	 	
securities-based and other loans predominantly collateralized by securities; and

 

 	•	 	
single-family residential prime mortgage loans in conforming, non-conforming or home equity lines of credit (“HELOC”) form.

 

Monitoring and Control.

 

In order to help protect the Company from losses, the Credit Risk Management Department establishes company-wide practices to evaluate, monitor and control credit risk exposure at the transaction, obligor and portfolio levels. The Credit Risk Management Department approves extensions of credit, evaluates the creditworthiness of the Company’s counterparties and borrowers on a regular basis, and ensures that credit exposure is actively monitored and managed. The evaluation of counterparties and borrowers includes an assessment of the probability that an obligor will default on its financial obligations and any losses that may occur when an obligor defaults. In addition, credit risk exposure is actively managed by credit professionals and committees within the Credit Risk Management Department and through various risk committees, whose membership includes individuals from the Credit Risk Management Department. A comprehensive and global Credit Limits Framework is also utilized to evaluate and manage credit risk levels across the Company. The Credit Limits Framework is calibrated within the Company’s risk tolerance and includes single-name limits and portfolio concentration limits by country, industry and product type. The Credit Risk Management Department ensures transparency of material credit risks, compliance with established limits and escalation of risk concentrations to appropriate senior management. The Credit Risk Management Department also works closely with the Market Risk Department and applicable business units to monitor risk exposures and to perform stress tests to identify, analyze and control credit risk concentrations arising in the Company’s lending and trading activities. The stress tests shock market factors (e.g., interest rates, commodity prices, equity prices) and risk parameters such as default probabilities and expected losses in order to identify potential credit exposure concentrations to individual counterparties, countries and industries. Stress and scenario tests are conducted in accordance with established Company policies and procedures and comply with methodologies outlined in the Basel regulatory framework.

 

Credit Evaluation.    The evaluation of corporate and commercial counterparties as well as certain high net worth borrowers includes assigning obligor credit ratings, which reflect an assessment of an obligor’s probability of default. Credit evaluations typically involve the assessment of financial statements, leverage, liquidity, capital strength, asset composition and quality, market capitalization and access to capital markets, cash flow projections and debt service requirements, and the adequacy of collateral, if applicable. The Credit Risk Management Department also evaluates strategy, market position, industry dynamics, obligor’s management and other factors that could affect the obligor’s risk profile. Additionally, the Credit Risk Management Department evaluates the relative position of the Company’s particular obligation in the borrower’s capital structure and relative recovery prospects, as well as collateral (if applicable) and other structural elements of the particular transaction.

 

The evaluation of consumer borrowers is tailored to the specific type of lending. Margin and securities-based loans are evaluated based on factors that include, but are not limited to, the amount of the loan, the degree of leverage and the quality, diversification, price volatility and liquidity of the collateral. The underwriting of residential real estate loans includes, but is not limited to, review of the obligor’s income, net worth, liquidity, collateral, loan-to-value ratio and credit bureau information. Subsequent credit monitoring for residential real estate loans is performed at the portfolio level and for consumer loans, collateral values are monitored on an ongoing basis.

 

Credit risk metrics assigned to corporate, commercial and consumer borrowers during the evaluation process are incorporated into the Credit Risk Management Department’s maintenance of the allowance for loan losses for the loans held for investment portfolio. Such allowance serves as a safeguard against probable inherent losses as well as probable losses related to loans identified for impairment. For more information on the Company’s allowance for loan losses, see Notes 2 and 8 to the consolidated financial statements in Item 8.

 

 	123	 	LOGO
Table of Contents
Risk Mitigation.    The Company may seek to mitigate credit risk from its lending and trading activities in multiple ways, including collateral provisions, guarantees and hedges. At the transaction level, the Company seeks to mitigate risk through management of key risk elements such as size, tenor, financial covenants, seniority and collateral. The Company actively hedges its lending and derivatives exposure through various financial instruments that may include single-name, portfolio and structured credit derivatives. Additionally, the Company may sell, assign or syndicate funded loans and lending commitments to other financial institutions in the primary and secondary loan market. In connection with its derivatives trading activities, the Company generally enters into master netting agreements and collateral arrangements with counterparties. These agreements provide the Company with the ability to demand collateral, as well as to liquidate collateral and offset receivables and payables covered under the same master agreement in the event of counterparty default.

 

Lending Activities.

 

The Company provides loans to a variety of customers, from large corporate and institutional clients to high net worth individuals. In addition, the Company purchases loans in the secondary market. The table below summarizes the Company’s loan activity at December 31, 2013. Loans held for investment and loans held for sale are classified in Loans and loans held at fair value are classified in Trading assets in the consolidated statements of financial condition at December 31, 2013. See Notes 4 and 8 to the consolidated financial statements in Item 8 for further information.

 

 	  	Institutional
Securities
Corporate
Lending(1)	 	  	Institutional
Securities
Other
Lending(2)	 	  	Wealth
Management
Lending(3)	 	  	Total(4)	 
 	  	(dollars in millions)	 
Corporate loans

  	$	7,837	 	  	$	1,988	 	  	$	3,301	 	  	$	13,126	 
Consumer loans

  	 	—  	 	  	 	—  	 	  	 	11,576	 	  	 	11,576	 
Residential real estate loans

  	 	—  	 	  	 	1	 	  	 	10,001	 	  	 	10,002	 
Wholesale real estate loans

  	 	—  	 	  	 	1,835	 	  	 	6	 	  	 	1,841	 
  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 
Loans held for investment, net of allowance

  	 	7,837	 	  	 	3,824	 	  	 	24,884	 	  	 	36,545	 
  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 
Corporate loans

  	 	6,168	 	  	 	—  	 	  	 	—  	 	  	 	6,168	 
Consumer loans

  	 	—  	 	  	 	—  	 	  	 	—  	 	  	 	—  	 
Residential real estate loans

  	 	—  	 	  	 	12	 	  	 	100	 	  	 	112	 
Wholesale real estate loans

  	 	—  	 	  	 	49	 	  	 	—  	 	  	 	49	 
  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 
Loans held for sale

  	 	6,168	 	  	 	61	 	  	 	100	 	  	 	6,329	 
  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 
Corporate loans

  	 	2,892	 	  	 	6,882	 	  	 	—  	 	  	 	9,774	 
Consumer loans

  	 	—  	 	  	 	—  	 	  	 	—  	 	  	 	—  	 
Residential real estate loans

  	 	—  	 	  	 	1,434	 	  	 	—  	 	  	 	1,434	 
Wholesale real estate loans

  	 	—  	 	  	 	1,404	 	  	 	—  	 	  	 	1,404	 
  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 
Loans held at fair value

  	 	2,892	 	  	 	9,720	 	  	 	—  	 	  	 	12,612	 
  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 
Total loans

  	$	16,897	 	  	$	13,605	 	  	$	24,984	 	  	$	55,486	 
  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 
 

(1)	In addition to loans, at December 31, 2013, $61.4 billion of unfunded lending commitments were accounted for as held for investment, $8.1 billion of unfunded lending commitments were accounted for as held for sale and $9.1 billion of unfunded lending commitments were accounted for at fair value.
(2)	In addition to loans, at December 31, 2013, $1.3 billion of unfunded lending commitments were accounted for as held for investment and $0.8 billion of unfunded lending commitments were accounted for at fair value.
(3)	In addition to loans, at December 31, 2013, $4.5 billion of unfunded lending commitments were accounted for as held for investment.
(4)	The above table excludes customer margin loans outstanding of $29.2 billion and employee loans outstanding of $5.6 billion at December 31, 2013. See Notes 6 and 8 to the consolidated financial statements in Item 8 for further information.
 

124

LOGO

Table of Contents
Institutional Securities Corporate Lending Activities.    In connection with certain of its Institutional Securities business segment activities, the Company provides loans or lending commitments to select corporate clients. These loans and lending commitments have varying terms; may be senior or subordinated; may be secured or unsecured; are generally contingent upon representations, warranties and contractual conditions applicable to the borrower; and may be syndicated, traded or hedged by the Company.

 

The Company’s corporate lending credit exposure is primarily from loan and lending commitments used for general corporate purposes, working capital and liquidity purposes and typically consist of revolving lines of credit, letter of credit facilities and term loans. In addition, the Company provides “event-driven” loans and lending commitments associated with a particular event or transaction, such as to support client merger, acquisition or recapitalization activities. The Company’s “event-driven” loans and lending commitments typically consist of revolving lines of credit, term loans and bridge loans.

 

Corporate lending commitments may not be indicative of the Company’s actual funding requirements, as the commitment may expire unused or the borrower may not fully utilize the commitment or the Company’s portion of the commitment may be reduced through the syndication or sales process. Such syndications or sales may involve third-party institutional investors where the Company may have a custodial relationship, such as prime brokerage clients.

 

The Company may hedge and/or sell its exposures in connection with loans and lending commitments. Additionally, the Company may mitigate credit risk by requiring borrowers to pledge collateral and include financial covenants in lending commitments. In the consolidated statements of financial condition these loans are carried at either fair value with changes in fair value recorded in earnings; held for investment, which are recorded at amortized cost; or held for sale, which are recorded at lower of cost or fair value.

 

The table below presents the Company’s credit exposure from its corporate lending positions and lending commitments, which are measured in accordance with the Company’s internal risk management standards at December 31, 2013. The “total corporate lending exposure” column includes funded and unfunded lending commitments. Lending commitments represent legally binding obligations to provide funding to clients for all lending transactions. Since commitments associated with these business activities may expire unused or may not be utilized to full capacity, they do not necessarily reflect the actual future cash funding requirements.

 

Corporate Lending Commitments and Funded Loans at December 31, 2013

 

 	  	Years to Maturity	 	  	Total
Corporate
Lending
Exposure(2)	 
Credit Rating(1)

  	Less than 1	 	  	1-3	 	  	3-5	 	  	Over 5	 	  
 	  	(dollars in millions)	 
AAA

  	$	859	 	  	$	114	 	  	$	121	 	  	$	—  	 	  	$	1,094	 
AA

  	 	2,719	 	  	 	1,870	 	  	 	5,556	 	  	 	—  	 	  	 	10,145	 
A

  	 	2,935	 	  	 	4,230	 	  	 	11,642	 	  	 	570	 	  	 	19,377	 
BBB

  	 	2,391	 	  	 	10,535	 	  	 	21,330	 	  	 	1,004	 	  	 	35,260	 
  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 
Investment grade

  	 	8,904	 	  	 	16,749	 	  	 	38,649	 	  	 	1,574	 	  	 	65,876	 
Non-investment grade

  	 	2,712	 	  	 	8,024	 	  	 	12,794	 	  	 	3,627	 	  	 	27,157	 
  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 
Total

  	$	11,616	 	  	$	24,773	 	  	$	51,443	 	  	$	5,201	 	  	$	93,033	 
  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 
 

(1)	Obligor credit ratings are determined by the Credit Risk Management Department.
(2)	Total corporate lending exposure represents the Company’s potential loss assuming the market price of funded loans and lending commitments was zero.
 

 	125	 	LOGO
Table of Contents
At December 31, 2013, the aggregate amount of investment grade funded loans was $6.5 billion and the aggregate amount of non-investment grade funded loans was $7.9 billion. In connection with these corporate lending activities (which include corporate funded and unfunded lending commitments), the Company had hedges (which include “single name,” “sector” and “index” hedges) with a notional amount of $9.0 billion related to the total corporate lending exposure of $93.0 billion at December 31, 2013.

 

“Event-Driven” Loans and Lending Commitments at December 31, 2013.

 

Included in the total corporate lending exposure amounts in the table above at December 31, 2013 were “event-driven” exposures of $9.5 billion composed of funded loans of $2.0 billion and lending commitments of $7.5 billion. Included in the “event-driven” exposure at December 31, 2013 were $7.3 billion of loans and lending commitments to non-investment grade borrowers. The maturity profile of the “event-driven” loans and lending commitments at December 31, 2013 was as follows: 33% will mature in less than 1 year, 17% will mature within 1 to 3 years, 32% will mature within 3 to 5 years and 18% will mature in over 5 years.

 

Industry Exposure—Corporate Lending.    The Company also monitors its credit exposure to individual industries for credit exposure arising from corporate loans and lending commitments as discussed above.

 

The following table shows the Company’s credit exposure from its primary corporate loans and lending commitments by industry at December 31, 2013:

 

Industry

  	Corporate Lending Exposure	 
 	  	(dollars in millions)	 
Energy

  	$	12,240	 
Utilities

  	 	10,410	 
Healthcare

  	 	10,095	 
Consumer discretionary

  	 	9,981	 
Industrials

  	 	9,514	 
Funds, exchanges and other financial services(1)

  	 	7,190	 
Consumer staples

  	 	6,788	 
Information technology

  	 	6,526	 
Telecommunications services

  	 	5,658	 
Materials

  	 	4,867	 
Real Estate

  	 	4,171	 
Other

  	 	5,593	 
  	
 

 

 
Total

  	$	93,033	 
  	
 

 

 
 

(1)	Includes mutual funds, pension funds, private equity and real estate funds, exchanges and clearinghouses and diversified financial services.
 

Institutional Securities Other Lending Activities.    In addition to the primary corporate lending activity described above, the Institutional Securities business segment engages in other lending activity. These loans primarily include corporate loans purchased in the secondary market, commercial and residential mortgage loans, asset-backed loans and financing extended to institutional clients. At December 31, 2013, approximately 99.6% of Institutional Securities Other lending activities held for investment were current; less than 0.4% were on non-accrual status because the loans were past due for a period of 90 days or more or payment of principal or interest was in doubt.

 

126

LOGO

Table of Contents
At December 31, 2013, Institutional Securities Other lending activities by remaining contract maturity were as follows:

 

 	  	Years to Maturity	 	  	Total Institutional
Securities Other
Lending Activities	 
 	  	Less than 1	 	  	1-3	 	  	3-5	 	  	Over 5	 	  
 	  	(dollars in millions)	 
Corporate loans

  	$	3,957	 	  	$	1,236	 	  	$	2,455	 	  	$	1,222	 	  	$	8,870	 
Consumer loans

  	 	—  	 	  	 	—  	 	  	 	—  	 	  	 	—  	 	  	 	—  	 
Residential real estate loans

  	 	8	 	  	 	16	 	  	 	91	 	  	 	1,332	 	  	 	1,447	 
Wholesale real estate loans

  	 	174	 	  	 	909	 	  	 	885	 	  	 	1,320	 	  	 	3,288	 
  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 
Total

  	$	4,139	 	  	$	2,161	 	  	$	3,431	 	  	$	3,874	 	  	$	13,605	 
  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 
 

In addition, Institutional Securities Other lending activities include “margin lending,” which allows the client to borrow against the value of qualifying securities. At December 31, 2013, Institutional Securities margin lending of $15.2 billion is classified within Customer and other receivables in the consolidated statements of financial condition.

 

Wealth Management Lending Activities.    The principal Wealth Management lending activities includes securities-based lending and residential real estate loans. At December 31, 2013, Wealth Management’s lending activities by remaining contract maturity were as follows:

 

 	  	Years to Maturity	 	  	Total Wealth
Management
Lending Activities	 
 	  	Less than 1	 	  	1-3	 	  	3-5	 	  	Over 5	 	  
 	  	(dollars in millions)	 
Securities-based lending and other loans

  	$	13,241	 	  	$	509	 	  	$	539	 	  	$	594	 	  	$	14,883	 
Residential real estate loans

  	 	—  	 	  	 	—  	 	  	 	—  	 	  	 	10,101	 	  	 	10,101	 
  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 
Total

  	$	13,241	 	  	$	509	 	  	$	539	 	  	$	10,695	 	  	$	24,984	 
  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 
 

Securities-based lending provided to the Company’s retail clients is primarily conducted through the Company’s PLA platform and had an outstanding balance of $13.2 billion within the $14.9 billion in the above table as of December 31, 2013. These loans allow the client to borrow money against the value of qualifying securities for any suitable purpose other than purchasing securities. The Company establishes approved credit lines against qualifying securities and monitors limits daily and, pursuant to such guidelines, requires customers to deposit additional collateral, or reduce debt positions, when necessary. Factors considered in the review of these loans are the amount, the proposed pledged collateral and its diversification profile and, in the case of concentrated positions, appropriate liquidity of the underlying collateral or potential hedging strategies. Underlying collateral is also reviewed with respect to the valuation of the securities, historical trading range, volatility analysis and an evaluation of industry concentrations.

 

Residential real estate loans consist of first and second lien mortgages, including HELOC loans. For these loans, a loan evaluation process is adopted within a framework of credit underwriting policies and collateral valuation. The Company’s underwriting policy is designed to ensure that all borrowers pass an assessment of capacity and willingness to pay, which includes an analysis of applicable industry standard credit scoring models (e.g., Fair Isaac Corporation (“FICO”) scores), debt ratios and reserves of the borrower. Loan-to-value ratios are determined based on independent third-party property appraisal/valuations, and security lien position is established through title/ownership reports. Eligible conforming loans are currently held for sale, while most non-conforming and HELOC loans are held for investment in the Company’s portfolio.

 

Wealth Management also provides margin lending to retail clients and had an outstanding balance of $14.0 billion as of December 31, 2013, which is classified within Customer and other receivables in the consolidated statements of financial condition.

 

 	127	 	LOGO
Table of Contents
In addition, the Company’s Wealth Management business segment has employee loans that are granted primarily in conjunction with a program established by the Company to retain and recruit certain employees. These loans, recorded in Customer and other receivables in the consolidated statements of financial condition, are full recourse, require periodic payments and have repayment terms ranging from four to 12 years. The Company establishes an allowance for loan amounts it does not consider recoverable from terminated employees, which is recorded in Compensation and benefits expense.

 

Credit Exposure—Derivatives.

 

The Company incurs credit risk as a dealer in OTC derivatives. Credit risk with respect to derivative instruments arises from the failure of a counterparty to perform according to the terms of the contract. In connection with its OTC derivative activities, the Company generally enters into master netting agreements and collateral arrangements with counterparties. These agreements provide the Company with the ability to demand collateral as well as to liquidate collateral and offset receivables and payables covered under the same master agreement in the event of counterparty default. The Company manages its trading positions by employing a variety of risk mitigation strategies. These strategies include diversification of risk exposures and hedging. Hedging activities consist of the purchase or sale of positions in related securities and financial instruments, including a variety of derivative products (e.g., futures, forwards, swaps and options). For credit exposure information on the Company’s OTC derivative products, see Note 12 to the consolidated financial statements in Item 8.

 

Credit Derivatives.    A credit derivative is a contract between a seller (guarantor) and buyer (beneficiary) of protection against the risk of a credit event occurring on one or more debt obligations issued by a specified reference entity. The beneficiary typically pays a periodic premium over the life of the contract and is protected for the period. If a credit event occurs, the guarantor is required to make payment to the beneficiary based on the terms of the credit derivative contract. Credit events, as defined in the contract, may be one or more of the following defined events: bankruptcy, dissolution or insolvency of the referenced entity, failure to pay, obligation acceleration, repudiation, payment moratorium and restructurings.

 

The Company trades in a variety of credit derivatives and may either purchase or write protection on a single name or portfolio of referenced entities. In transactions referencing a portfolio of entities or securities, protection may be limited to a tranche of exposure or a single name within the portfolio. The Company is an active market maker in the credit derivatives markets. As a market maker, the Company works to earn a bid-offer spread on client flow business and manages any residual credit or correlation risk on a portfolio basis. Further, the Company uses credit derivatives to manage its exposure to residential and commercial mortgage loans and corporate lending exposures during the periods presented. The effectiveness of the Company’s CDS protection as a hedge of the Company’s exposures may vary depending upon a number of factors, including the contractual terms of the CDS.

 

The Company actively monitors its counterparty credit risk related to credit derivatives. A majority of the Company’s counterparties is composed of banks, broker-dealers, insurance and other financial institutions. Contracts with these counterparties may include provisions related to counterparty rating downgrades, which may result in additional collateral being required by the Company. As with all derivative contracts, the Company considers counterparty credit risk in the valuation of its positions and recognizes credit valuation adjustments as appropriate within Trading revenues in the consolidated statements of income.

 

128

LOGO

Table of Contents
The following table summarizes the key characteristics of the Company’s credit derivative portfolio by counterparty at December 31, 2013 and December 31, 2012. The fair values shown are before the application of any counterparty or cash collateral netting. For additional credit exposure information on the Company’s credit derivative portfolio, see Note 12 to the consolidated financial statements in Item 8.

 

 	  	At December 31, 2013	 
 	  	Fair Values(1)	 	  	Notionals	 
 	  	Receivable	 	  	Payable	 	  	Net	 	  	Beneficiary	 	  	Guarantor	 
 	  	(dollars in millions)	 
Banks and securities firms

  	$	36,316	 	  	$	35,005	 	  	$	1,311	 	  	$	1,126,688	 	  	$	1,093,906	 
Insurance and other financial institutions

  	 	7,877	 	  	 	7,515	 	  	 	362	 	  	 	265,958	 	  	 	302,835	 
Non-financial entities

  	 	153	 	  	 	106	 	  	 	47	 	  	 	4,732	 	  	 	4,049	 
  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 
Total

  	$	44,346	 	  	$	42,626	 	  	$	1,720	 	  	$	1,397,378	 	  	$	1,400,790	 
  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 
 

(1)	The Company’s CDS are classified in both Level 2 and Level 3 of the fair value hierarchy. Approximately 5% of receivable fair values and 5% of payable fair values represent Level 3 amounts (see Note 4 to the consolidated financial statements in Item 8).
 

 	  	At December 31, 2012	 
 	  	Fair Values(1)	 	  	Notionals	 
 	  	Receivable	 	  	Payable	 	  	Net	 	  	Beneficiary	 	  	Guarantor	 
 	  	(dollars in millions)	 
Banks and securities firms

  	$	60,728	 	  	$	57,399	 	  	$	3,329	 	  	$	1,620,774	 	  	$	1,573,217	 
Insurance and other financial institutions

  	 	7,313	 	  	 	6,908	 	  	 	405	 	  	 	278,705	 	  	 	313,897	 
Non-financial entities

  	 	226	 	  	 	187	 	  	 	39	 	  	 	7,922	 	  	 	6,078	 
  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 
Total

  	$	68,267	 	  	$	64,494	 	  	$	3,773	 	  	$	1,907,401	 	  	$	1,893,192	 
  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 
 

(1)	The Company’s CDS are classified in both Level 2 and Level 3 of the fair value hierarchy. Approximately 7% of receivable fair values and 5% of payable fair values represent Level 3 amounts (see Note 4 to the consolidated financial statements in Item 8).
 

Other

 

In addition to the activities noted above, there are other credit risks managed by the Credit Risk Management Department and various business areas within the Institutional Securities business segment. The Company participates in securitization activities whereby it extends short- or long-term funding to clients through loans and lending commitments that are secured by assets of the borrower and generally provide for over-collateralization, including commercial real estate, loans secured by loan pools, commercial company loans, and secured lines of revolving credit. Credit risk with respect to these loans and lending commitments arises from the failure of a borrower to perform according to the terms of the loan agreement or a decline in the underlying collateral value. See Note 7 to the consolidated financial statements in Item 8 for information about the Company’s securitization activities. Certain risk management activities as they pertain to establishing appropriate collateral amounts for the Company’s prime brokerage and securitized product businesses are primarily monitored within those respective areas in that they determine the appropriate collateral level for each strategy or position. In addition, a collateral management group monitors collateral levels against requirements and oversees the administration of the collateral function. See Note 6 to the consolidated financial statements in Item 8 for additional information about the Company’s collateralized transactions.

 

Country Risk Exposure.

 

Country risk exposure is the risk that uncertainties arising from the economic, social, security and political conditions within a foreign country (any other country other than the U.S.) will adversely affect the ability of the sovereign government and/or obligors within the country to honor their obligations to the Company. Country risk exposure is measured in accordance with the Company’s internal risk management standards and includes

 

 	129	 	LOGO
Table of Contents
obligations from sovereign governments, corporations, clearinghouses and financial institutions. The Company actively manages country risk exposure through a comprehensive risk management framework that combines credit and market fundamentals and allows the Company to effectively identify, monitor and limit country risk. Country risk exposure before and after hedges is monitored and managed.

 

The Company’s obligor credit evaluation process may also identify indirect exposures whereby an obligor has vulnerability or exposure to another country or jurisdiction. Examples of indirect exposures include mutual funds that invest in a single country, offshore companies whose assets reside in another country to that of the offshore jurisdiction and finance company subsidiaries of corporations. Indirect exposures identified through the credit evaluation process may result in a reclassification of country risk.

 

The Company conducts periodic stress testing that seeks to measure the impact on the Company’s credit and market exposures of shocks stemming from negative economic or political scenarios. When deemed appropriate by the Company’s risk managers, the stress test scenarios include possible contagion effects. Second order risks such as the impact for core European banks of their peripheral exposures may also be considered. The Company also conducts legal and documentation analysis of its exposures to obligors in peripheral jurisdictions, which are defined as exposures in Greece, Ireland, Italy, Portugal and Spain (the “European Peripherals”), to identify the risk that such exposures could be redenominated into new currencies or subject to capital controls in the case of country exit from the Euro-zone. This analysis, and results of the stress tests, may result in the amendment of limits or exposure mitigation.

 

In addition to the Company’s country risk exposure, the Company discloses its cross-border risk exposure in “Financial Statements and Supplementary Data—Financial Data Supplement (Unaudited)” in Item 8. It is based on the Federal Financial Institutions Examination Council’s (“FFIEC”) regulatory guidelines for reporting cross-border information and represents the amounts that the Company may not be able to obtain from a foreign country due to country-specific events, including unfavorable economic and political conditions, economic and social instability, and changes in government policies.

 

There can be substantial differences between the Company’s country risk exposure and cross-border risk exposure. For instance, unlike the cross-border risk exposure, the Company’s country risk exposure includes the effect of certain risk mitigants. In addition, the basis for determining the domicile of the country risk exposure is different from the basis for determining the cross-border risk exposure. Cross-border risk exposure is reported based on the country of jurisdiction for the obligor or guarantor. Besides country of jurisdiction, the Company considers factors such as physical location of operations or assets, location and source of cash flows/revenues and location of collateral (if applicable) in order to determine the basis for country risk exposure. Furthermore, cross-border risk exposure incorporates CDS only where protection is purchased while country risk exposure incorporates CDS where protection is both purchased and sold.

 

130

LOGO

Table of Contents
The Company’s sovereign exposures consist of financial instruments entered into with sovereign and local governments. Its non-sovereign exposures consist of exposures to primarily corporations and financial institutions. The following table shows the Company’s five largest non-U.S. country risk net exposures except for select European countries (see the table in “Country Risk Exposure—Select European Countries” herein) at December 31, 2013. Index credit derivatives are included in the Company’s country risk exposure tables. Each reference entity within an index is allocated to that reference entity’s country of risk. Index exposures are allocated to the underlying reference entities in proportion to the notional weighting of each reference entity in the index, adjusted for any fair value receivable/payable for that reference entity. Where credit risk crosses multiple jurisdictions, for example, a CDS purchased from an issuer in a specific country that references bonds issued by an entity in a different country, the fair value of the CDS is reflected in the Net Counterparty Exposure column based on the country of the CDS issuer. Further, the notional amount of the CDS adjusted for the fair value of the receivable/payable is reflected in the Net Inventory column based on the country of the underlying reference entity.

 

Country

  	Net
Inventory(1)	 	 	Net
Counterparty
Exposure(2)(3)	 	  	Funded
Lending	 	  	Unfunded
Commitments	 	  	Exposure
Before
Hedges	 	  	Hedges(4)	 	 	Net
Exposure(5)	 
 	  	(dollars in millions)	 
United Kingdom:

  				 				  				  				  				  				 			
Sovereigns

  	$	404	 	 	$	1	 	  	$	—  	 	  	$	—  	 	  	$	405	 	  	$	(74	) 	 	$	331	 
Non-sovereigns

  	 	2,030	 	 	 	11,828	 	  	 	1,260	 	  	 	5,382	 	  	 	20,500	 	  	 	(2,848	) 	 	 	17,652	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Subtotal

  	$	2,434	 	 	$	11,829	 	  	$	1,260	 	  	$	5,382	 	  	$	20,905	 	  	$	(2,922	) 	 	$	17,983	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Japan:

  				 				  				  				  				  				 			
Sovereigns

  	$	9,000	 	 	$	88	 	  	$	—  	 	  	$	—  	 	  	$	9,088	 	  	$	(10	) 	 	$	9,078	 
Non-sovereigns

  	 	784	 	 	 	2,350	 	  	 	26	 	  	 	—  	 	  	 	3,160	 	  	 	(50	) 	 	 	3,110	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Subtotal

  	$	9,784	 	 	$	2,438	 	  	$	26	 	  	$	—  	 	  	$	12,248	 	  	$	(60	) 	 	$	12,188	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Germany:

  				 				  				  				  				  				 			
Sovereigns

  	$	(607	) 	 	$	748	 	  	$	—  	 	  	$	—  	 	  	$	141	 	  	$	(1,497	) 	 	$	(1,356	) 
Non-sovereigns

  	 	83	 	 	 	4,194	 	  	 	263	 	  	 	4,152	 	  	 	8,692	 	  	 	(1,917	) 	 	 	6,775	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Subtotal

  	$	(524	) 	 	$	4,942	 	  	$	263	 	  	$	4,152	 	  	$	8,833	 	  	$	(3,414	) 	 	$	5,419	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Brazil:

  				 				  				  				  				  				 			
Sovereigns

  	$	3,460	 	 	$	—  	 	  	$	—  	 	  	$	—  	 	  	$	3,460	 	  	$	—  	 	 	$	3,460	 
Non-sovereigns

  	 	60	 	 	 	159	 	  	 	1,073	 	  	 	213	 	  	 	1,505	 	  	 	(309	) 	 	 	1,196	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Subtotal

  	$	3,520	 	 	$	159	 	  	$	1,073	 	  	$	213	 	  	$	4,965	 	  	$	(309	) 	 	$	4,656	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Canada:

  				 				  				  				  				  				 			
Sovereigns

  	$	723	 	 	$	287	 	  	$	—  	 	  	$	—  	 	  	$	1,010	 	  	$	—  	 	 	$	1,010	 
Non-sovereigns

  	 	866	 	 	 	1,236	 	  	 	102	 	  	 	1,391	 	  	 	3,595	 	  	 	(242	) 	 	 	3,353	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Subtotal

  	$	1,589	 	 	$	1,523	 	  	$	102	 	  	$	1,391	 	  	$	4,605	 	  	$	(242	) 	 	$	4,363	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
 

(1)	Net inventory represents exposure to both long and short single-name and index positions (i.e., bonds and equities at fair value and CDS based on notional amount assuming zero recovery adjusted for any fair value receivable or payable). As a market maker, the Company transacts in these CDS positions to facilitate client trading. At December 31, 2013, gross purchased protection, gross written protection and net exposures related to single-name and index credit derivatives for those countries were $(189.9) billion, $189.0 billion and $(0.9) billion, respectively. For a further description of the triggers for purchased credit protection and whether those triggers may limit the effectiveness of the Company’s hedges, see “Credit Exposure—Derivatives” herein.
(2)	Net counterparty exposure (i.e., repurchase transactions, securities lending and OTC derivatives) takes into consideration legally enforceable master netting agreements and collateral.
(3)	At December 31, 2013, the benefit of collateral received against counterparty credit exposure was $7.8 billion in the U.K., with 98% of collateral consisting of cash, U.S. and U.K. government obligations, and $11.1 billion in Germany with 96% of collateral consisting of cash and government obligations of France, Belgium and Netherlands. The benefit of collateral received against counterparty credit exposure in the three other countries totaled approximately $3.9 billion, with collateral primarily consisting of cash, U.S. and Japanese government obligations. These amounts do not include collateral received on secured financing transactions.
 

 	131	 	LOGO
Table of Contents
(4)	Represents CDS hedges (purchased and sold) on net counterparty exposure and funded lending executed by trading desks responsible for hedging counterparty and lending credit risk exposures for the Company. Based on the CDS notional amount assuming zero recovery adjusted for any fair value receivable or payable.
(5)	In addition, at December 31, 2013, the Company had exposure to these countries for overnight deposits with banks of approximately $10.4 billion.
 

Country Risk Exposure—Select European Countries.    In connection with certain of its Institutional Securities business segment activities, the Company has exposure to many foreign countries. The following table shows the Company’s exposure to the European Peripherals at December 31, 2013. Country exposure is measured in accordance with the Company’s internal risk management standards and includes obligations from sovereigns and non-sovereigns, which include governments, corporations, clearinghouses and financial institutions.

 

Country

 	Net
Inventory(1)	 	 	Net
Counterparty
Exposure(2)(3)	 	 	Funded
Lending	 	 	Unfunded
Commitments	 	 	CDS
Adjustment(4)	 	 	Exposure
Before
Hedges	 	 	Hedges(5)	 	 	Net
Exposure	 
 	 	(dollars in millions)	 
Greece:

 				 				 				 				 				 				 				 			
Sovereigns

 	$	8	 	 	$	7	 	 	$	—  	 	 	$	—  	 	 	$	—  	 	 	$	15	 	 	$	—  	 	 	$	15	 
Non-sovereigns

 	 	118	 	 	 	3	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	121	 	 	 	(4	) 	 	 	117	 
 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Subtotal

 	$	126	 	 	$	10	 	 	$	—  	 	 	$	—  	 	 	$	—  	 	 	$	136	 	 	$	(4	) 	 	$	132	 
 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Ireland:

 				 				 				 				 				 				 				 			
Sovereigns

 	$	5	 	 	$	1	 	 	$	—  	 	 	$	—  	 	 	$	5	 	 	$	11	 	 	$	—  	 	 	$	11	 
Non-sovereigns

 	 	239	 	 	 	51	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	13	 	 	 	303	 	 	 	(8	) 	 	 	295	 
 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Subtotal

 	$	244	 	 	$	52	 	 	$	—  	 	 	$	—  	 	 	$	18	 	 	$	314	 	 	$	(8	) 	 	$	306	 
 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Italy:

 				 				 				 				 				 				 				 			
Sovereigns

 	$	752	 	 	$	221	 	 	$	—  	 	 	$	—  	 	 	$	713	 	 	$	1,686	 	 	$	(225	) 	 	$	1,461	 
Non-sovereigns

 	 	182	 	 	 	849	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	706	 	 	 	115	 	 	 	1,852	 	 	 	(243	) 	 	 	1,609	 
 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Subtotal

 	$	934	 	 	$	1,070	 	 	$	—  	 	 	$	706	 	 	$	828	 	 	$	3,538	 	 	$	(468	) 	 	$	3,070	 
 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Spain:

 				 				 				 				 				 				 				 			
Sovereigns

 	$	938	 	 	$	—  	 	 	$	—  	 	 	$	—  	 	 	$	16	 	 	$	954	 	 	$	—  	 	 	$	954	 
Non-sovereigns

 	 	235	 	 	 	128	 	 	 	120	 	 	 	976	 	 	 	14	 	 	 	1,473	 	 	 	(234	) 	 	 	1,239	 
 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Subtotal

 	$	1,173	 	 	$	128	 	 	$	120	 	 	$	976	 	 	$	30	 	 	$	2,427	 	 	$	(234	) 	 	$	2,193	 
 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Portugal:

 				 				 				 				 				 				 				 			
Sovereigns

 	$	(222	) 	 	$	—  	 	 	$	—  	 	 	$	—  	 	 	$	47	 	 	$	(175	) 	 	$	—  	 	 	$	(175	) 
Non-sovereigns

 	 	(77	) 	 	 	27	 	 	 	103	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	32	 	 	 	85	 	 	 	(9	) 	 	 	76	 
 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Subtotal

 	$	(299	) 	 	$	27	 	 	$	103	 	 	$	—  	 	 	$	79	 	 	$	(90	) 	 	$	(9	) 	 	$	(99	) 
 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Sovereigns

 	$	1,481	 	 	$	229	 	 	$	—  	 	 	$	—  	 	 	$	781	 	 	$	2,491	 	 	$	(225	) 	 	$	2,266	 
Non-sovereigns

 	 	697	 	 	 	1,058	 	 	 	223	 	 	 	1,682	 	 	 	174	 	 	 	3,834	 	 	 	(498	) 	 	 	3,336	 
 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Total European Peripherals(6)

 	$	2,178	 	 	$	1,287	 	 	$	223	 	 	$	1,682	 	 	$	955	 	 	$	6,325	 	 	$	(723	) 	 	$	5,602	 
 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
 

(1)	Net inventory represents exposure to both long and short single-name and index positions (i.e., bonds and equities at fair value and CDS based on notional amount assuming zero recovery adjusted for any fair value receivable or payable). As a market maker, the Company transacts in these CDS positions to facilitate client trading. At December 31, 2013, gross purchased protection, gross written protection and net exposures related to single-name and index credit derivatives for the European Peripherals were $(114.6) billion, $114.0 billion and $(0.5) billion, respectively. For a further description of the triggers for purchased credit protection and whether those triggers may limit the effectiveness of the Company’s hedges, see “Credit Exposure—Derivatives” herein.
(2)	Net counterparty exposure (i.e., repurchase transactions, securities lending and OTC derivatives) takes into consideration legally enforceable master netting agreements and collateral.
(3)	At December 31, 2013, the benefit of collateral received against counterparty credit exposure was $3.7 billion in the European Peripherals with 93% of collateral consisting of cash and German government obligations. These amounts do not include collateral received on secured financing transactions.
 

132

LOGO

Table of Contents
(4)	CDS adjustment represents credit protection purchased from European Peripherals’ banks on European Peripherals’ sovereign and financial institution risk. Based on the CDS notional amount assuming zero recovery adjusted for any fair value receivable or payable.
(5)	Represents CDS hedges (purchased and sold) on net counterparty exposure and funded lending executed by trading desks responsible for hedging counterparty and lending credit risk exposures for the Company. Based on the CDS notional amount assuming zero recovery adjusted for any fair value receivable or payable.
(6)	In addition, at December 31, 2013, the Company had European Peripherals exposure for overnight deposits with banks of approximately $111 million.
 

Industry Exposure—OTC Derivative Products.    The Company also monitors its credit exposure to individual industries for current exposure arising from the Company’s OTC derivative contracts.

 

The following table shows the Company’s OTC derivative products by industry at December 31, 2013:

 

Industry

  	OTC Derivative Products(1)	 
 	  	(dollars in millions)	 
Utilities

  	$	3,142	 
Banks and securities firms

  	 	2,358	 
Funds, exchanges and other financial services(2)

  	 	2,433	 
Special purpose vehicles

  	 	1,908	 
Regional governments

  	 	1,597	 
Healthcare

  	 	1,089	 
Industrials

  	 	914	 
Sovereign governments

  	 	816	 
Not-for-profit organizations

  	 	672	 
Insurance

  	 	538	 
Real Estate

  	 	503	 
Consumer staples

  	 	487	 
Other

  	 	1,157	 
  	
 

 

 
Total

  	$	17,614	 
  	
 

 

 
 

(1)	For further information on derivative instruments and hedging activities, see Note 12 to the consolidated financial statements in Item 8.
(2)	Includes mutual funds, pension funds, private equity and real estate funds, exchanges and clearinghouses and diversified financial services.
 

Operational Risk.

 

Operational risk refers to the risk of loss, or of damage to the Company’s reputation, resulting from inadequate or failed processes, people and systems or from external events (e.g., fraud, legal and compliance risks or damage to physical assets). The Company may incur operational risk across the full scope of its business activities, including revenue-generating activities (e.g., sales and trading) and control groups (e.g., information technology and trade processing). Legal, regulatory and compliance risk is included in the scope of operational risk and is discussed below under “Legal, Regulatory and Compliance Risk.”

 

The Company has established an operational risk framework to identify, measure, monitor and control risk across the Company. Effective operational risk management is essential to reducing the impact of operational risk incidents and mitigating legal, regulatory and reputational risks. The framework is continually evolving to account for changes in the Company and respond to the changing regulatory and business environment. The Company has implemented operational risk data and assessment systems to monitor and analyze internal and external operational risk events, business environment and internal control factors and to perform scenario analysis. The collected data elements are incorporated in the operational risk capital model. The model encompasses both quantitative and qualitative elements. Internal loss data and scenario analysis results are direct inputs to the capital model, while external operational incidents, business environment internal control factors and metrics are indirect inputs to the model.

 

 	133	 	LOGO
Table of Contents
Primary responsibility for the management of operational risk is with the business segments, the control groups and the business managers therein. The business managers generally maintain processes and controls designed to identify, assess, manage, mitigate and report operational risk. Each business segment has a designated operational risk coordinator. The operational risk coordinator regularly reviews operational risk issues and reports to senior management within each business. Each control group also has a designated operational risk coordinator and a forum for discussing operational risk matters with senior management. Oversight of operational risk is provided by regional risk committees and senior management. In the event of a merger; joint venture; divestiture; reorganization; or creation of a new legal entity, a new product or a business activity, operational risks are considered, and any necessary changes in processes or controls are implemented.

 

The Operational Risk Department (“ORD”) is independent of the divisions and reports to the CRO. ORD provides oversight of operational risk management and independently assesses, measures and monitors operational risk. ORD works with the divisions and control groups to help ensure a transparent, consistent and comprehensive framework for managing operational risk within each area and across the Company. ORD’s scope includes the information and technology risk oversight program and supplier management (vendor risk oversight and assessment) program. Furthermore, ORD supports the collection and reporting of operational risk incidents and the execution of operational risk assessments; provides the infrastructure needed for risk measurement and risk management; and ensures ongoing validation and verification of the Company’s advanced measurement approach for operational risk capital.

 

Business Continuity Management is responsible for identifying key risks and threats to the Company’s resiliency and planning to ensure that a recovery strategy and required resources are in place for the resumption of critical business functions following a disaster or other business interruption. Disaster recovery plans are in place for critical facilities and resources on a company-wide basis, and redundancies are built into the systems as deemed appropriate. The key components of the Company’s disaster recovery plans include: crisis management; business recovery plans; applications/data recovery; work area recovery; and other elements addressing management, analysis, training and testing.

 

The Company maintains an information security program that coordinates the management of information security risks and satisfies regulatory requirements. Information security policies are designed to protect the Company’s information assets against unauthorized disclosure, modification or misuse. These policies cover a broad range of areas, including: application entitlements, data protection, incident response, Internet and electronic communications, remote access and portable devices. The Company has also established policies, procedures and technologies to protect its computers and other assets from unauthorized access.

 

The Company utilizes the services of external vendors in connection with the Company’s ongoing operations. These may include, for example, outsourced processing and support functions and consulting and other professional services. The Company manages its exposures to the quality of these services through a variety of means, including service level and other contractual agreements, and ongoing monitoring of the vendors’ performance. It is anticipated that the use of these services will continue and possibly increase in the future. The Supplier Risk Management program is responsible for the policies, procedures, organizations, governance and supporting technology to ensure adequate risk management controls between the Company and its third-party suppliers as it relates to information security, disaster recoverability and other key areas. The program ensures Company compliance with regulatory requirements.

 

Legal, Regulatory and Compliance Risk.

 

Legal, regulatory and compliance risk includes the risk of legal or regulatory sanctions, material financial loss including fines, penalties, judgments, damages and/or settlements, or loss to reputation the Company may suffer as a result of failure to comply with laws, regulations, rules, related self-regulatory organization standards and codes of conduct applicable to its business activities. Legal, regulatory and compliance risk also includes contractual and commercial risk such as the risk that a counterparty’s performance obligations will be

 

134

LOGO

Table of Contents
unenforceable. The Company is generally subject to extensive regulation in the different jurisdictions in which it conducts its business (see also “Business—Supervision and Regulation” in Part I, Item 1 and “Risk Factors” in Part I, Item 1A). The Company has established procedures based on legal and regulatory requirements on a worldwide basis that are designed to foster compliance with applicable statutory and regulatory requirements. The Company, principally through the Legal and Compliance Division, also has established procedures that are designed to require that the Company’s policies relating to business conduct, ethics and practices are followed globally. In connection with its businesses, the Company has and continuously develops various procedures addressing issues such as regulatory capital requirements, sales and trading practices, new products, information barriers, potential conflicts of interest, structured transactions, use and safekeeping of customer funds and securities, lending and credit granting, anti-money laundering, privacy and recordkeeping. In addition, the Company has established procedures to mitigate the risk that a counterparty’s performance obligations will be unenforceable, including consideration of counterparty legal authority and capacity, adequacy of legal documentation, the permissibility of a transaction under applicable law and whether applicable bankruptcy or insolvency laws limit or alter contractual remedies. The legal and regulatory focus on the financial services industry presents a continuing business challenge for the Company.

 

 	135	 	LOGO
Table of Contents
Item 8.	Financial Statements and Supplementary Data.
 

REPORT OF INDEPENDENT REGISTERED PUBLIC ACCOUNTING FIRM

 

To the Board of Directors and Shareholders of Morgan Stanley:

 

We have audited the accompanying consolidated statements of financial condition of Morgan Stanley and subsidiaries (the “Company”) as of December 31, 2013 and 2012 and the consolidated statements of income, comprehensive income, cash flows, and changes in total equity for the years ended December 31, 2013, 2012 and 2011. These consolidated financial statements are the responsibility of the Company’s management. Our responsibility is to express an opinion on these consolidated financial statements based on our audits.

 

We conducted our audits in accordance with the standards of the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board (United States). Those standards require that we plan and perform the audit to obtain reasonable assurance about whether the financial statements are free of material misstatement. An audit includes examining, on a test basis, evidence supporting the amounts and disclosures in the financial statements. An audit also includes assessing the accounting principles used and significant estimates made by management, as well as evaluating the overall financial statement presentation. We believe that our audits provide a reasonable basis for our opinion.

 

In our opinion, such consolidated financial statements present fairly, in all material respects, the financial position of the Company as of December 31, 2013 and 2012, and the results of their operations and their cash flows for the years ended December 31, 2013, 2012 and 2011, in conformity with accounting principles generally accepted in the United States of America.

 

We have also audited, in accordance with the standards of the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board (United States), the Company’s internal control over financial reporting as of December 31, 2013, based on the criteria established in Internal Control—Integrated Framework (1992) issued by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway Commission, and our report dated February 25, 2014 expressed an unqualified opinion on the Company’s internal control over financial reporting.

 

/s/ Deloitte & Touche LLP

New York, New York
February 25, 2014
 

 	136	 	
Table of Contents
MORGAN STANLEY

 

Consolidated Statements of Financial Condition

(dollars in millions, except share data)

 

 	  	December 31,
2013	 	 	December 31,
2012	 
Assets

  				 			
Cash and due from banks ($544 and $526 at December 31, 2013 and December 31, 2012, respectively, related to consolidated variable interest entities generally not available to the Company)

  	$	16,602	  	 	$	20,878	 
Interest bearing deposits with banks

  	 	43,281	  	 	 	26,026	 
Cash deposited with clearing organizations or segregated under federal and other regulations or requirements

  	 	39,203	  	 	 	30,970	 
Trading assets, at fair value (approximately $151,078 and $147,348 were pledged to various parties at December 31, 2013 and December 31, 2012, respectively; $2,825 and $3,505 related to consolidated variable interest entities, generally not available to the Company at December 31, 2013 and December 31, 2012, respectively)

  	 	280,744	  	 	
 

267,603

 

Securities available for sale, at fair value

  	 	53,430	  	 	 	39,869	 
Securities received as collateral, at fair value

  	 	20,508	  	 	 	14,278	 
Federal funds sold and securities purchased under agreements to resell (includes $866 and $621 at fair value at December 31, 2013 and December 31, 2012, respectively)

  	 	118,130	  	 	
 

134,412

 

Securities borrowed

  	 	129,707	  	 	 	121,701	 
Customer and other receivables

  	 	57,104	  	 	 	64,288	 
Loans:

  				 			
Held for investment (net of allowances of $156 and $106 at December 31, 2013 and December 31, 2012, respectively)

  	 	36,545	  	 	 	23,917	 
Held for sale

  	 	6,329	  	 	 	5,129	 
Other investments

  	 	5,086	  	 	 	4,999	 
Premises, equipment and software costs (net of accumulated depreciation of $6,420 and $5,525 at December 31, 2013 and December 31, 2012, respectively) ($201 and $224 at December 31, 2013 and December 31, 2012, respectively, related to consolidated variable interest entities, generally not available to the Company)

  	 	6,019	  	 	
 

5,946

 

Goodwill

  	 	6,595	  	 	 	6,650	 
Intangible assets (net of accumulated amortization of $1,703 and $1,250 at December 31, 2013 and December 31, 2012, respectively) (includes $8 and $7 at fair value at December 31, 2013 and December 31, 2012, respectively)

  	 	3,286	  	 	 	3,783	 
Other assets ($11 and $593 at December 31, 2013 and December 31, 2012, respectively, related to consolidated variable interest entities, generally not available to the Company)

  	 	10,133	  	 	 	10,511	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Total assets

  	$	832,702	  	 	$	780,960	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Liabilities

  				 			
Deposits (includes $185 and $1,485 at fair value at December 31, 2013 and December 31, 2012, respectively)

  	$	112,379	  	 	$	83,266	 
Commercial paper and other short-term borrowings (includes $1,347 and $725 at fair value at December 31, 2013 and December 31, 2012, respectively)

  	 	2,142	  	 	 	2,138	 
Trading liabilities, at fair value

  	 	104,521	  	 	 	120,122	 
Obligation to return securities received as collateral, at fair value

  	 	24,568	  	 	 	18,226	 
Securities sold under agreements to repurchase (includes $561 and $363 at fair value at December 31, 2013 and December 31, 2012, respectively)

  	 	145,676	  	 	
 

122,674

 

Securities loaned

  	 	32,799	  	 	 	36,849	 
Other secured financings (includes $5,206 and $9,466 at fair value at December 31, 2013 and December 31, 2012, respectively) ($543 and $976 at December 31, 2013 and December 31, 2012, respectively, related to consolidated variable interest entities and are non-recourse to the Company)

  	 	14,215	  	 	
 

15,727

 

Customer and other payables

  	 	157,125	  	 	 	127,722	 
Other liabilities and accrued expenses ($76 and $117 at December 31, 2013 and December 31, 2012, respectively, related to consolidated variable interest entities and are non-recourse to the Company)

  	 	16,672	  	 	 	14,928	 
Long-term borrowings (includes $35,637 and $44,044 at fair value at December 31, 2013 and December 31, 2012, respectively)

  	 	153,575	  	 	 	169,571	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Total liabilities

  	 	763,672	  	 	 	711,223	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Commitments and contingent liabilities (see Note 13)

  				 			
Redeemable noncontrolling interests (see Notes 3 and 15)

  	 	—  	  	 	 	4,309	 
Equity

  				 			
Morgan Stanley shareholders’ equity:

  				 			
Preferred stock (see Note 15)

  	 	3,220	  	 	 	1,508	 
Common stock, $0.01 par value:

  				 			
Shares authorized: 3,500,000,000 at December 31, 2013 and December 31, 2012;

  				 			
Shares issued: 2,038,893,979 at December 31, 2013 and December 31, 2012;

  				 			
Shares outstanding: 1,944,868,751 at December 31, 2013 and 1,974,042,123 at December 31, 2012

  	 	20	  	 	 	20	 
Additional Paid-in capital

  	 	24,570	  	 	 	23,426	 
Retained earnings

  	 	42,172	 	 	 	39,912	 
Employee stock trusts

  	 	1,718	 	 	 	2,932	 
Accumulated other comprehensive loss

  	 	(1,093	) 	 	 	(516	) 
Common stock held in treasury, at cost, $0.01 par value; 94,025,228 shares at December 31, 2013 and 64,851,856 shares at December 31, 2012

  	 	(2,968	) 	 	 	(2,241	) 
Common stock issued to employee stock trusts

  	 	(1,718	) 	 	 	(2,932	) 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Total Morgan Stanley shareholders’ equity

  	 	65,921	 	 	 	62,109	 
Nonredeemable noncontrolling interests

  	 	3,109	 	 	 	3,319	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Total equity

  	 	69,030	 	 	 	65,428	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Total liabilities, redeemable noncontrolling interests and equity

  	$	832,702	 	 	$	780,960	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
See Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements.

 

 	137	 	LOGO
Table of Contents
MORGAN STANLEY

 

Consolidated Statements of Income

(dollars in millions, except share and per share data)

 

 	  	2013	 	 	2012	 	 	2011	 
Revenues:

  				 				 			
Investment banking

  	$	5,246	 	 	$	4,758	 	 	$	4,991	 
Trading

  	 	9,359	 	 	 	6,990	 	 	 	12,384	 
Investments

  	 	1,777	 	 	 	742	 	 	 	573	 
Commissions and fees

  	 	4,629	 	 	 	4,253	 	 	 	5,343	 
Asset management, distribution and administration fees

  	 	9,638	 	 	 	9,008	 	 	 	8,409	 
Other

  	 	990	 	 	 	556	 	 	 	176	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Total non-interest revenues

  	 	31,639	 	 	 	26,307	 	 	 	31,876	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Interest income

  	 	5,209	 	 	 	5,692	 	 	 	7,234	 
Interest expense

  	 	4,431	 	 	 	5,897	 	 	 	6,883	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Net interest

  	 	778	 	 	 	(205	) 	 	 	351	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Net revenues

  	 	32,417	 	 	 	26,102	 	 	 	32,227	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Non-interest expenses:

  				 				 			
Compensation and benefits

  	 	16,277	 	 	 	15,615	 	 	 	16,325	 
Occupancy and equipment

  	 	1,499	 	 	 	1,543	 	 	 	1,544	 
Brokerage, clearing and exchange fees

  	 	1,711	 	 	 	1,535	 	 	 	1,633	 
Information processing and communications

  	 	1,768	 	 	 	1,912	 	 	 	1,808	 
Marketing and business development

  	 	638	 	 	 	601	 	 	 	594	 
Professional services

  	 	1,894	 	 	 	1,922	 	 	 	1,793	 
Other

  	 	4,148	 	 	 	2,454	 	 	 	2,420	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Total non-interest expenses

  	 	27,935	 	 	 	25,582	 	 	 	26,117	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Income from continuing operations before income taxes

  	 	4,482	 	 	 	520	 	 	 	6,110	 
Provision for (benefit from) income taxes

  	 	826	 	 	 	(237	) 	 	 	1,414	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Income from continuing operations

  	 	3,656	 	 	 	757	 	 	 	4,696	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Discontinued operations:

  				 				 			
Gain (loss) from discontinued operations

  	 	(72	) 	 	 	(48	) 	 	 	(170	) 
Provision for (benefit from) income taxes

  	 	(29	) 	 	 	(7	) 	 	 	(119	) 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Net gain (loss) from discontinued operations

  	 	(43	) 	 	 	(41	) 	 	 	(51	) 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Net income

  	$	3,613	 	 	$	716	 	 	$	4,645	 
Net income applicable to redeemable noncontrolling interests

  	 	222	 	 	 	124	 	 	 	—  	 
Net income applicable to nonredeemable noncontrolling interests

  	 	459	 	 	 	524	 	 	 	535	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Net income applicable to Morgan Stanley

  	$	2,932	 	 	$	68	 	 	$	4,110	 
Preferred stock dividends

  	 	277	 	 	 	98	 	 	 	2,043	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Earnings (loss) applicable to Morgan Stanley common shareholders

  	$	2,655	 	 	$	(30	) 	 	$	2,067	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Amounts applicable to Morgan Stanley:

  				 				 			
Income from continuing operations

  	$	2,975	 	 	$	138	 	 	$	4,168	 
Net loss from discontinued operations

  	 	(43	) 	 	 	(70	) 	 	 	(58	) 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Net income applicable to Morgan Stanley

  	$	2,932	 	 	$	68	 	 	$	4,110	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Earnings (loss) per basic common share:

  				 				 			
Income from continuing operations

  	$	1.42	 	 	$	0.02	 	 	$	1.28	 
Net loss from discontinued operations

  	 	(0.03	)	 	 	(0.04	)	 	 	(0.03	)
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Earnings (loss) per basic common share

  	$	1.39	 	 	$	(0.02	)	 	$	1.25	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Earnings (loss) per diluted common share:

  				 				 			
Income from continuing operations

  	$	1.38	 	 	$	0.02	 	 	$	1.27	 
Net loss from discontinued operations

  	 	(0.02	)	 	 	(0.04	)	 	 	(0.04	)
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Earnings (loss) per diluted common share

  	$	1.36	 	 	$	(0.02	)	 	$	1.23	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Dividends declared per common share

  	$	0.20	 	 	$	0.20	 	 	$	0.20	 
Average common shares outstanding:

  				 				 			
Basic

  	 	1,905,823,882	 	 	 	1,885,774,276	 	 	 	1,654,708,640	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Diluted

  	 	1,956,519,738	 	 	 	1,918,811,270	 	 	 	1,675,271,669	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
 

See Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements.

 

LOGO	 	138	 	
Table of Contents
MORGAN STANLEY

 

Consolidated Statements of Comprehensive Income

(dollars in millions)

 

 	  	2013	 	 	2012	 	 	2011	 
Net income

  	$	3,613	 	 	$	716	 	 	$	4,645	 
Other comprehensive income (loss), net of tax:

  				 				 			
Foreign currency translation adjustments(1)

  	$	(348	) 	 	$	(255	) 	 	$	35	 
Amortization of cash flow hedges(2)

  	 	4	 	 	 	6	 	 	 	7	 
Change in net unrealized gains (losses) on securities available for sale(3)

  	 	(433	) 	 	 	28	 	 	 	87	 
Pension, postretirement and other related adjustments(4)

  	 	(5	) 	 	 	(260	) 	 	 	251	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Total other comprehensive income (loss)

  	$	(782	) 	 	$	(481	) 	 	$	380	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Comprehensive income

  	$	2,831	 	 	$	235	 	 	$	5,025	 
Net income applicable to redeemable noncontrolling interests

  	 	222	 	 	 	124	 	 	 	—  	 
Net income applicable to nonredeemable noncontrolling interests

  	 	459	 	 	 	524	 	 	 	535	 
Other comprehensive income (loss) applicable to redeemable noncontrolling interests

  	 	—  	 	 	 	(2	) 	 	 	—  	 
Other comprehensive income (loss) applicable to nonredeemable noncontrolling interests

  	 	(205	) 	 	 	(120	) 	 	 	70	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Comprehensive income (loss) applicable to Morgan Stanley

  	$	2,355	 	 	$	(291	) 	 	$	4,420	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
 

(1)	Amounts are net of provision for income taxes of $351 million, $120 million and $86 million for 2013, 2012 and 2011, respectively.
(2)	Amounts are net of provision for income taxes of $3 million, $3 million and $6 million for 2013, 2012 and 2011, respectively.
(3)	Amounts are net of provision for (benefit from) income taxes of $(296) million, $16 million and $63 million for 2013, 2012 and 2011, respectively.
(4)	Amounts are net of provision for (benefit from) income taxes of $8 million, $(156) million and $153 million for 2013, 2012 and 2011, respectively.
 

See Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements.

 

 	139	 	LOGO
Table of Contents
MORGAN STANLEY

 

Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows

(dollars in millions)

 

 	  	2013	 	 	2012	 	 	2011	 
CASH FLOWS FROM OPERATING ACTIVITIES

  				 				 			
Net income

  	$	3,613	 	 	$	716	 	 	$	4,645	 
Adjustments to reconcile net income to net cash provided by operating activities:

  				 				 			
Deferred income taxes

  	 	(117	) 	 	 	(639	) 	 	 	413	 
(Income) loss on equity method investees

  	 	(375	) 	 	 	23	 	 	 	995	 
Compensation payable in common stock and options

  	 	1,180	 	 	 	891	 	 	 	1,300	 
Depreciation and amortization

  	 	1,511	 	 	 	1,581	 	 	 	1,404	 
Net gain on business dispositions

  	 	(34	) 	 	 	(156	) 	 	 	(24	) 
Net gain on sale of securities available for sale

  	 	(45	) 	 	 	(78	) 	 	 	(143	) 
Impairment charges

  	 	198	 	 	 	271	 	 	 	159	 
Provision for credit losses on lending activities

  	 	110	 	 	 	155	 	 	 	(113	) 
Other non-cash adjustments to net income

  	 	100	 	 	 	12	 	 	 	(131	) 
Changes in assets and liabilities:

  				 				 			
Cash deposited with clearing organizations or segregated under federal and other regulations or requirements

  	 	(8,233	) 	 	 	(1,516	) 	 	 	(10,274	) 
Trading assets, net of Trading liabilities

  	 	(23,054	) 	 	 	6,389	 	 	 	29,913	 
Securities borrowed

  	 	(8,006	) 	 	 	5,373	 	 	 	11,656	 
Securities loaned

  	 	(4,050	) 	 	 	6,387	 	 	 	1,368	 
Customer and other receivables and other assets

  	 	6,774	 	 	 	(10,030	) 	 	 	5,899	 
Customer and other payables and other liabilities

  	 	26,697	 	 	 	(1,283	) 	 	 	(6,985	) 
Federal funds sold and securities purchased under agreements to resell

  	 	16,282	 	 	 	(4,257	) 	 	 	18,098	 
Securities sold under agreements to repurchase

  	 	23,002	 	 	 	20,920	 	 	 	(42,798	) 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Net cash provided by operating activities

  	 	35,553	 	 	 	24,759	 	 	 	15,382	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
CASH FLOWS FROM INVESTING ACTIVITIES

  				 				 			
Proceeds from (payments for):

  				 				 			
Premises, equipment and software

  	 	(1,316	) 	 	 	(1,312	) 	 	 	(1,304	) 
Business dispositions, net of cash disposed

  	 	1,147	 	 	 	1,725	 	 	 	—  	 
Japanese securities joint venture with MUFG

  	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	(129	) 
Loans

  	 	(10,057	) 	 	 	(3,486	) 	 	 	(9,208	) 
Purchases of securities available for sale

  	 	(30,557	) 	 	 	(24,477	) 	 	 	(20,601	) 
Sales of securities available for sale

  	 	11,425	 	 	 	10,398	 	 	 	17,064	 
Maturities and redemptions of securities available for sale

  	 	4,757	 	 	 	4,738	 	 	 	2,934	 
Other investing activities

  	 	140	 	 	 	(211	) 	 	 	510	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Net cash used for investing activities

  	 	(24,461	) 	 	 	(12,625	) 	 	 	(10,734	) 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
CASH FLOWS FROM FINANCING ACTIVITIES

  				 				 			
Net proceeds from (payments for):

  				 				 			
Commercial paper and other short-term borrowings

  	 	4	 	 	 	(705	) 	 	 	(413	) 
Noncontrolling interests

  	 	(557	) 	 	 	(296	) 	 	 	(791	) 
Other secured financings

  	 	(10,726	) 	 	 	(6,628	) 	 	 	1,867	 
Deposits

  	 	29,113	 	 	 	17,604	 	 	 	1,850	 
Proceeds from:

  				 				 			
Excess tax benefits associated with stock-based awards

  	 	10	 	 	 	42	 	 	 	—  	 
Derivatives financing activities

  	 	1,003	 	 	 	243	 	 	 	129	 
Issuance of preferred stock, net of issuance costs

  	 	1,696	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 
Issuance of long-term borrowings

  	 	27,939	 	 	 	23,646	 	 	 	32,725	 
Payments for:

  				 				 			
Long-term borrowings

  	 	(38,742	) 	 	 	(43,092	) 	 	 	(39,232	) 
Derivatives financing activities

  	 	(1,216	) 	 	 	(125	) 	 	 	(132	) 
Repurchases of common stock

  	 	(691	) 	 	 	(227	) 	 	 	(317	) 
Purchase of additional stake in Wealth Management JV

  	 	(4,725	) 	 	 	(1,890	) 	 	 	—  	 
Cash dividends

  	 	(475	) 	 	 	(469	) 	 	 	(834	) 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Net cash provided by (used for) financing activities

  	 	2,633	 	 	 	(11,897	) 	 	 	(5,148	) 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Effect of exchange rate changes on cash and cash equivalents

  	 	(202	) 	 	 	(119	) 	 	 	(314	) 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Effect of cash and cash equivalents related to variable interest entities

  	 	(544	) 	 	 	(526	) 	 	 	511	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Net increase (decrease) in cash and cash equivalents

  	 	12,979	 	 	 	(408	) 	 	 	(303	) 
Cash and cash equivalents, at beginning of period

  	 	46,904	 	 	 	47,312	 	 	 	47,615	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Cash and cash equivalents, at end of period

  	$	59,883	 	 	$	46,904	 	 	$	47,312	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Cash and cash equivalents include:

  				 				 			
Cash and due from banks

  	$	16,602	 	 	$	20,878	 	 	$	13,165	 
Interest bearing deposits with banks

  	 	43,281	 	 	 	26,026	 	 	 	34,147	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Cash and cash equivalents, at end of period

  	$	59,883	 	 	$	46,904	 	 	$	47,312	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
 

SUPPLEMENTAL DISCLOSURE OF CASH FLOW INFORMATION

Cash payments for interest were $4,793 million, $5,213 million and $6,835 million for 2013, 2012 and 2011, respectively.

Cash payments for income taxes were $930 million, $388 million and $892 million for 2013, 2012 and 2011, respectively.

 

See Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements.

 

LOGO	 	140	 	
Table of Contents
MORGAN STANLEY

 

Consolidated Statements of Changes in Total Equity

(dollars in millions)

 

 	 	Preferred
Stock	 	 	Common
Stock	 	 	Paid-in
Capital	 	 	Retained
Earnings	 	 	Employee
Stock
Trusts	 	 	Accumulated
Other
Comprehensive
Income (Loss)	 	 	Common
Stock
Held in
Treasury
at Cost	 	 	Common
Stock
Issued to
Employee
Stock
Trusts	 	 	Non-
redeemable
Non-
controlling
Interests	 	 	Total
Equity	 
BALANCE AT DECEMBER 31, 2010

 	$	9,597	 	 	$	16	 	 	$	13,521	 	 	$	38,603	 	 	$	3,465	 	 	$	(467	) 	 	$	(4,059	) 	 	$	(3,465	) 	 	$	8,196	 	 	$	65,407	 
Net income applicable to Morgan Stanley

 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	4,110	 	 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	4,110	 
Net income applicable to nonredeemable noncontrolling interests

 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	535	 	 	 	535	 
Dividends

 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	(646	) 	 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	(646	) 
Shares issued under employee plans and related tax effects

 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	(642	) 	 	 	—  	  	 	 	(299	) 	 	 	—  	  	 	 	1,877	 	 	 	299	 	 	 	—  	  	 	 	1,235	 
Repurchases of common stock

 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	(317	) 	 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	(317	) 
Net change in Accumulated other comprehensive income

 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	310	 	 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	70	 	 	 	380	 
Other increase in equity method investments

 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	146	 	 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	146	 
MUFG stock conversion

 	 	(8,089	) 	 	 	4	 	 	 	9,811	 	 	 	(1,726	) 	 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  
Other net decreases

 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	(772	) 	 	 	(772	) 
 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
BALANCE AT DECEMBER 31, 2011

 	 	1,508	 	 	 	20	 	 	 	22,836	 	 	 	40,341	 	 	 	3,166	 	 	 	(157	) 	 	 	(2,499	) 	 	 	(3,166	) 	 	 	8,029	 	 	 	70,078	 
Net income applicable to Morgan Stanley

 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	68	 	 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	68	 
Net income applicable to nonredeemable noncontrolling interests

 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	524	 	 	 	524	 
Dividends

 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	(497	) 	 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	(497	) 
Shares issued under employee plans and related tax effects

 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	662	 	 	 	—  	  	 	 	(234	) 	 	 	—  	  	 	 	485	 	 	 	234	 	 	 	—  	  	 	 	1,147	 
Repurchases of common stock

 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	(227	) 	 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	(227	) 
Net change in Accumulated other comprehensive income

 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	(359	) 	 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	(120	) 	 	 	(479	) 
Purchase of additional stake in Wealth Management JV

 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	(107	) 	 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	(1,718	) 	 	 	(1,825	) 
Reclassification to redeemable noncontrolling interests

 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	(4,288	) 	 	 	(4,288	) 
Other net increases

 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	35	 	 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	892	 	 	 	927	 
 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
BALANCE AT DECEMBER 31, 2012

 	 	1,508	 	 	 	20	 	 	 	23,426	 	 	 	39,912	 	 	 	2,932	 	 	 	(516	) 	 	 	(2,241	) 	 	 	(2,932	) 	 	 	3,319	 	 	 	65,428	 
Net income applicable to Morgan Stanley

 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	2,932	 	 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	2,932	 
Net income applicable to nonredeemable noncontrolling interests

 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	459	 	 	 	459	 
Dividends

 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	(521	) 	 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	(521	) 
Shares issued under employee plans and related tax effects

 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	1,160	 	 	 	—  	  	 	 	(1,214	) 	 	 	—  	  	 	 	(36	) 	 	 	1,214	 	 	 	—  	  	 	 	1,124	 
Repurchases of common stock

 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	(691	) 	 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	(691	) 
Net change in Accumulated other comprehensive income

 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	(577	) 	 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	(205	) 	 	 	(782	) 
Issuance of preferred stock

 	 	1,712	 	 	 	—  	  	 	 	(16	) 	 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	1,696	 
Wealth Management JV redemption value adjustment

 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	(151	) 	 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	(151	) 
Other net decreases

 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	(464	) 	 	 	(464	) 
 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
BALANCE AT DECEMBER 31, 2013

 	$	3,220	 	 	$	20	 	 	$	24,570	 	 	$	42,172	 	 	$	1,718	 	 	$	(1,093	) 	 	$	(2,968	) 	 	$	(1,718	) 	 	$	3,109	 	 	$	69,030	 
 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
 

See Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements.

 

141

LOGO

Table of Contents
MORGAN STANLEY

 

NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS

 

1.    Introduction and Basis of Presentation.

 

The Company.    Morgan Stanley, a financial holding company, is a global financial services firm that maintains significant market positions in each of its business segments—Institutional Securities, Wealth Management and Investment Management. The Company, through its subsidiaries and affiliates, provides a wide variety of products and services to a large and diversified group of clients and customers, including corporations, governments, financial institutions and individuals. Unless the context otherwise requires, the terms “Morgan Stanley” or the “Company” mean Morgan Stanley (the “Parent”) together with its consolidated subsidiaries.

 

Effective with the quarter ended June 30, 2013, the Global Wealth Management Group and Asset Management business segments were re-titled Wealth Management and Investment Management, respectively.

 

A summary of the activities of each of the Company’s business segments is as follows:

 

Institutional Securities provides financial advisory and capital raising services, including: advice on mergers and acquisitions, restructurings, real estate and project finance; corporate lending; sales, trading, financing and market-making activities in equity and fixed income securities and related products, including foreign exchange and commodities; and investment activities.

 

Wealth Management provides brokerage and investment advisory services to individual investors and small-to-medium sized businesses and institutions covering various investment alternatives; financial and wealth planning services; annuity and other insurance products; credit and other lending products; cash management services; retirement services; and engages in fixed income trading, which primarily facilitates clients’ trading or investments in such securities.

 

Investment Management provides a broad array of investment strategies that span the risk/return spectrum across geographies, asset classes and public and private markets to a diverse group of clients across the institutional and intermediary channels as well as high net worth clients.

 

Discontinued Operations.

 

Quilter.    On April 2, 2012, the Company completed the sale of Quilter & Co. Ltd. (“Quilter”), its retail wealth management business in the United Kingdom (“U.K.”). Net revenues for Quilter were $148 million and $134 million for 2012 and 2011, respectively. Net pre-tax gains (losses) were $(1) million, $97 million and $21 million for 2013, 2012 and 2011, respectively, and included a gain of approximately $108 million in 2012 in connection with the sale of Quilter. The results of Quilter are reported as discontinued operations within the Wealth Management business segment for all periods presented.

 

Saxon.    On October 24, 2011, the Company announced that it had reached an agreement to sell Saxon, a provider of servicing and subservicing of residential mortgage loans, to Ocwen Financial Corporation. The transaction, which was restructured as a sale of Saxon’s assets during the first quarter of 2012, was substantially completed in the second quarter of 2012. Net revenues for Saxon were $79 million and $28 million for 2012 and 2011, respectively, and pre-tax losses were $64 million, $187 million and $194 million for 2013, 2012 and 2011, respectively. Revenues included a pre-tax gain of approximately $51 million in 2012, primarily resulting from the subsequent increase in fair value of Saxon, which had incurred impairment losses of $98 million in the quarter ended December 31, 2011. Pre-tax loss in 2012 included a provision of approximately $115 million related to a settlement with the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System (the “Federal Reserve”) concerning the independent foreclosure review related to Saxon. The results of Saxon are reported as discontinued operations within the Institutional Securities business segment for all periods presented.

 

LOGO	 	142	 	
Table of Contents
MORGAN STANLEY

 

NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS—(Continued)

 

Other.    In the fourth quarter of 2011, the Company classified a real estate property management company as held for sale within the Investment Management business segment. The transaction closed during the first quarter of 2012. The results of this company are reported as discontinued operations within the Investment Management business segment for all periods presented.

 

Remaining pre-tax gain (loss) amounts of $(7) million, $42 million and $3 million for 2013, 2012 and 2011, respectively, that are included in discontinued operations primarily related to the sale of the Company’s retail asset management business, Revel Entertainment Group, LLC (“Revel”) and a principal investment.

 

Prior-period amounts have been recast for discontinued operations.

 

Sale of Global Oil Merchanting Business.

 

On December 20, 2013, the Company and a subsidiary of Rosneft Oil Company (“Rosneft”) entered into a Purchase Agreement pursuant to which the Company will sell the global oil merchanting unit of its commodities division to Rosneft. The transaction is subject to regulatory approvals and other customary conditions and is expected to close in the second half of 2014. At December 31, 2013, the transaction does not meet the criteria for discontinued operations and is not expected to have a material impact on the Company’s consolidated financial statements.

 

Basis of Financial Information.    The consolidated financial statements are prepared in accordance with accounting principles generally accepted in the United States of America (“U.S.”), which require the Company to make estimates and assumptions regarding the valuations of certain financial instruments, the valuation of goodwill and intangible assets, compensation, deferred tax assets, the outcome of litigation and tax matters, and other matters that affect the consolidated financial statements and related disclosures. The Company believes that the estimates utilized in the preparation of the consolidated financial statements are prudent and reasonable. Actual results could differ materially from these estimates. Intercompany balances and transactions have been eliminated.

 

In 2013, the Company renamed “Principal transactions—Trading” revenues as “Trading” revenues and “Principal transactions—Investments” revenues as “Investments” revenues in the consolidated statements of income, and “Financial instruments owned” as “Trading assets,” “Financial instruments sold, not yet purchased” as “Trading liabilities,” “Receivables” as “Customer and other receivables” and “Payables” as “Customer and other payables” in the consolidated statements of financial condition.

 

Consolidation.    The consolidated financial statements include the accounts of the Company, its wholly owned subsidiaries and other entities in which the Company has a controlling financial interest, including certain variable interest entities (“VIE”) (see Note 7). For consolidated subsidiaries that are less than wholly owned, the third-party holdings of equity interests are referred to as noncontrolling interests. The portion of net income attributable to noncontrolling interests for such subsidiaries is presented as either Net income (loss) applicable to redeemable noncontrolling interests or Net income (loss) applicable to nonredeemable noncontrolling interests in the consolidated statements of income. The portion of the shareholders’ equity of such subsidiaries that is redeemable is presented as Redeemable noncontrolling interests outside of the equity section in the consolidated statements of financial condition at December 31, 2012. The portion of the shareholders’ equity of such subsidiaries that is nonredeemable is presented as Nonredeemable noncontrolling interests, a component of total equity, in the consolidated statements of financial condition at December 31, 2013 and 2012.

 

For entities where (1) the total equity investment at risk is sufficient to enable the entity to finance its activities without additional subordinated financial support and (2) the equity holders bear the economic residual risks and returns of the entity and have the power to direct the activities of the entity that most significantly affect its

 

143

LOGO

Table of Contents
MORGAN STANLEY

 

NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS—(Continued)

 

economic performance, the Company consolidates those entities it controls either through a majority voting interest or otherwise. For VIEs (i.e., entities that do not meet these criteria), the Company consolidates those entities where the Company has the power to make the decisions that most significantly affect the economic performance of the VIE and has the obligation to absorb losses or the right to receive benefits that could potentially be significant to the VIE, except for certain VIEs that are money market funds, are investment companies or are entities qualifying for accounting purposes as investment companies. Generally, the Company consolidates those entities when it absorbs a majority of the expected losses or a majority of the expected residual returns, or both, of the entities.

 

For investments in entities in which the Company does not have a controlling financial interest but has significant influence over operating and financial decisions, the Company generally applies the equity method of accounting with net gains and losses recorded within Other revenues. Where the Company has elected to measure certain eligible investments at fair value in accordance with the fair value option, net gains and losses are recorded within Investments revenues (see Note 4).

 

Equity and partnership interests held by entities qualifying for accounting purposes as investment companies are carried at fair value.

 

The Company’s significant regulated U.S. and international subsidiaries include Morgan Stanley & Co. LLC (“MS&Co.”), Morgan Stanley Smith Barney LLC (“MSSB LLC”), Morgan Stanley & Co. International plc (“MSIP”), Morgan Stanley MUFG Securities Co., Ltd. (“MSMS”), Morgan Stanley Bank, N.A. (“MSBNA”) and Morgan Stanley Private Bank, National Association (“MSPBNA”).

 

Income Statement Presentation.    The Company, through its subsidiaries and affiliates, provides a wide variety of products and services to a large and diversified group of clients and customers, including corporations, governments, financial institutions and individuals. In connection with the delivery of the various products and services to clients, the Company manages its revenues and related expenses in the aggregate. As such, when assessing the performance of its businesses, primarily in its Institutional Securities business segment, the Company considers its trading, investment banking, commissions and fees, and interest income, along with the associated interest expense, as one integrated activity.

 

2.    Significant Accounting Policies.

 

Revenue Recognition.

 

Investment Banking.    Underwriting revenues and advisory fees from mergers, acquisitions and restructuring transactions are recorded when services for the transactions are determined to be substantially completed, generally as set forth under the terms of the engagement. Transaction-related expenses, primarily consisting of legal, travel and other costs directly associated with the transaction, are deferred and recognized in the same period as the related investment banking transaction revenues. Underwriting revenues are presented net of related expenses. Non-reimbursed expenses associated with advisory transactions are recorded within Non-interest expenses.

 

Commissions and fees.    Commission and fee revenues primarily arise from agency transactions in listed and over-the-counter (“OTC”) equity securities; services related to sales and trading activities; and sales of mutual funds, futures, insurance products and options. Commission and fee revenues are recognized in the accounts on trade date.

 

Asset Management, Distribution and Administration Fees.    Asset management, distribution and administration fees are recognized over the relevant contract period. Sales commissions paid by the Company in connection with the sale of certain classes of shares of its open-end mutual fund products are accounted for as deferred

 

LOGO	 	144	 	
Table of Contents
MORGAN STANLEY

 

NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS—(Continued)

 

commission assets. The Company periodically tests the deferred commission assets for recoverability based on cash flows expected to be received in future periods. In certain management fee arrangements, the Company is entitled to receive performance-based fees (also referred to as incentive fees) when the return on assets under management exceeds certain benchmark returns or other performance targets. In such arrangements, performance fee revenues are accrued (or reversed) quarterly based on measuring account/fund performance to date versus the performance benchmark stated in the investment management agreement. Performance-based fees are recorded within Investments or Asset management, distribution and administration fees depending on the nature of the arrangement. The amount of performance-based fee revenue at risk of reversing if fund performance falls below stated investment management agreement benchmarks was approximately $489 million at December 31, 2013 and approximately $205 million at December 31, 2012.

 

Trading and Investments.    See “Financial Instruments and Fair Value” below for Trading and Investments revenue recognition discussions.

 

Financial Instruments and Fair Value.

 

A significant portion of the Company’s financial instruments is carried at fair value with changes in fair value recognized in earnings each period. A description of the Company’s policies regarding fair value measurement and its application to these financial instruments follows.

 

Financial Instruments Measured at Fair Value.    All of the instruments within Trading assets and Trading liabilities are measured at fair value, either through the fair value option election (discussed below) or as required by other accounting guidance. These financial instruments primarily represent the Company’s trading and investment positions and include both cash and derivative products. In addition, debt securities classified as Securities available for sale are measured at fair value in accordance with accounting guidance for certain investments in debt securities. Furthermore, Securities received as collateral and Obligation to return securities received as collateral are measured at fair value as required by other accounting guidance. Additionally, certain Deposits, certain Commercial paper and other short-term borrowings (structured notes), certain Other secured financings, certain Securities sold under agreements to repurchase and certain Long-term borrowings (primarily structured notes) are measured at fair value through the fair value option election.

 

Gains and losses on all of these instruments carried at fair value are reflected in Trading revenues, Investments revenues or Investment banking revenues in the consolidated statements of income, except for Securities available for sale (see “Securities Available for Sale” section herein and Note 5) and derivatives accounted for as hedges (see “Hedge Accounting” section herein and Note 12). Interest income and interest expense are recorded within the consolidated statements of income depending on the nature of the instrument and related market conventions. When interest is included as a component of the instruments’ fair value, interest is included within Trading revenues or Investments revenues. Otherwise, it is included within Interest income or Interest expense. Dividend income is recorded in Trading revenues or Investments revenues depending on the business activity. The fair value of OTC financial instruments, including derivative contracts related to financial instruments and commodities, is presented in the accompanying consolidated statements of financial condition on a net-by-counterparty basis, when appropriate. Additionally, the Company nets the fair value of cash collateral paid or received against the fair value amounts recognized for net derivative positions executed with the same counterparty under the same master netting agreement.

 

Fair Value Option.    The fair value option permits the irrevocable fair value option election on an instrument-by-instrument basis at initial recognition of an asset or liability or upon an event that gives rise to a new basis of accounting for that instrument. The Company applies the fair value option for eligible instruments, including

 

145

LOGO

Table of Contents
MORGAN STANLEY

 

NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS—(Continued)

 

certain securities purchased under agreements to resell, certain loans and lending commitments, certain equity method investments, certain securities sold under agreements to repurchase, certain structured notes, certain time deposits and certain other secured financings.

 

Fair Value Measurement—Definition and Hierarchy.    Fair value is defined as the price that would be received to sell an asset or paid to transfer a liability (i.e., the “exit price”) in an orderly transaction between market participants at the measurement date.

 

In determining fair value, the Company uses various valuation approaches and establishes a hierarchy for inputs used in measuring fair value that maximizes the use of relevant observable inputs and minimizes the use of unobservable inputs by requiring that the most observable inputs be used when available. Observable inputs are inputs that market participants would use in pricing the asset or liability that were developed based on market data obtained from sources independent of the Company. Unobservable inputs are inputs that reflect the Company’s assumptions about the assumptions other market participants would use in pricing the asset or liability that were developed based on the best information available in the circumstances. The hierarchy is broken down into three levels based on the observability of inputs as follows:

 

 	•	 	
Level 1—Valuations based on quoted prices in active markets for identical assets or liabilities that the Company has the ability to access. Valuation adjustments and block discounts are not applied to Level 1 instruments. Since valuations are based on quoted prices that are readily and regularly available in an active market, valuation of these products does not entail a significant degree of judgment.

 

 	•	 	
Level 2—Valuations based on one or more quoted prices in markets that are not active or for which all significant inputs are observable, either directly or indirectly.

 

 	•	 	
Level 3—Valuations based on inputs that are unobservable and significant to the overall fair value measurement.

 

The availability of observable inputs can vary from product to product and is affected by a wide variety of factors, including, for example, the type of product, whether the product is new and not yet established in the marketplace, the liquidity of markets and other characteristics particular to the product. To the extent that valuation is based on models or inputs that are less observable or unobservable in the market, the determination of fair value requires more judgment. Accordingly, the degree of judgment exercised by the Company in determining fair value is greatest for instruments categorized in Level 3 of the fair value hierarchy.

 

The Company considers prices and inputs that are current as of the measurement date, including during periods of market dislocation. In periods of market dislocation, the observability of prices and inputs may be reduced for many instruments. This condition could cause an instrument to be reclassified from Level 1 to Level 2 or Level 2 to Level 3 of the fair value hierarchy (see Note 4). In addition, a downturn in market conditions could lead to declines in the valuation of many instruments.

 

In certain cases, the inputs used to measure fair value may fall into different levels of the fair value hierarchy. In such cases, for disclosure purposes, the level in the fair value hierarchy within which the fair value measurement falls in its entirety is determined based on the lowest level input that is significant to the fair value measurement in its entirety.

 

Valuation Techniques.    Many cash instruments and OTC derivative contracts have bid and ask prices that can be observed in the marketplace. Bid prices reflect the highest price that a party is willing to pay for an asset. Ask prices represent the lowest price that a party is willing to accept for an asset. For financial instruments whose inputs are based on bid-ask prices, the Company does not require that the fair value estimate always be a

 

LOGO	 	146	 	
Table of Contents
MORGAN STANLEY

 

NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS—(Continued)

 

predetermined point in the bid-ask range. The Company’s policy is to allow for mid-market pricing and to adjust to the point within the bid-ask range that meets the Company’s best estimate of fair value. For offsetting positions in the same financial instrument, the same price within the bid-ask spread is used to measure both the long and short positions.

 

Fair value for many cash instruments and OTC derivative contracts is derived using pricing models. Pricing models take into account the contract terms (including maturity) as well as multiple inputs, including, where applicable, commodity prices, equity prices, interest rate yield curves, credit curves, correlation, creditworthiness of the counterparty, creditworthiness of the Company, option volatility and currency rates. Where appropriate, valuation adjustments are made to account for various factors such as liquidity risk (bid-ask adjustments), credit quality, model uncertainty and concentration risk. Adjustments for liquidity risk adjust model-derived mid-market levels of Level 2 and Level 3 financial instruments for the bid-mid or mid-ask spread required to properly reflect the exit price of a risk position. Bid-mid and mid-ask spreads are marked to levels observed in trade activity, broker quotes or other external third-party data. Where these spreads are unobservable for the particular position in question, spreads are derived from observable levels of similar positions. The Company applies credit-related valuation adjustments to its short-term and long-term borrowings (primarily structured notes) for which the fair value option was elected and to OTC derivatives. The Company considers the impact of changes in its own credit spreads based upon observations of the Company’s secondary bond market spreads when measuring the fair value for short-term and long-term borrowings. For OTC derivatives, the impact of changes in both the Company’s and the counterparty’s credit standing is considered when measuring fair value. In determining the expected exposure, the Company simulates the distribution of the future exposure to a counterparty, then applies market-based default probabilities to the future exposure, leveraging external third-party credit default swap (“CDS”) spread data. Where CDS spread data are unavailable for a specific counterparty, bond market spreads, CDS spread data based on the counterparty’s credit rating or CDS spread data that reference a comparable counterparty may be utilized. The Company also considers collateral held and legally enforceable master netting agreements that mitigate the Company’s exposure to each counterparty. Adjustments for model uncertainty are taken for positions whose underlying models are reliant on significant inputs that are neither directly nor indirectly observable, hence requiring reliance on established theoretical concepts in their derivation. These adjustments are derived by making assessments of the possible degree of variability using statistical approaches and market-based information where possible. The Company generally subjects all valuations and models to a review process initially and on a periodic basis thereafter. The Company may apply a concentration adjustment to certain of its OTC derivatives portfolios to reflect the additional cost of closing out a particularly large risk exposure. Where possible, these adjustments are based on observable market information, but in many instances, significant judgment is required to estimate the costs of closing out concentrated risk exposures due to the lack of liquidity in the marketplace.

 

Fair value is a market-based measure considered from the perspective of a market participant rather than an entity-specific measure. Therefore, even when market assumptions are not readily available, the Company’s own assumptions are set to reflect those that the Company believes market participants would use in pricing the asset or liability at the measurement date. Where the Company manages a group of financial assets and financial liabilities on the basis of its net exposure to either market risks or credit risk, the Company measures the fair value of that group of financial instruments consistently with how market participants would price the net risk exposure at the measurement date.

 

See Note 4 for a description of valuation techniques applied to the major categories of financial instruments measured at fair value.

 

Assets and Liabilities Measured at Fair Value on a Non-Recurring Basis.    Certain of the Company’s assets are measured at fair value on a non-recurring basis. The Company incurs losses or gains for any adjustments of these assets to fair value. A downturn in market conditions could result in impairment charges in future periods.

 

 	147	 	LOGO
Table of Contents
MORGAN STANLEY

 

NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS—(Continued)

 

For assets and liabilities measured at fair value on a non-recurring basis, fair value is determined by using various valuation approaches. The same hierarchy for inputs as described above, which maximizes the use of observable inputs and minimizes the use of unobservable inputs by generally requiring that the observable inputs be used when available, is used in measuring fair value for these items.

 

Valuation Process.    The Valuation Review Group (“VRG”) within the Financial Control Group (“FCG”) is responsible for the Company’s fair value valuation policies, processes and procedures. VRG is independent of the business units and reports to the Chief Financial Officer (“CFO”), who has final authority over the valuation of the Company’s financial instruments. VRG implements valuation control processes to validate the fair value of the Company’s financial instruments measured at fair value, including those derived from pricing models. These control processes are designed to assure that the values used for financial reporting are based on observable inputs wherever possible. In the event that observable inputs are not available, the control processes are designed to ensure that the valuation approach utilized is appropriate and consistently applied and that the assumptions are reasonable.

 

The Company’s control processes apply to financial instruments categorized in Level 1, Level 2 or Level 3 of the fair value hierarchy, unless otherwise noted. These control processes include:

 

Model Review.    VRG, in conjunction with the Market Risk Department (“MRD”) and, where appropriate, the Credit Risk Management Department, both of which report to the Chief Risk Officer, independently review valuation models’ theoretical soundness, the appropriateness of the valuation methodology and calibration techniques developed by the business units using observable inputs. Where inputs are not observable, VRG reviews the appropriateness of the proposed valuation methodology to ensure it is consistent with how a market participant would arrive at the unobservable input. The valuation methodologies utilized in the absence of observable inputs may include extrapolation techniques and the use of comparable observable inputs. As part of the review, VRG develops a methodology to independently verify the fair value generated by the business unit’s valuation models. Before trades are executed using new valuation models, those models are required to be independently reviewed. All of the Company’s valuation models are subject to an independent annual VRG review.

 

Independent Price Verification.    The business units are responsible for determining the fair value of financial instruments using approved valuation models and valuation methodologies. Generally on a monthly basis, VRG independently validates the fair values of financial instruments determined using valuation models by determining the appropriateness of the inputs used by the business units and by testing compliance with the documented valuation methodologies approved in the model review process described above.

 

VRG uses recently executed transactions, other observable market data such as exchange data, broker-dealer quotes, third-party pricing vendors and aggregation services for validating the fair values of financial instruments generated using valuation models. VRG assesses the external sources and their valuation methodologies to determine if the external providers meet the minimum standards expected of a third-party pricing source. Pricing data provided by approved external sources are evaluated using a number of approaches; for example, by corroborating the external sources’ prices to executed trades, by analyzing the methodology and assumptions used by the external source to generate a price and/or by evaluating how active the third-party pricing source (or originating sources used by the third-party pricing source) is in the market. Based on this analysis, VRG generates a ranking of the observable market data to ensure that the highest-ranked market data source is used to validate the business unit’s fair value of financial instruments.

 

For financial instruments categorized within Level 3 of the fair value hierarchy, VRG reviews the business unit’s valuation techniques to ensure these are consistent with market participant assumptions.

 

LOGO	 	148	 	
Table of Contents
MORGAN STANLEY

 

NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS—(Continued)

 

The results of this independent price verification and any adjustments made by VRG to the fair value generated by the business units are presented to management of the Company’s three business segments (i.e., Institutional Securities, Wealth Management and Investment Management), the CFO and the Chief Risk Officer on a regular basis.

 

Review of New Level 3 Transactions.    VRG reviews the models and valuation methodology used to price all new material Level 3 transactions, and both FCG and MRD management must approve the fair value of the trade that is initially recognized.

 

For further information on financial assets and liabilities that are measured at fair value on a recurring and non-recurring basis, see Note 4.

 

Hedge Accounting.

 

The Company applies hedge accounting using various derivative financial instruments to hedge interest rate and foreign exchange risk arising from assets and liabilities not held at fair value as part of asset/liability and currency management. These financial instruments are included within Trading assets—Derivative and other contracts or Trading liabilities—Derivative and other contracts in the consolidated statements of financial condition.

 

The Company’s hedges are designated and qualify for accounting purposes as one of the following types of hedges: hedges of changes in fair value of assets and liabilities due to the risk being hedged (fair value hedges); and hedges of net investments in foreign operations whose functional currency is different from the reporting currency of the parent company (net investment hedges).

 

For further information on derivative instruments and hedging activities, see Note 12.

 

Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows.

 

For purposes of the consolidated statements of cash flows, cash and cash equivalents consist of Cash and due from banks and Interest bearing deposits with banks, which are highly liquid investments with original maturities of three months or less, held for investment purposes, and readily convertible to known amounts of cash.

 

The Company’s significant non-cash activities in 2013 included assets and liabilities of approximately $3.6 billion and $3.1 billion, respectively, disposed of in connection with business dispositions. The Company’s significant non-cash activities in 2012 included assets and liabilities of approximately $2.6 billion and $1.0 billion, respectively, disposed of in connection with business dispositions, and approximately $1.1 billion of net assets received from Citigroup Inc. (“Citi”) related to Citi’s required equity contribution in connection with the retail securities joint venture between the Company and Citi (the “Wealth Management JV”) platform integration (see Notes 3 and 15). At June 30, 2011, Mitsubishi UFJ Financial Group, Inc. (“MUFG”) and the Company converted MUFG’s outstanding Series B Non-Cumulative Non-Voting Perpetual Convertible Preferred Stock (“Series B Preferred Stock”) in the Company with a face value of $7.8 billion (carrying value $8.1 billion) and a 10% dividend into Company common stock. As a result of the adjustment to the conversion ratio, pursuant to the transaction agreement, the Company incurred a one-time, non-cash negative adjustment of approximately $1.7 billion in its calculation of basic and diluted earnings per share (“EPS”) for 2011 (see Note 16).

 

Transfers of Financial Assets.

 

Transfers of financial assets are accounted for as sales when the Company has relinquished control over the transferred assets. Any related gain or loss on sale is recorded in Net revenues. Transfers that are not accounted for as sales are treated as a collateralized financing, in certain cases referred to as “failed sales.”

 

 	149	 	LOGO
Table of Contents
MORGAN STANLEY

 

NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS—(Continued)

 

Securities borrowed or purchased under agreements to resell and securities loaned or sold under agreements to repurchase are treated as collateralized financings (see Note 6). Securities purchased under agreements to resell (“reverse repurchase agreements”) and Securities sold under agreements to repurchase (“repurchase agreements”) are carried on the consolidated statements of financial condition at the amounts of cash paid or received, plus accrued interest, except for certain repurchase agreements for which the Company has elected the fair value option (see Note 4). Where appropriate, repurchase agreements and reverse repurchase agreements with the same counterparty are reported on a net basis. Securities borrowed and securities loaned are recorded at the amount of cash collateral advanced or received.

 

Premises, Equipment and Software Costs.

 

Premises and equipment consist of buildings, leasehold improvements, furniture, fixtures, computer and communications equipment, power plants, tugs, barges, terminals, pipelines and software (externally purchased and developed for internal use). Premises and equipment are stated at cost less accumulated depreciation and amortization. Depreciation and amortization are provided by the straight-line method over the estimated useful life of the asset. Estimated useful lives are generally as follows: buildings—39 years; furniture and fixtures—7 years; computer and communications equipment—3 to 9 years; power plants—15 years; tugs and barges—15 years; and terminals, pipelines and equipment—3 to 25 years. Estimated useful lives for software costs are generally 3 to 5 years.

 

Leasehold improvements are amortized over the lesser of the estimated useful life of the asset or, where applicable, the remaining term of the lease, but generally not exceeding: 25 years for building structural improvements and 15 years for other improvements.

 

Premises, equipment and software costs are tested for impairment whenever events or changes in circumstances suggest that an asset’s carrying value may not be fully recoverable in accordance with current accounting guidance.

 

Income Taxes.

 

The Company accounts for income tax expense (benefit) using the asset and liability method, under which recognition of deferred tax assets and related valuation allowance (recorded in Other assets) and liabilities for the expected future tax consequences of events that have been included in the financial statements. Under this method, deferred tax assets and liabilities are determined based upon the temporary differences between the financial statement and income tax bases of assets and liabilities using currently enacted tax rates in effect for the year in which the differences are expected to reverse. The effect of a change in tax rates on deferred tax assets and liabilities is recognized in income tax expense (benefit) in the period that includes the enactment date.

 

The Company recognizes net deferred tax assets to the extent that it believes these assets are more likely than not to be realized. In making such a determination, the Company considers all available positive and negative evidence, including future reversals of existing taxable temporary differences, projected future taxable income, tax-planning strategies, and results of recent operations. If the Company determines that it would be able to realize deferred tax assets in the future in excess of their net recorded amount, it would make an adjustment to the deferred tax asset valuation allowance, which would reduce the provision for income taxes.

 

Uncertain tax positions are recorded on the basis of a two-step process whereby (1) the Company determines whether it is more likely than not that the tax positions will be sustained on the basis of the technical merits of the position and (2) for those tax positions that meet the more-likely-than-not recognition threshold, the Company

 

LOGO	 	150	 	
Table of Contents
MORGAN STANLEY

 

NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS—(Continued)

 

recognizes the largest amount of tax benefit that is more than 50% likely to be realized upon ultimate settlement with the related tax authority. Interest and penalties related to unrecognized tax benefits are classified as provision for income taxes.

 

Earnings per Common Share.

 

Basic EPS is computed by dividing income available to Morgan Stanley common shareholders by the weighted average number of common shares outstanding for the period. Income available to Morgan Stanley common shareholders represents net income applicable to Morgan Stanley reduced by preferred stock dividends and allocations of earnings to participating securities. Common shares outstanding include common stock and vested restricted stock units (“RSUs”) where recipients have satisfied either the explicit vesting terms or retirement eligibility requirements. Diluted EPS reflects the assumed conversion of all dilutive securities.

 

Under current accounting guidance, unvested share-based payment awards that contain non-forfeitable rights to dividends or dividend equivalents (whether paid or unpaid) are participating securities and shall be included in the computation of EPS pursuant to the two-class method. Share-based payment awards that pay dividend equivalents subject to vesting are not deemed participating securities and are included in diluted shares outstanding (if dilutive) under the treasury stock method.

 

The Company has granted performance-based stock units (“PSUs”) that vest and convert to shares of common stock only if the Company satisfies predetermined performance and market goals. Since the issuance of the shares is contingent upon the satisfaction of certain conditions, the PSUs are included in diluted EPS based on the number of shares (if any) that would be issuable if the end of the reporting period was the end of the contingency period.

 

Deferred Compensation.

 

Stock-Based Compensation.    The Company accounts for stock-based compensation in accordance with the accounting guidance for stock-based awards. This accounting guidance requires measurement of compensation cost for stock-based awards at fair value and recognition of compensation cost over the service period, net of estimated forfeitures. The Company determines the fair value of RSUs (including RSUs with non-market performance conditions) based on the grant-date fair value of the Company’s common stock, measured as the volume-weighted average price on the date of grant. RSUs with market-based conditions are valued using a Monte Carlo valuation model. The fair value of stock options is determined using the Black-Scholes valuation model and the single grant life method. Under the single grant life method, option awards with graded vesting are valued using a single weighted average expected option life.

 

Compensation expense for stock-based compensation awards is recognized using the graded vesting attribution method. Compensation expense for awards with performance conditions is recognized based on the probable outcome of the performance condition at each reporting date. At the end of the contingency period, the total compensation cost recognized will be the grant-date fair value of all units that actually vest based on the outcome of the performance conditions. Compensation expense for awards with market-based conditions is recognized irrespective of the probability of the market condition being achieved and is not reversed if the market condition is not met.

 

The Company recognizes the expense for stock-based awards over the requisite service period. For anticipated year-end stock-based awards granted to employees expected to be retirement-eligible under award terms that do not contain a future service requirement, the Company accrues the estimated cost of these awards over the course

 

 	151	 	LOGO
Table of Contents
MORGAN STANLEY

 

NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS—(Continued)

 

of the calendar year preceding the grant date. The Company believes that this method of recognition for retirement-eligible employees is preferable because it better reflects the period over which the compensation is earned. Certain award terms after 2012 performance year introduced a new vesting requirement for employees who satisfy existing retirement-eligible requirements to provide a one-year advance notice of their intention to retire from the Company. As such, expense recognition for these awards begins after the grant date.

 

Employee Stock Trusts.    The Company maintains and utilizes at its discretion, trusts, referred to as the “Employee Stock Trusts”, in connection with certain stock-based compensation plans. The assets of the Employee Stock Trusts are consolidated, and as such, are accounted for in a manner similar to treasury stock, where the shares of common stock outstanding are offset by an equal amount in Common stock issued to Employee Stock Trusts. The Company uses the grant-date fair value of stock-based compensation as the basis for recognition of the assets in the Employee Stock Trusts. Subsequent changes in the fair value are not recognized as the Company’s stock-based compensation plans do not permit diversification and must be settled by the delivery of a fixed number of shares of the Company’s common stock.

 

Deferred Cash-Based Compensation.    The Company also maintains various deferred cash-based compensation plans for the benefit of certain current and former employees that provide a return to the participating employees based upon the performance of various referenced investments. The Company often invests directly, as a principal, in investments or other financial instruments to economically hedge its obligations under its deferred cash-based compensation plans. Changes in value of such investments made by the Company are recorded in Trading revenues and Investment revenues.

 

Compensation expense for deferred cash-based compensation plans is calculated based on the notional value of the award granted, adjusted for upward and downward changes in the fair value of the referenced investments. For unvested awards, the expense is recognized over the service period using the graded vesting attribution method. Changes in compensation expense resulting from changes in the fair value of the referenced investments will generally be offset by changes in the fair value of investments made by the Company. However, there may be a timing difference between the immediate revenue recognition of gains and losses on the Company’s investments and the deferred recognition of the related compensation expense over the vesting period. For vested awards with only notional earnings on the referenced investments, the expense is fully recognized in the current period.

 

Translation of Foreign Currencies.

 

Assets and liabilities of operations having non-U.S. dollar functional currencies are translated at year-end rates of exchange, and amounts recognized in the income statement are translated at the rate of exchange on the respective date of recognition for each amount. Gains or losses resulting from translating foreign currency financial statements, net of hedge gains or losses and related tax effects, are reflected in Accumulated other comprehensive income (loss), a separate component of Morgan Stanley Shareholders’ equity on the consolidated statements of financial condition. Gains or losses resulting from remeasurement of foreign currency transactions are included in net income.

 

Goodwill and Intangible Assets.

 

Goodwill and indefinite-lived intangible assets are not amortized and are reviewed annually (or more frequently when certain events or circumstances exist) for impairment. Other intangible assets are amortized over their estimated useful lives and reviewed for impairment. Impairment losses are recorded within Other expenses in the consolidated statements of income.

 

LOGO	 	152	 	
Table of Contents
MORGAN STANLEY

 

NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS—(Continued)

 

During the quarter ended September 30, 2012, the Company changed the brand name of the U.S. Wealth Management business from Morgan Stanley Smith Barney to Morgan Stanley Wealth Management. The Smith Barney tradename continues to be legally protected by the Company and continues to be used as stipulated by our regulators as the legal entity name for the Company’s retail broker-dealer, Morgan Stanley Smith Barney LLC. As a result of the change in intended use of this tradename, the Company determined that the tradename should be reclassified from an indefinite-lived to a finite-lived intangible asset. This change required the Company to test the intangible asset for impairment. Based on a comparison of the fair value to the carrying value of the tradename as of the date of the brand name change, no impairment was identified. The carrying value of the tradename is amortized over its remaining estimated useful life. See Note 9 for further information about goodwill and intangible assets.

 

Securities Available for Sale.

 

Available for sale (“AFS”) securities are reported at fair value in the consolidated statements of financial condition with unrealized gains and losses reported in Accumulated other comprehensive income (loss), net of tax (“AOCI”). Interest and dividend income, including amortization of premiums and accretion of discounts, is included in Interest income in the consolidated statements of income. Realized gains and losses on AFS securities are reported in the consolidated statements of income (see Note 5). The Company utilizes the “first-in, first-out” method as the basis for determining the cost of AFS securities.

 

Other-than-temporary impairment.    AFS securities with a current fair value less than their amortized cost are analyzed as part of the Company’s periodic assessment of temporary versus other-than-temporary impairment (“OTTI”) at the individual security level. A temporary impairment is recognized in AOCI. OTTI is recognized in the consolidated statements of income with the exception of the non-credit portion related to a debt security that the Company does not intend to sell and is not likely to be required to sell, which is recognized in AOCI.

 

For AFS debt securities that the Company either has the intent to sell or that the Company is likely to be required to sell before recovery of its amortized cost basis, the impairment is considered other-than-temporary.

 

For those AFS debt securities that the Company does not have the intent to sell or is not likely to be required to sell, the Company evaluates whether it expects to recover the entire amortized cost basis of the debt security. If the Company does not expect to recover the entire amortized cost of the debt security, the impairment is considered other-than-temporary and the Company determines what portion of the impairment relates to a credit loss and what portion relates to non-credit factors. A credit loss exists if the present value of cash flows expected to be collected (discounted at the implicit interest rate at acquisition of the security or discounted at the effective yield for securities that incorporate changes in prepayment assumptions) is less than the amortized cost basis of the security. Changes in prepayment assumptions alone are not considered to result in a credit loss. When determining if a credit loss exists, the Company considers relevant information including the length of time and the extent to which the fair value has been less than the amortized cost basis; adverse conditions specifically related to the security, an industry, or geographic area; changes in the financial condition of the issuer of the security, or in the case of an asset-backed debt security, changes in the financial condition of the underlying loan obligors; the historical and implied volatility of the fair value of the security; the payment structure of the debt security and the likelihood of the issuer being able to make payments that increase in the future; failure of the issuer of the security to make scheduled interest or principal payments; any changes to the rating of the security by a rating agency and recoveries or additional declines in fair value after the balance sheet date. When estimating the present value of expected cash flows, information includes the remaining payment terms of the security, prepayment speeds, financial condition of the issuer(s), expected defaults and the value of any underlying collateral.

 

 	153	 	LOGO
Table of Contents
MORGAN STANLEY

 

NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS—(Continued)

 

For AFS equity securities, the Company considers various factors including the intent and ability to hold the equity security for a period of time sufficient to allow for any anticipated recovery in market value in evaluating whether an OTTI exists. If the equity security is considered other-than-temporarily impaired, the entire OTTI (i.e., the difference between the fair value recorded on the balance sheet and the cost basis) will be recognized in the consolidated statement of income.

 

Loans.

 

The Company accounts for loans based on the following categories: loans held for investment; loans held for sale; and loans at fair value.

 

Loans Held for Investment

 

Loans held for investment are reported as outstanding principal adjusted for any charge-offs, the allowance for loan losses, any deferred fees or costs for originated loans, and any unamortized premiums or discounts for purchased loans.

 

Interest Income. Interest income on performing loans held for investment is accrued and recognized as interest income at the contractual rate of interest. Purchase price discounts or premiums, as well as net deferred loan fees or costs, are amortized into interest income over the life of the loan to produce a level rate of return.

 

Allowance for Loan Losses. The allowance for loan losses estimates probable losses related to loans specifically identified for impairment in addition to the probable losses inherent in the held for investment loan portfolio.

 

The Company utilizes the banking regulators’ definition of criticized exposures, which consist of the special mention substandard and doubtful categories as credit quality indicators. Substandard loans are regularly reviewed for impairment. Factors considered by management when determining impairment include payment status, fair value of collateral, and probability of collecting scheduled principal and interest payments when due. The impairment analysis required depends on the nature and type of loans. Loans classified as Doubtful or Loss are considered impaired. When a loan is impaired, the impairment is measured based on the present value of expected future cash flows discounted at the loan’s effective interest rate or as a practical expedient, the observable market price of the loan or the fair value of the collateral if the loan is collateral dependent. If the present value of the expected future cash flows (or alternatively, the observable market price of the loan or the fair value of the collateral) is less than the recorded investment in the loan, then the Company recognizes an allowance and a charge to the provision for loan losses within Other revenues.

 

Generally, inherent losses in the portfolio for non-impaired loans are estimated using statistical analysis and judgment around the exposure at default, the probability of default and the loss given default. Qualitative and environmental factors such as economic and business conditions, nature and volume of the portfolio and lending terms, and volume and severity of past due loans may also be considered in the calculations.

 

Troubled Debt Restructurings. The Company may modify the terms of certain loans for economic or legal reasons related to a borrower’s financial difficulties by granting one or more concessions that the Company would not otherwise consider. Such modifications are accounted for and reported as troubled debt restructurings (“TDRs”). A loan that has been modified in a TDR is generally considered to be impaired and is evaluated for the extent of impairment using the Company’s specific allowance methodology.

 

Nonaccrual Loans. The Company places loans on nonaccrual status if principal or interest is past due for a period of 90 days or more or payment of principal or interest is in doubt unless the obligation is well-secured and in the process of collection. A loan is considered past due when a payment due according to the contractual terms of the

 

LOGO	 	154	 	
Table of Contents
MORGAN STANLEY

 

NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS—(Continued)

 

loan agreement has not been remitted by the borrower. Substandard loans, if identified as impaired, are categorized as nonaccrual. Loans classified as Doubtful or Loss are categorized as nonaccrual.

 

Payments received on nonaccrual loans held for investment are applied to principal if there is doubt regarding the ultimate collectability of principal (i.e., cost recovery method). If collection of the principal of nonaccrual loans held for investment is not in doubt, interest income is recognized on a cash basis. If neither principal nor interest collection is in doubt, loans are on accrual status and interest income is recognized using the effective interest method. Loans that are nonaccrual status may not be restored to accrual status until all delinquent principal and/or interest has been brought current, after a reasonable period of performance, typically a minimum of six months.

 

Charge-offs.    The Company charges off a loan in the period that it is deemed uncollectible and records a reduction in the allowance for loan losses and the balance of the loan. In general, any portion of the recorded investment in a collateral dependent loan (including any capitalized accrued interest, net deferred loan fees or costs and unamortized premium or discount) in excess of the fair value of the collateral that can be identified as uncollectible, and is therefore deemed a confirmed loss, is charged off against the allowance for loan losses. A loan is collateral-dependent if the repayment of the loan is expected to be provided solely by the sale or operation of the underlying collateral. A loan that is charged off is recorded as a reduction in the allowance for loan losses and the balance of the loan. In addition, for loan transfers from loans held for investment to loans held for sale, at the time of transfer, any reduction in the loan value is reflected as a charge-off of the recorded investment, resulting in a new cost basis.

 

Loan Commitments.    The Company records the liability and related expense for the credit exposure related to commitments to fund loans that will be held for investment in a manner similar to outstanding loans disclosed above. The analysis also incorporates a credit conversion factor, which is the expected utilization of the undrawn commitment. The liability is recorded in Other liabilities and accrued expenses on the consolidated statements of financial condition, and the expense is recorded in Other non-interest expenses in the consolidated statements of income. For more information regarding loan commitments, standby letters of credit and financial guarantees, see Note 13.

 

Loans Held for Sale

 

Loans held for sale are measured at the lower of cost or fair value, with valuation changes recorded in Other revenues. The Company determines the valuation allowance on an individual loan basis, except for residential mortgage loans for which the valuation allowance is determined at the loan product level. Any decreases in fair value below the initial carrying amount and any recoveries in fair value up to the initial carrying amount are recorded in Other revenues. However, increases in fair value above initial carrying value are not recognized.

 

Interest income on loans held for sale is accrued and recognized based on the contractual rate of interest. Loan origination fees or costs and purchase price discounts or premiums are deferred in a contra loan account until the related loan is sold. The deferred fees and discounts or premiums are an adjustment to the basis of the loan and, therefore, are included in the periodic determination of the lower of cost or fair value adjustments and/or the gain or loss recognized at the time of sale.

 

Loans held for sale are subject to the nonaccrual policies described above. Because loans held for sale are recognized at the lower of cost or fair value, the allowance for loan losses and charge-off policies do not apply to these loans.

 

Loans at Fair Value

 

Loans for which the fair value option is elected are carried at fair value, with changes in fair value recognized in earnings. Loans carried at fair value are not evaluated for purposes of recording an allowance for loan losses. For further information on loans carried at fair value and classified as Trading assets and Trading liabilities, see Note 4.

 

 	155	 	LOGO
Table of Contents
MORGAN STANLEY

 

NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS—(Continued)

 

For further information on loans, see Note 8.

 

Noncontrolling Interests.

 

For consolidated subsidiaries that are less than wholly owned, the third-party holdings of equity interests are referred to as noncontrolling interests.

 

As a result of the modifications to the purchase agreement regarding the Wealth Management JV, the Company had classified Citi’s interest in the Wealth Management JV as a redeemable noncontrolling interest, as the interest was redeemable at both the option of the Company and upon the occurrence of an event that was not solely within the Company’s control. This interest was classified outside of the equity section in Redeemable noncontrolling interests in the consolidated statements of financial condition at December 31, 2012. This interest was redeemed in June 2013 (see Note 3). Noncontrolling interests that do not contain such redemption features are presented as Nonredeemable noncontrolling interests, a component of total equity, in the consolidated statements of financial condition.

 

Accounting Developments.

 

Disclosures about Offsetting Assets and Liabilities.    In January 2013, the Financial Accounting Standards Board (the “FASB”) issued an accounting update that clarified the intended scope of the new balance sheet offsetting disclosures to derivatives, repurchase agreements, and securities lending transactions to the extent that they are either offset in the financial statements or subject to an enforceable master netting arrangement or similar agreement. These disclosure requirements became effective for the Company beginning on January 1, 2013. Since these amended principles require only additional disclosures concerning offsetting and related arrangements, adoption has not affected the Company’s consolidated financial statements (see Notes 6 and 12).

 

Reporting of Amounts Reclassified Out of Accumulated Other Comprehensive Income.    In February 2013, the FASB issued an accounting update that added new disclosure requirements requiring entities to report the effect of significant reclassifications out of accumulated other comprehensive income on the respective line items in net income if the amount being reclassified is required under U.S. generally accepted accounting principles to be reclassified in its entirety to net income. The disclosure requirements became effective for the Company beginning on January 1, 2013. Since these amended principles require only additional disclosures concerning amounts reclassified out of accumulated other comprehensive income, adoption has not affected the Company’s consolidated financial statements (see Note 15).

 

Inclusion of the Fed Funds Effective Swap Rate (or Overnight Index Swap (“OIS”) Rate) as a Benchmark Interest Rate for Hedge Accounting Purposes.    In July 2013, the FASB issued an accounting update that included amendments permitting the Fed Funds Effective Swap Rate to be used as a U.S. benchmark interest rate for hedge accounting purposes, in addition to interest rates on direct Treasury obligations of the U.S. government and the London Interbank Offered Rate (“LIBOR”). The amendments also removed the restriction on using different benchmark rates for similar hedges. The amendments became effective for the Company for qualifying new or redesignated hedging relationships entered into on or after July 17, 2013. The adoption of this accounting guidance did not have a material impact on the Company’s consolidated financial statements.

 

3.    Wealth Management JV.

 

On May 31, 2009, the Company and Citi consummated the combination of each institution’s respective wealth management business. The combined businesses operated as the Wealth Management JV through June 2013.

 

Prior to September 2012, the Company owned 51% and Citi owned 49% of the Wealth Management JV. On September 17, 2012, the Company purchased an additional 14% stake in the Wealth Management JV from Citi

 

LOGO	 	156	 	
Table of Contents
MORGAN STANLEY

 

NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS—(Continued)

 

for $1.89 billion, increasing the Company’s interest from 51% to 65%. The Company recorded a negative adjustment to Paid-in-capital of approximately $107 million (net of tax) to reflect the difference between the purchase price for the 14% interest in the Wealth Management JV and its carrying value. In addition, in September 2012, the terms of the Wealth Management JV agreement regarding the purchase of the remaining 35% interest were amended, which resulted in a reclassification of approximately $4.3 billion from nonredeemable noncontrolling interests to redeemable noncontrolling interests during the third quarter of 2012. Prior to September 17, 2012, Citi’s results related to its 49% interest were reported in net income (loss) applicable to nonredeemable noncontrolling interests in the consolidated statements of income. Subsequent to the purchase of the additional 14% stake, Citi’s results related to its 35% interest were reported in net income (loss) applicable to redeemable noncontrolling interests in the consolidated statements of income. In connection with the Company’s acquisition of the additional 14% stake in the Wealth Management JV and pursuant to an amended deposit sweep agreement between Citi and the Company, in October 2012, $5.4 billion of deposits held by Citi relating to customer accounts were transferred to the Company’s depository institutions at no premium based on a valuation agreement reached between Citi and the Company, and as such were no longer swept to Citi.

 

In June 2013, the Company received final regulatory approval to acquire the remaining 35% stake in the Wealth Management JV. On June 28, 2013, the Company purchased the remaining 35% interest for $4.725 billion, increasing the Company’s interest from 65% to 100%. The Company recorded a negative adjustment to retained earnings of approximately $151 million (net of tax) to reflect the difference between the purchase price for the 35% interest in the Wealth Management JV and its carrying value. This adjustment negatively impacted the calculation of basic and diluted EPS in 2013 (see Note 16).

 

Additionally, in conjunction with the purchase of the remaining 35% interest, in June 2013, the Company redeemed all of the Class A Preferred Interests in the Wealth Management JV owned by Citi and its affiliates for approximately $2.028 billion and repaid to Citi $880 million in senior debt.

 

Concurrent with the acquisition of the remaining 35% stake in the Wealth Management JV, the deposit sweep agreement between Citi and the Company was terminated. In 2013, $26 billion of deposits held by Citi relating to customer accounts were transferred to the Company’s depository institutions. At December 31, 2013, approximately $30 billion of additional deposits are scheduled to be transferred to the Company’s depository institutions on an agreed-upon basis through June 2015 (see Note 25).

 

4.    Fair Value Disclosures.

 

Fair Value Measurements.

 

A description of the valuation techniques applied to the Company’s major categories of assets and liabilities measured at fair value on a recurring basis follows.

 

Trading Assets and Trading Liabilities.

 

U.S. Government and Agency Securities.

 

 	•	 	
U.S. Treasury Securities.    U.S. Treasury securities are valued using quoted market prices. Valuation adjustments are not applied. Accordingly, U.S. Treasury securities are generally categorized in Level 1 of the fair value hierarchy.

 

 	•	 	
U.S. Agency Securities.    U.S. agency securities are composed of three main categories consisting of agency-issued debt, agency mortgage pass-through pool securities and collateralized mortgage obligations. Non-callable agency-issued debt securities are generally valued using quoted market prices. Callable agency-issued debt securities are valued by benchmarking model-derived prices to quoted market prices and trade data for identical or comparable securities. The fair value of agency mortgage

 

 	157	 	LOGO
Table of Contents
MORGAN STANLEY

 

NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS—(Continued)

 

 	
pass-through pool securities is model-driven based on spreads of the comparable To-be-announced security. Collateralized mortgage obligations are valued using quoted market prices and trade data adjusted by subsequent changes in related indices for identical or comparable securities. Actively traded non-callable agency-issued debt securities are generally categorized in Level 1 of the fair value hierarchy. Callable agency-issued debt securities, agency mortgage pass-through pool securities and collateralized mortgage obligations are generally categorized in Level 2 of the fair value hierarchy.

 

Other Sovereign Government Obligations.

 

 	•	 	
Foreign sovereign government obligations are valued using quoted prices in active markets when available. These bonds are generally categorized in Level 1 of the fair value hierarchy. If the market is less active or prices are dispersed, these bonds are categorized in Level 2 of the fair value hierarchy. In instances where the inputs are unobservable, these bonds are categorized in Level 3 of the fair value hierarchy.

 

Corporate and Other Debt.

 

 	•	 	
State and Municipal Securities.    The fair value of state and municipal securities is determined using recently executed transactions, market price quotations and pricing models that factor in, where applicable, interest rates, bond or credit default swap spreads and volatility. These bonds are generally categorized in Level 2 of the fair value hierarchy.

 

 	•	 	
Residential Mortgage-Backed Securities (“RMBS”), Commercial Mortgage-Backed Securities (“CMBS”) and other Asset-Backed Securities (“ABS”).    RMBS, CMBS and other ABS may be valued based on price or spread data obtained from observed transactions or independent external parties such as vendors or brokers. When position-specific external price data are not observable, the fair value determination may require benchmarking to similar instruments and/or analyzing expected credit losses, default and recovery rates, and/or applying discounted cash flow techniques. In evaluating the fair value of each security, the Company considers security collateral-specific attributes, including payment priority, credit enhancement levels, type of collateral, delinquency rates and loss severity. In addition, for RMBS borrowers, Fair Isaac Corporation (“FICO”) scores and the level of documentation for the loan are also considered. Market standard models, such as Intex, Trepp or others, may be deployed to model the specific collateral composition and cash flow structure of each transaction. Key inputs to these models are market spreads, forecasted credit losses, and default and prepayment rates for each asset category. Valuation levels of RMBS and CMBS indices are also used as an additional data point for benchmarking purposes or to price outright index positions.

 

RMBS, CMBS and other ABS are generally categorized in Level 2 of the fair value hierarchy. If external prices or significant spread inputs are unobservable or if the comparability assessment involves significant subjectivity related to property type differences, cash flows, performance and other inputs, then RMBS, CMBS and other ABS are categorized in Level 3 of the fair value hierarchy.

 

 	•	 	
Corporate Bonds.    The fair value of corporate bonds is determined using recently executed transactions, market price quotations (where observable), bond spreads, credit default swap spreads, at the money volatility and/or volatility skew obtained from independent external parties such as vendors and brokers adjusted for any basis difference between cash and derivative instruments. The spread data used are for the same maturity as the bond. If the spread data do not reference the issuer, then data that reference a comparable issuer are used. When position-specific external price data are not observable, fair value is determined based on either benchmarking to similar instruments or cash flow models with yield curves, bond or single-name credit default swap spreads and recovery rates as significant inputs. Corporate bonds are generally categorized in Level 2 of the fair value hierarchy; in instances where prices, spreads or any of the other aforementioned key inputs are unobservable, they are categorized in Level 3 of the fair value hierarchy.

 

LOGO	 	158	 	
Table of Contents
MORGAN STANLEY

 

NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS—(Continued)

 

 	•	 	
Collateralized Debt and Loan Obligations.    The Company holds cash collateralized debt obligations (“CDOs”)/collateralized loan obligations (“CLOs”) that typically reference a tranche of an underlying synthetic portfolio of single name credit default swaps collateralized by corporate bonds (“credit-linked notes”) or cash portfolio of asset-backed securities/loans (“asset-backed CDOs/CLOs”). Credit correlation, a primary input used to determine the fair value of credit-linked notes, is usually unobservable and derived using a benchmarking technique. The other credit-linked note model inputs such as credit spreads, including collateral spreads, and interest rates are typically observable. Asset-backed CDOs/CLOs are valued based on an evaluation of the market and model input parameters sourced from similar positions as indicated by primary and secondary market activity. Each asset-backed CDO/CLO position is evaluated independently taking into consideration available comparable market levels, underlying collateral performance and pricing, and deal structures, as well as liquidity. Cash CDOs/CLOs are categorized in Level 2 of the fair value hierarchy when either the credit correlation input is insignificant or comparable market transactions are observable. In instances where the credit correlation input is deemed to be significant or comparable market transactions are unobservable, cash CDOs/CLOs are categorized in Level 3 of the fair value hierarchy.

 

 	•	 	
Corporate Loans and Lending Commitments.    The fair value of corporate loans is determined using recently executed transactions, market price quotations (where observable), implied yields from comparable debt, and market observable credit default swap spread levels obtained from independent external parties such as vendors and brokers adjusted for any basis difference between cash and derivative instruments, along with proprietary valuation models and default recovery analysis where such transactions and quotations are unobservable. The fair value of contingent corporate lending commitments is determined by using executed transactions on comparable loans and the anticipated market price based on pricing indications from syndicate banks and customers. The valuation of loans and lending commitments also takes into account fee income that is considered an attribute of the contract. Corporate loans and lending commitments are categorized in Level 2 of the fair value hierarchy except in instances where prices or significant spread inputs are unobservable, in which case they are categorized in Level 3 of the fair value hierarchy.

 

 	•	 	
Mortgage Loans.    Mortgage loans are valued using observable prices based on transactional data or third-party pricing for identical or comparable instruments, when available. Where position-specific external prices are not observable, the Company estimates fair value based on benchmarking to prices and rates observed in the primary market for similar loan or borrower types or based on the present value of expected future cash flows using its best estimates of the key assumptions, including forecasted credit losses, prepayment rates, forward yield curves and discount rates commensurate with the risks involved or a methodology that utilizes the capital structure and credit spreads of recent comparable securitization transactions. Mortgage loans valued based on observable market data for identical or comparable instruments are categorized in Level 2 of the fair value hierarchy. Where observable prices are not available, due to the subjectivity involved in the comparability assessment related to mortgage loan vintage, geographical concentration, prepayment speed and projected loss assumptions, mortgage loans are categorized in Level 3 of the fair value hierarchy. Mortgage loans are presented within Loans and lending commitments in the fair value hierarchy table.

 

 	•	 	
Auction Rate Securities (“ARS”).    The Company primarily holds investments in Student Loan Auction Rate Securities (“SLARS”) and Municipal Auction Rate Securities (“MARS”), which are floating rate instruments for which the rates reset through periodic auctions. SLARS are ABS backed by pools of student loans. MARS are municipal bonds often wrapped by municipal bond insurance. The fair value of ARS is primarily determined using recently executed transactions and market price quotations, obtained from independent external parties such as vendors and brokers, where available. The Company uses an

 

 	159	 	LOGO
Table of Contents
MORGAN STANLEY

 

NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS—(Continued)

 

 	
internally developed methodology to discount for the lack of liquidity and non-performance risk where independent external market data are not available.

 

Inputs that impact the valuation of SLARS are independent external market data, recently executed transactions of comparable ARS, the underlying collateral types, level of seniority in the capital structure, amount of leverage in each structure, credit rating and liquidity considerations. Inputs that impact the valuation of MARS are recently executed transactions, the maximum rate, quality of underlying issuers/insurers and evidence of issuer calls/prepayment. ARS are generally categorized in Level 2 of the fair value hierarchy as the valuation technique relies on observable external data. SLARS and MARS are presented within Asset-backed securities and State and municipal securities, respectively, in the fair value hierarchy table.

 

Corporate Equities.

 

 	•	 	
Exchange-Traded Equity Securities.    Exchange-traded equity securities are generally valued based on quoted prices from the exchange. To the extent these securities are actively traded, valuation adjustments are not applied, and they are categorized in Level 1 of the fair value hierarchy; otherwise, they are categorized in Level 2 or Level 3 of the fair value hierarchy.

 

 	•	 	
Unlisted Equity Securities.    Unlisted equity securities are valued based on an assessment of each underlying security, considering rounds of financing and third-party transactions, discounted cash flow analyses and market-based information, including comparable company transactions, trading multiples and changes in market outlook, among other factors. These securities are generally categorized in Level 3 of the fair value hierarchy.

 

 	•	 	
Fund Units.    Listed fund units are generally marked to the exchange-traded price or net asset value (“NAV”) and are categorized in Level 1 of the fair value hierarchy if actively traded on an exchange or in Level 2 of the fair value hierarchy if trading is not active. Unlisted fund units are generally marked to NAV and categorized as Level 2; however, positions that are not redeemable at the measurement date or in the near future are categorized in Level 3 of the fair value hierarchy.

 

Derivative and Other Contracts.

 

 	•	 	
Listed Derivative Contracts.    Listed derivatives that are actively traded are valued based on quoted prices from the exchange and are categorized in Level 1 of the fair value hierarchy. Listed derivatives that are not actively traded are valued using the same approaches as those applied to OTC derivatives; they are generally categorized in Level 2 of the fair value hierarchy.

 

 	•	 	
OTC Derivative Contracts.    OTC derivative contracts include forward, swap and option contracts related to interest rates, foreign currencies, credit standing of reference entities, equity prices or commodity prices.

 

Depending on the product and the terms of the transaction, the fair value of OTC derivative products can be either observed or modeled using a series of techniques and model inputs from comparable benchmarks, including closed-form analytic formulas, such as the Black-Scholes option-pricing model, and simulation models or a combination thereof. Many pricing models do not entail material subjectivity because the methodologies employed do not necessitate significant judgment, and the pricing inputs are observed from actively quoted markets, as is the case for generic interest rate swaps, certain option contracts and certain credit default swaps. In the case of more established derivative products, the pricing models used by the Company are widely accepted by the financial services industry. A substantial majority of OTC derivative products valued by the Company using pricing models fall into this category and are categorized in Level 2 of the fair value hierarchy.

 

Other derivative products, including complex products that have become illiquid, require more judgment in the implementation of the valuation technique applied due to the complexity of the valuation assumptions and the reduced observability of inputs. This includes certain types of interest rate

 

LOGO	 	160	 	
Table of Contents
MORGAN STANLEY

 

NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS—(Continued)

 

derivatives with both volatility and correlation exposure and credit derivatives, including credit default swaps on certain mortgage-backed or asset-backed securities, basket credit default swaps and CDO-squared positions (a CDO-squared position is a special purpose vehicle that issues interests, or tranches, that are backed by tranches issued by other CDOs) where direct trading activity or quotes are unobservable. These instruments involve significant unobservable inputs and are categorized in Level 3 of the fair value hierarchy.

 

Derivative interests in credit default swaps on certain mortgage-backed or asset-backed securities, for which observability of external price data is limited, are valued based on an evaluation of the market and model input parameters sourced from similar positions as indicated by primary and secondary market activity. Each position is evaluated independently taking into consideration available comparable market levels as well as cash-synthetic basis, or the underlying collateral performance and pricing, behavior of the tranche under various cumulative loss and prepayment scenarios, deal structures (e.g., non-amortizing reference obligations, call features, etc.) and liquidity. While these factors may be supported by historical and actual external observations, the determination of their value as it relates to specific positions nevertheless requires significant judgment.

 

For basket credit default swaps and CDO-squared positions, the correlation input between reference credits is unobservable for each specific swap or position and is benchmarked to standardized proxy baskets for which correlation data are available. The other model inputs such as credit spread, interest rates and recovery rates are observable. In instances where the correlation input is deemed to be significant, these instruments are categorized in Level 3 of the fair value hierarchy; otherwise, these instruments are categorized in Level 2 of the fair value hierarchy.

 

The Company trades various derivative structures with commodity underlyings. Depending on the type of structure, the model inputs generally include interest rate yield curves, commodity underlier price curves, implied volatility of the underlying commodities and, in some cases, the implied correlation between these inputs. The fair value of these products is determined using executed trades and broker and consensus data to provide values for the aforementioned inputs. Where these inputs are unobservable, relationships to observable commodities and data points, based on historic and/or implied observations, are employed as a technique to estimate the model input values. Commodity derivatives are generally categorized in Level 2 of the fair value hierarchy; in instances where significant inputs are unobservable, they are categorized in Level 3 of the fair value hierarchy.

 

For further information on derivative instruments and hedging activities, see Note 12.

 

Investments.

 

 	•	 	
The Company’s investments include direct investments in equity securities as well as investments in private equity funds, real estate funds and hedge funds, which include investments made in connection with certain employee deferred compensation plans. Direct investments are presented in the fair value hierarchy table as Principal investments and Other. Initially, the transaction price is generally considered by the Company as the exit price and is the Company’s best estimate of fair value.

 

After initial recognition, in determining the fair value of non-exchange-traded internally and externally managed funds, the Company generally considers the NAV of the fund provided by the fund manager to be the best estimate of fair value. For non-exchange-traded investments either held directly or held within internally managed funds, fair value after initial recognition is based on an assessment of each underlying investment, considering rounds of financing and third-party transactions, discounted cash flow analyses and market-based information, including comparable company transactions, trading multiples and changes in market outlook, among other factors. Exchange-traded direct equity investments are generally valued based on quoted prices from the exchange.

 

 	161	 	LOGO
Table of Contents
MORGAN STANLEY

 

NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS—(Continued)

 

Exchange-traded direct equity investments that are actively traded are categorized in Level 1 of the fair value hierarchy. Non-exchange-traded direct equity investments and investments in private equity and real estate funds are generally categorized in Level 3 of the fair value hierarchy. Investments in hedge funds that are redeemable at the measurement date or in the near future are categorized in Level 2 of the fair value hierarchy; otherwise, they are categorized in Level 3 of the fair value hierarchy.

 

Physical Commodities.

 

 	•	 	
The Company trades various physical commodities, including crude oil and refined products, natural gas, base and precious metals, and agricultural products. Fair value for physical commodities is determined using observable inputs, including broker quotations and published indices. Physical commodities are categorized in Level 2 of the fair value hierarchy; in instances where significant inputs are unobservable, they are categorized in Level 3 of the fair value hierarchy.

 

Securities Available for Sale.

 

 	•	 	
Securities available for sale are composed of U.S. government and agency securities (e.g., U.S. Treasury securities, agency-issued debt, agency mortgage pass-through securities and collateralized mortgage obligations), CMBS, Federal Family Education Loan Program (“FFELP”) student loan asset-backed securities, auto loan asset-backed securities, corporate bonds, collateralized loan obligations, and equity securities. Actively traded U.S. Treasury securities, non-callable agency-issued debt securities and equity securities are generally categorized in Level 1 of the fair value hierarchy. Callable agency-issued debt securities, agency mortgage pass-through securities, collateralized mortgage obligations, CMBS, FFELP student loan asset-backed securities, auto loan asset-backed securities, corporate bonds and collateralized loan obligations are generally categorized in Level 2 of the fair value hierarchy. For further information on securities available for sale, see Note 5.

 

Deposits.

 

 	•	 	
Time Deposits.    The fair value of certificates of deposit is determined using third-party quotations. These deposits are generally categorized in Level 2 of the fair value hierarchy.

 

Commercial Paper and Other Short-Term Borrowings/Long-Term Borrowings.

 

 	•	 	
Structured Notes.    The Company issues structured notes that have coupon or repayment terms linked to the performance of debt or equity securities, indices, currencies or commodities. Fair value of structured notes is determined using valuation models for the derivative and debt portions of the notes. These models incorporate observable inputs referencing identical or comparable securities, including prices to which the notes are linked, interest rate yield curves, option volatility and currency, and commodity or equity prices. Independent, external and traded prices for the notes are considered as well. The impact of the Company’s own credit spreads is also included based on the Company’s observed secondary bond market spreads. Most structured notes are categorized in Level 2 of the fair value hierarchy.

 

Securities Purchased under Agreements to Resell and Securities Sold under Agreements to Repurchase.

 

 	•	 	
The fair value of a reverse repurchase agreement or repurchase agreement is computed using a standard cash flow discounting methodology. The inputs to the valuation include contractual cash flows and collateral funding spreads, which are estimated using various benchmarks, interest rate yield curves and option volatilities. In instances where the unobservable inputs are deemed significant, reverse repurchase agreements and repurchase agreements are categorized in Level 3 of the fair value hierarchy; otherwise, they are categorized in Level 2 of the fair value hierarchy.

 

LOGO	 	162	 	
Table of Contents
MORGAN STANLEY

 

NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS—(Continued)

 

The following fair value hierarchy tables present information about the Company’s assets and liabilities measured at fair value on a recurring basis at December 31, 2013 and December 31, 2012.

 

Assets and Liabilities Measured at Fair Value on a Recurring Basis at December 31, 2013.

 

 	 	Quoted Prices in
Active Markets for
Identical Assets
(Level 1)	 	 	Significant
Observable
Inputs
(Level 2)	 	 	Significant
Unobservable
Inputs
(Level 3)	 	 	Counterparty
and Cash
Collateral
Netting	 	 	Balance at
December 31,
2013	 
 	 	(dollars in millions)	 
Assets at Fair Value

 				 				 				 				 			
Trading assets:

 				 				 				 				 			
U.S. government and agency securities:

 				 				 				 				 			
U.S. Treasury securities

 	$	32,083	 	 	$	—  	 	 	$	—  	 	 	$	—  	 	 	$	32,083	 
U.S. agency securities

 	 	1,216	 	 	 	17,720	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	18,936	 
 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Total U.S. government and agency securities

 	 	33,299	 	 	 	17,720	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	51,019	 
Other sovereign government obligations

 	 	25,363	 	 	 	6,610	 	 	 	27	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	32,000	 
Corporate and other debt:

 				 				 				 				 			
State and municipal securities

 	 	—  	 	 	 	1,615	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	1,615	 
Residential mortgage-backed securities

 	 	—  	 	 	 	2,029	 	 	 	47	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	2,076	 
Commercial mortgage-backed securities

 	 	—  	 	 	 	1,534	 	 	 	108	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	1,642	 
Asset-backed securities

 	 	—  	 	 	 	878	 	 	 	103	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	981	 
Corporate bonds

 	 	—  	 	 	 	16,592	 	 	 	522	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	17,114	 
Collateralized debt and loan obligations

 	 	—  	 	 	 	802	 	 	 	1,468	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	2,270	 
Loans and lending commitments

 	 	—  	 	 	 	7,483	 	 	 	5,129	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	12,612	 
Other debt

 	 	—  	 	 	 	6,365	 	 	 	27	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	6,392	 
 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Total corporate and other debt

 	 	—  	 	 	 	37,298	 	 	 	7,404	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	44,702	 
Corporate equities(1)

 	 	107,818	 	 	 	1,206	 	 	 	190	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	109,214	 
Derivative and other contracts:

 				 				 				 				 			
Interest rate contracts

 	 	750	 	 	 	526,127	 	 	 	2,475	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	529,352	 
Credit contracts

 	 	—  	 	 	 	42,258	 	 	 	2,088	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	44,346	 
Foreign exchange contracts

 	 	52	 	 	 	61,570	 	 	 	179	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	61,801	 
Equity contracts

 	 	1,215	 	 	 	51,656	 	 	 	1,234	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	54,105	 
Commodity contracts

 	 	2,396	 	 	 	8,595	 	 	 	2,380	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	13,371	 
Other

 	 	—  	 	 	 	43	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	43	 
Netting(2)

 	 	(3,836	) 	 	 	(606,878	) 	 	 	(4,931	) 	 	 	(54,906	) 	 	 	(670,551	) 
 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Total derivative and other contracts

 	 	577	 	 	 	83,371	 	 	 	3,425	 	 	 	(54,906	) 	 	 	32,467	 
Investments:

 				 				 				 				 			
Private equity funds

 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	2,531	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	2,531	 
Real estate funds

 	 	—  	 	 	 	6	 	 	 	1,637	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	1,643	 
Hedge funds

 	 	—  	 	 	 	377	 	 	 	432	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	809	 
Principal investments

 	 	43	 	 	 	42	 	 	 	2,160	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	2,245	 
Other

 	 	202	 	 	 	45	 	 	 	538	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	785	 
 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Total investments

 	 	245	 	 	 	470	 	 	 	7,298	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	8,013	 
Physical commodities

 	 	—  	 	 	 	3,329	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	3,329	 
 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Total trading assets

 	 	167,302	 	 	 	150,004	 	 	 	18,344	 	 	 	(54,906	) 	 	 	280,744	 
Securities available for sale

 	 	24,412	 	 	 	29,018	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	53,430	 
Securities received as collateral

 	 	20,497	 	 	 	11	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	20,508	 
Federal funds sold and securities purchased under agreements to resell

 	 	—  	 	 	 	866	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	866	 
Intangible assets(3)

 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	8	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	8	 
 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Total assets measured at fair value

 	$	212,211	 	 	$	179,899	 	 	$	18,352	 	 	$	(54,906	) 	 	$	355,556	 
 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
 

 	163	 	LOGO
Table of Contents
MORGAN STANLEY

 

NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS—(Continued)

 

 	 	Quoted Prices in
Active Markets for
Identical Assets
(Level 1)	 	 	Significant
Observable
Inputs
(Level 2)	 	 	Significant
Unobservable
Inputs
(Level 3)	 	 	Counterparty
and Cash
Collateral
Netting	 	 	Balance at
December 31,
2013	 
 	 	(dollars in millions)	 
Liabilities at Fair Value

 				 				 				 				 			
Deposits

 	$	—  	 	 	$	185	 	 	$	—  	 	 	$	—  	 	 	$	185	 
Commercial paper and other short-term borrowings

 	 	—  	 	 	 	1,346	 	 	 	1	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	1,347	 
Trading liabilities:

 				 				 				 				 			
U.S. government and agency securities:

 				 				 				 				 			
U.S. Treasury securities

 	 	15,963	  	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	15,963	  
U.S. agency securities

 	 	2,593	  	 	 	116	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	2,709	  
 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Total U.S. government and agency securities

 	 	18,556	 	 	 	116	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	18,672	 
Other sovereign government obligations

 	 	14,717	 	 	 	2,473	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	17,190	 
Corporate and other debt:

 				 				 				 				 			
State and municipal securities

 	 	—  	 	 	 	15	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	15	 
Corporate bonds

 	 	—  	 	 	 	5,033	 	 	 	22	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	5,055	 
Collateralized debt and loan obligations

 	 	—  	 	 	 	3	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	3	 
Unfunded lending commitments

 	 	—  	 	 	 	127	 	 	 	2	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	129	 
Other debt

 	 	—  	 	 	 	1,144	 	 	 	48	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	1,192	 
 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Total corporate and other debt

 	 	—  	 	 	 	6,322	 	 	 	72	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	6,394	 
Corporate equities(1)

 	 	27,983	 	 	 	513	 	 	 	8	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	28,504	 
Derivative and other contracts:

 				 				 				 				 			
Interest rate contracts

 	 	675	 	 	 	504,292	 	 	 	2,362	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	507,329	 
Credit contracts

 	 	—  	 	 	 	40,391	 	 	 	2,235	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	42,626	 
Foreign exchange contracts

 	 	23	 	 	 	61,925	 	 	 	111	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	62,059	 
Equity contracts

 	 	1,033	 	 	 	57,797	 	 	 	2,065	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	60,895	 
Commodity contracts

 	 	2,637	 	 	 	8,749	 	 	 	1,500	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	12,886	 
Other

 	 	—  	 	 	 	72	 	 	 	4	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	76	 
Netting(2)

 	 	(3,836	) 	 	 	(606,878	) 	 	 	(4,931	) 	 	 	(36,465	) 	 	 	(652,110	) 
 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Total derivative and other contracts

 	 	532	 	 	 	66,348	 	 	 	3,346	 	 	 	(36,465	) 	 	 	33,761	 
 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Total trading liabilities

 	 	61,788	 	 	 	75,772	 	 	 	3,426	 	 	 	(36,465	) 	 	 	104,521	 
Obligation to return securities received as collateral

 	 	24,549	 	 	 	19	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	24,568	 
Securities sold under agreements to repurchase

 	 	—  	 	 	 	407	 	 	 	154	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	561	 
Other secured financings

 	 	—  	 	 	 	4,928	 	 	 	278	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	5,206	 
Long-term borrowings

 	 	—  	 	 	 	33,750	 	 	 	1,887	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	35,637	 
 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Total liabilities measured at fair value

 	$	86,337	 	 	$	116,407	 	 	$	5,746	 	 	$	(36,465	) 	 	$	172,025	 
 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
 

(1)	The Company holds or sells short for trading purposes equity securities issued by entities in diverse industries and of varying size.
(2)	For positions with the same counterparty that cross over the levels of the fair value hierarchy, both counterparty netting and cash collateral netting are included in the column titled “Counterparty and Cash Collateral Netting.” For contracts with the same counterparty, counterparty netting among positions classified within the same level is included within that level. For further information on derivative instruments and hedging activities, see Note 12.
(3)	Amount represents mortgage servicing rights (“MSR”) accounted for at fair value. See Note 7 for further information on MSRs.
 

Transfers Between Level 1 and Level 2 During 2013.

 

For assets and liabilities that were transferred between Level 1 and Level 2 during the period, fair values are ascribed as if the assets or liabilities had been transferred as of the beginning of the period.

 

In 2013, there were no material transfers between Level 1 and Level 2.

 

LOGO	 	164	 	
Table of Contents
MORGAN STANLEY

 

NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS—(Continued)

 

Assets and Liabilities Measured at Fair Value on a Recurring Basis at December 31, 2012.

 

 	  	Quoted Prices in
Active Markets for
Identical Assets
(Level 1)	 	 	Significant
Observable
Inputs
(Level 2)	 	 	Significant
Unobservable
Inputs
(Level 3)	 	 	Counterparty
and Cash
Collateral
Netting	 	 	Balance at
December 31,
2012	 
 	  	(dollars in millions)	 
Assets at Fair Value

  				 				 				 				 			
Trading assets:

  				 				 				 				 			
U.S. government and agency securities:

  				 				 				 				 			
U.S. Treasury securities

  	$	24,662	 	 	$	14	 	 	$	—  	 	 	$	—  	 	 	$	24,676	 
U.S. agency securities

  	 	1,451	 	 	 	27,888	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	29,339	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Total U.S. government and agency securities

  	 	26,113	 	 	 	27,902	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	54,015	 
Other sovereign government obligations

  	 	37,669	 	 	 	5,487	 	 	 	6	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	43,162	 
Corporate and other debt:

  				 				 				 				 			
State and municipal securities

  	 	—  	 	 	 	1,558	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	1,558	 
Residential mortgage-backed securities

  	 	—  	 	 	 	1,439	 	 	 	45	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	1,484	 
Commercial mortgage-backed securities

  	 	—  	 	 	 	1,347	 	 	 	232	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	1,579	 
Asset-backed securities

  	 	—  	 	 	 	915	 	 	 	109	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	1,024	 
Corporate bonds

  	 	—  	 	 	 	18,403	 	 	 	660	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	19,063	 
Collateralized debt and loan obligations

  	 	—  	 	 	 	685	 	 	 	1,951	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	2,636	 
Loans and lending commitments

  	 	—  	 	 	 	12,617	 	 	 	4,694	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	17,311	 
Other debt

  	 	—  	 	 	 	4,457	 	 	 	45	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	4,502	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Total corporate and other debt

  	 	—  	 	 	 	41,421	 	 	 	7,736	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	49,157	 
Corporate equities(1)

  	 	68,072	 	 	 	1,067	 	 	 	288	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	69,427	 
Derivative and other contracts:

  				 				 				 				 			
Interest rate contracts

  	 	446	 	 	 	819,581	 	 	 	3,774	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	823,801	 
Credit contracts

  	 	—  	 	 	 	63,234	 	 	 	5,033	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	68,267	 
Foreign exchange contracts

  	 	34	 	 	 	52,729	 	 	 	31	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	52,794	 
Equity contracts

  	 	760	 	 	 	37,074	 	 	 	766	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	38,600	 
Commodity contracts

  	 	4,082	 	 	 	14,256	 	 	 	2,308	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	20,646	 
Other

  	 	—  	 	 	 	143	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	143	 
Netting(2)

  	 	(4,740	) 	 	 	(883,733	) 	 	 	(6,947	) 	 	 	(72,634	) 	 	 	(968,054	) 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Total derivative and other contracts

  	 	582	 	 	 	103,284	 	 	 	4,965	 	 	 	(72,634	) 	 	 	36,197	 
Investments:

  				 				 				 				 			
Private equity funds

  	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	2,179	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	2,179	 
Real estate funds

  	 	—  	 	 	 	6	 	 	 	1,370	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	1,376	 
Hedge funds

  	 	—  	 	 	 	382	 	 	 	552	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	934	 
Principal investments

  	 	185	 	 	 	83	 	 	 	2,833	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	3,101	 
Other

  	 	199	 	 	 	71	 	 	 	486	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	756	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Total investments

  	 	384	 	 	 	542	 	 	 	7,420	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	8,346	 
Physical commodities

  	 	—  	 	 	 	7,299	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	7,299	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Total trading assets

  	 	132,820	 	 	 	187,002	 	 	 	20,415	 	 	 	(72,634	) 	 	 	267,603	 
Securities available for sale

  	 	14,466	 	 	 	25,403	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	39,869	 
Securities received as collateral

  	 	14,232	 	 	 	46	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	14,278	 
Federal funds sold and securities purchased under agreements to resell

  	 	—  	 	 	 	621	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	621	 
Intangible assets(3)

  	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	7	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	7	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Total assets measured at fair value

  	$	161,518	 	 	$	213,072	 	 	$	20,422	 	 	$	(72,634	) 	 	$	322,378	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
 

 	165	 	LOGO
Table of Contents
MORGAN STANLEY

 

NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS—(Continued)

 

 	  	Quoted Prices in
Active Markets for
Identical Assets
(Level 1)	 	 	Significant
Observable
Inputs
(Level 2)	 	 	Significant
Unobservable
Inputs
(Level 3)	 	 	Counterparty
and Cash
Collateral
Netting	 	 	Balance at
December 31,
2012	 
 	  	(dollars in millions)	 
Liabilities at Fair Value

  				 				 				 				 			
Deposits

  	$	—  	 	 	$	1,485	 	 	$	—  	 	 	$	—  	 	 	$	1,485	 
Commercial paper and other short-term borrowings

  	 	—  	 	 	 	706	 	 	 	19	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	725	 
Trading liabilities:

  				 				 				 				 			
U.S. government and agency securities:

  				 				 				 				 			
U.S. Treasury securities

  	 	20,098	 	 	 	21	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	20,119	 
U.S. agency securities

  	 	1,394	 	 	 	107	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	1,501	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Total U.S. government and agency securities

  	 	21,492	 	 	 	128	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	21,620	 
Other sovereign government obligations

  	 	27,583	 	 	 	2,031	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	29,614	 
Corporate and other debt:

  				 				 				 				 			
State and municipal securities

  	 	—  	 	 	 	47	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	47	 
Residential mortgage-backed securities

  	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	4	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	4	 
Corporate bonds

  	 	—  	 	 	 	3,942	 	 	 	177	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	4,119	 
Collateralized debt and loan obligations

  	 	—  	 	 	 	328	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	328	 
Unfunded lending commitments

  	 	—  	 	 	 	305	 	 	 	46	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	351	 
Other debt

  	 	—  	 	 	 	156	 	 	 	49	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	205	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Total corporate and other debt

  	 	—  	 	 	 	4,778	 	 	 	276	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	5,054	 
Corporate equities(1)

  	 	25,216	 	 	 	1,655	 	 	 	5	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	26,876	 
Derivative and other contracts:

  				 				 				 				 			
Interest rate contracts

  	 	533	 	 	 	789,715	 	 	 	3,856	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	794,104	 
Credit contracts

  	 	—  	 	 	 	61,283	 	 	 	3,211	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	64,494	 
Foreign exchange contracts

  	 	2	 	 	 	56,021	 	 	 	390	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	56,413	 
Equity contracts

  	 	748	 	 	 	39,212	 	 	 	1,910	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	41,870	 
Commodity contracts

  	 	4,530	 	 	 	15,702	 	 	 	1,599	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	21,831	 
Other

  	 	—  	 	 	 	54	 	 	 	7	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	61	 
Netting(2)

  	 	(4,740	) 	 	 	(883,733	) 	 	 	(6,947	) 	 	 	(46,395	) 	 	 	(941,815	) 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Total derivative and other contracts

  	 	1,073	 	 	 	78,254	 	 	 	4,026	 	 	 	(46,395	) 	 	 	36,958	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Total trading liabilities

  	 	75,364	 	 	 	86,846	 	 	 	4,307	 	 	 	(46,395	) 	 	 	120,122	 
Obligation to return securities received as collateral

  	 	18,179	 	 	 	47	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	18,226	 
Securities sold under agreements to repurchase

  	 	—  	 	 	 	212	 	 	 	151	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	363	 
Other secured financings

  	 	—  	 	 	 	9,060	 	 	 	406	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	9,466	 
Long-term borrowings

  	 	—  	 	 	 	41,255	 	 	 	2,789	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	44,044	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Total liabilities measured at fair value

  	$	93,543	 	 	$	139,611	 	 	$	7,672	 	 	$	(46,395	) 	 	$	194,431	 
  	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
 

(1)	The Company holds or sells short for trading purposes equity securities issued by entities in diverse industries and of varying size.
(2)	For positions with the same counterparty that cross over the levels of the fair value hierarchy, both counterparty netting and cash collateral netting are included in the column titled “Counterparty and Cash Collateral Netting.” For contracts with the same counterparty, counterparty netting among positions classified within the same level is included within that level. For further information on derivative instruments and hedging activities, see Note 12.
(3)	Amount represents MSRs accounted for at fair value. See Note 7 for further information on MSRs.
 

Transfers Between Level 1 and Level 2 During 2012.

 

For assets and liabilities that were transferred between Level 1 and Level 2 during the period, fair values are ascribed as if the assets or liabilities had been transferred as of the beginning of the period.

 

LOGO	 	166	 	
Table of Contents
MORGAN STANLEY

 

NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS—(Continued)

 

Trading assets—Derivative and other contracts and Trading liabilities—Derivative and other contracts.    During 2012, the Company reclassified approximately $3.2 billion of derivative assets and approximately $2.5 billion of derivative liabilities from Level 2 to Level 1 as these listed derivatives became actively traded and were valued based on quoted prices from the exchange. Also during 2012, the Company reclassified approximately $0.4 billion of derivative assets and approximately $0.3 billion of derivative liabilities from Level 1 to Level 2 as transactions in these contracts did not occur with sufficient frequency and volume to constitute an active market.

 

Level 3 Assets and Liabilities Measured at Fair Value on a Recurring Basis.

 

The following tables present additional information about Level 3 assets and liabilities measured at fair value on a recurring basis for 2013, 2012 and 2011, respectively. Level 3 instruments may be hedged with instruments classified in Level 1 and Level 2. As a result, the realized and unrealized gains (losses) for assets and liabilities within the Level 3 category presented in the tables below do not reflect the related realized and unrealized gains (losses) on hedging instruments that have been classified by the Company within the Level 1 and/or Level 2 categories.

 

Additionally, both observable and unobservable inputs may be used to determine the fair value of positions that the Company has classified within the Level 3 category. As a result, the unrealized gains (losses) during the period for assets and liabilities within the Level 3 category presented in the tables below may include changes in fair value during the period that were attributable to both observable (e.g., changes in market interest rates) and unobservable (e.g., changes in unobservable long-dated volatilities) inputs.

 

For assets and liabilities that were transferred into Level 3 during the period, gains (losses) are presented as if the assets or liabilities had been transferred into Level 3 at the beginning of the period; similarly, for assets and liabilities that were transferred out of Level 3 during the period, gains (losses) are presented as if the assets or liabilities had been transferred out at the beginning of the period.

 

 	167	 	LOGO
Table of Contents
MORGAN STANLEY

 

NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS—(Continued)

 

Changes in Level 3 Assets and Liabilities Measured at Fair Value on a Recurring Basis for 2013.

 

 	 	Beginning
Balance at
December 31,
2012	 	 	Total Realized
and Unrealized
Gains (Losses)(1)	 	 	Purchases	 	 	Sales	 	 	Issuances	 	 	Settlements	 	 	Net Transfers	 	 	Ending
Balance at
December 31,
2013	 	 	Unrealized
Gains (Losses)
for Level 3
Assets/
Liabilities
Outstanding at
December 31,
2013(2)	 
 	 	(dollars in millions)	 
Assets at Fair Value

 				 				 				 				 				 				 				 				 			
Trading assets:

 				 				 				 				 				 				 				 				 			
Other sovereign government obligations

 	$	6	 	 	$	(18	) 	 	$	41	 	 	$	(7	) 	 	$	—  	 	 	$	—  	 	 	$	5	 	 	$	27	 	 	$	(18	) 
Corporate and other debt:

 				 				 				 				 				 				 				 				 			
Residential mortgage-backed securities

 	 	45	 	 	 	25	 	 	 	54	 	 	 	(51	) 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	(26	) 	 	 	47	 	 	 	(6	) 
Commercial mortgage-backed securities

 	 	232	 	 	 	13	 	 	 	57	 	 	 	(187	) 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	(7	) 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	108	 	 	 	4	 
Asset-backed securities

 	 	109	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	6	 	 	 	(12	) 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	103	 	 	 	—  	 
Corporate bonds

 	 	660	 	 	 	(20	) 	 	 	324	 	 	 	(371	) 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	(19	) 	 	 	(52	) 	 	 	522	 	 	 	(55	) 
Collateralized debt and loan obligations

 	 	1,951	 	 	 	363	 	 	 	742	 	 	 	(960	) 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	(626	) 	 	 	(2	) 	 	 	1,468	 	 	 	131	 
Loans and lending commitments

 	 	4,694	 	 	 	(130	) 	 	 	3,744	 	 	 	(448	) 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	(3,096	) 	 	 	365	 	 	 	5,129	 	 	 	(199	) 
Other debt

 	 	45	 	 	 	(1	) 	 	 	20	 	 	 	(36	) 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	(1	) 	 	 	27	 	 	 	(2	) 
 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Total corporate and other debt

 	 	7,736	 	 	 	250	 	 	 	4,947	 	 	 	(2,065	) 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	(3,748	) 	 	 	284	 	 	 	7,404	 	 	 	(127	) 
Corporate equities

 	 	288	 	 	 	(63	) 	 	 	113	 	 	 	(127	) 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	(21	) 	 	 	190	 	 	 	(72	) 
Net derivative and other contracts(3):

 				 				 				 				 				 				 				 				 			
Interest rate contracts

 	 	(82	) 	 	 	28	 	 	 	6	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	(34	) 	 	 	135	 	 	 	60	 	 	 	113	 	 	 	36	 
Credit contracts

 	 	1,822	 	 	 	(1,674	) 	 	 	266	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	(703	) 	 	 	(295	) 	 	 	437	 	 	 	(147	) 	 	 	(1,723	) 
Foreign exchange contracts

 	 	(359	) 	 	 	130	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	281	 	 	 	16	 	 	 	68	 	 	 	124	 
Equity contracts

 	 	(1,144	) 	 	 	463	 	 	 	170	 	 	 	(74	) 	 	 	(318	) 	 	 	(11	) 	 	 	83	 	 	 	(831	) 	 	 	61	 
Commodity contracts

 	 	709	 	 	 	200	 	 	 	41	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	(36	) 	 	 	(29	) 	 	 	(5	) 	 	 	880	 	 	 	174	 
Other

 	 	(7	) 	 	 	(6	) 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	9	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	(4	) 	 	 	(7	) 
 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Total net derivative and other contracts

 	 	939	 	 	 	(859	) 	 	 	483	 	 	 	(74	) 	 	 	(1,091	) 	 	 	90	 	 	 	591	 	 	 	79	 	 	 	(1,335	) 
Investments:

 				 				 				 				 				 				 				 				 			
Private equity funds

 	 	2,179	 	 	 	704	 	 	 	212	 	 	 	(564	) 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	2,531	 	 	 	657	 
Real estate funds

 	 	1,370	 	 	 	413	 	 	 	103	 	 	 	(249	) 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	1,637	 	 	 	625	 
Hedge funds

 	 	552	 	 	 	10	 	 	 	62	 	 	 	(163	) 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	(29	) 	 	 	432	 	 	 	10	 
Principal investments

 	 	2,833	 	 	 	110	 	 	 	111	 	 	 	(445	) 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	(449	) 	 	 	2,160	 	 	 	3	 
Other

 	 	486	 	 	 	76	 	 	 	13	 	 	 	(36	) 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	(1	) 	 	 	538	 	 	 	77	 
 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Total investments

 	 	7,420	 	 	 	1,313	 	 	 	501	 	 	 	(1,457	) 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	(479	) 	 	 	7,298	 	 	 	1,372	 
Intangible assets

 	 	7	 	 	 	9	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	(8	) 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	8	 	 	 	3	 
Liabilities at Fair Value

 				 				 				 				 				 				 				 				 			
Commercial paper and other short-term borrowings

 	$	19	 	 	$	—  	 	 	$	—  	 	 	$	—  	 	 	$	—  	 	 	$	(1	) 	 	$	(17	) 	 	$	1	 	 	
$

—  

 

Trading liabilities:

 				 				 				 				 				 				 				 				 			
Corporate and other debt:

 				 				 				 				 				 				 				 				 			
Residential mortgage-backed securities

 	 	4	 	 	 	4	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	4	 
Corporate bonds

 	 	177	 	 	 	28	 	 	 	(64	) 	 	 	43	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	(106	) 	 	 	22	 	 	 	28	 
Unfunded lending commitments

 	 	46	 	 	 	44	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	2	 	 	 	44	 
Other debt

 	 	49	 	 	 	2	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	5	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	(6	) 	 	 	2	 	 	 	48	 	 	 	2	 
 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Total corporate and other debt

 	 	276	 	 	 	78	 	 	 	(64	) 	 	 	48	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	(6	) 	 	 	(104	) 	 	 	72	 	 	 	78	 
Corporate equities

 	 	5	 	 	 	1	 	 	 	(26	) 	 	 	29	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	1	 	 	 	8	 	 	 	3	 
Securities sold under agreements to repurchase

 	 	151	 	 	 	(3	) 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	154	 	 	 	(3	) 
Other secured financings

 	 	406	 	 	 	11	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	19	 	 	 	(136	) 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	278	 	 	 	4	 
Long-term borrowings

 	 	2,789	 	 	 	(162	) 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	877	 	 	 	(606	) 	 	 	(1,335	) 	 	 	1,887	 	 	 	(138	) 
 

(1)	Total realized and unrealized gains (losses) are primarily included in Trading revenues in the consolidated statements of income except for $1,313 million related to Trading assets—Investments, which is included in Investments revenues.
(2)	Amounts represent unrealized gains (losses) for 2013 related to assets and liabilities still outstanding at December 31, 2013.
(3)	Net derivative and other contracts represent Trading assets—Derivative and other contracts net of Trading liabilities—Derivative and other contracts. For further information on derivative instruments and hedging activities, see Note 12.
 

LOGO	 	168	 	
Table of Contents
MORGAN STANLEY

 

NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS—(Continued)

 

Long-term borrowings.    During 2013, the Company reclassified approximately $1.3 billion of certain long-term borrowings, primarily structured notes, from Level 3 to Level 2. The Company reclassified the structured notes as the unobservable embedded derivative component became insignificant to the overall valuation.

 

In 2013, there were no material transfers from Level 2 to Level 3.

 

Changes in Level 3 Assets and Liabilities Measured at Fair Value on a Recurring Basis for 2012.

 

 	 	Beginning
Balance at
December 31,
2011	 	 	Total  Realized
and
Unrealized
Gains
(Losses)(1)	 	 	Purchases	 	 	Sales	 	 	Issuances	 	 	Settlements	 	 	Net Transfers	 	 	Ending
Balance at
December 31,
2012	 	 	Unrealized
Gains (Losses)
for Level 3
Assets/Liabilities
Outstanding at
December 31,
2012(2)	 
 	 	(dollars in millions)	 
Assets at Fair Value

 				 				 				 				 				 				 				 				 			
Trading assets:

 				 				 				 				 				 				 				 				 			
U.S. agency securities

 	$	8	 	 	$	—  	 	 	$	—  	 	 	$	(7	) 	 	$	—  	 	 	$	—  	 	 	$	(1	) 	 	$	—  	 	 	$	—  	 
Other sovereign government obligations

 	 	119	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	12	 	 	 	(125	) 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	6	 	 	 	(9	) 
Corporate and other debt:

 				 				 				 				 				 				 				 				 			
Residential mortgage-backed securities

 	 	494	 	 	 	(9	) 	 	 	32	 	 	 	(285	) 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	(187	) 	 	 	45	 	 	 	(26	) 
Commercial mortgage-backed securities

 	 	134	 	 	 	32	 	 	 	218	 	 	 	(49	) 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	(100	) 	 	 	(3	) 	 	 	232	 	 	 	28	 
Asset-backed securities

 	 	31	 	 	 	1	 	 	 	109	 	 	 	(32	) 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	109	 	 	 	(1	) 
Corporate bonds

 	 	675	 	 	 	22	 	 	 	447	 	 	 	(450	) 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	(34	) 	 	 	660	 	 	 	(7	) 
Collateralized debt and loan obligations

 	 	980	 	 	 	216	 	 	 	1,178	 	 	 	(384	) 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	(39	) 	 	 	1,951	 	 	 	142	 
Loans and lending commitments

 	 	9,590	 	 	 	37	 	 	 	2,648	 	 	 	(2,095	) 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	(4,316	) 	 	 	(1,170	) 	 	 	4,694	 	 	 	(91	) 
Other debt

 	 	128	 	 	 	2	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	(95	) 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	10	 	 	 	45	 	 	 	(6	) 
 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Total corporate and other debt

 	 	12,032	 	 	 	301	 	 	 	4,632	 	 	 	(3,390	) 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	(4,416	) 	 	 	(1,423	) 	 	 	7,736	 	 	 	39	 
Corporate equities

 	 	417	 	 	 	(59	) 	 	 	134	 	 	 	(172	) 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	(32	) 	 	 	288	 	 	 	(83	) 
Net derivative and other contracts(3):

 				 				 				 				 				 				 				 				 			
Interest rate contracts

 	 	420	 	 	 	(275	) 	 	 	28	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	(7	) 	 	 	(217	) 	 	 	(31	) 	 	 	(82	) 	 	 	297	 
Credit contracts

 	 	5,814	 	 	 	(2,799	) 	 	 	112	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	(502	) 	 	 	(961	) 	 	 	158	 	 	 	1,822	 	 	 	(3,216	) 
Foreign exchange contracts

 	 	43	 	 	 	(279	) 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	19	 	 	 	(142	) 	 	 	(359	) 	 	 	(225	) 
Equity contracts

 	 	(1,234	) 	 	 	390	 	 	 	202	 	 	 	(9	) 	 	 	(112	) 	 	 	(210	) 	 	 	(171	) 	 	 	(1,144	) 	 	 	241	 
Commodity contracts

 	 	570	 	 	 	114	 	 	 	16	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	(41	) 	 	 	(20	) 	 	 	70	 	 	 	709	 	 	 	222	 
Other

 	 	(1,090	) 	 	 	57	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	236	 	 	 	790	 	 	 	(7	) 	 	 	53	 
 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Total net derivative and other contracts

 	 	4,523	 	 	 	(2,792	) 	 	 	358	 	 	 	(9	) 	 	 	(662	) 	 	 	(1,153	) 	 	 	674	 	 	 	939	 	 	 	(2,628	) 
Investments:

 				 				 				 				 				 				 				 				 			
Private equity funds

 	 	1,936	 	 	 	228	 	 	 	308	 	 	 	(294	) 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	1	 	 	 	2,179	 	 	 	147	 
Real estate funds

 	 	1,213	 	 	 	149	 	 	 	143	 	 	 	(136	) 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	1	 	 	 	1,370	 	 	 	229	 
Hedge funds

 	 	696	 	 	 	61	 	 	 	81	 	 	 	(151	) 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	(135	) 	 	 	552	 	 	 	51	 
Principal investments

 	 	2,937	 	 	 	130	 	 	 	160	 	 	 	(419	) 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	25	 	 	 	2,833	 	 	 	93	 
Other

 	 	501	 	 	 	(45	) 	 	 	158	 	 	 	(70	) 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	(58	) 	 	 	486	 	 	 	(48	) 
 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Total investments

 	 	7,283	 	 	 	523	 	 	 	850	 	 	 	(1,070	) 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	(166	) 	 	 	7,420	 	 	 	472	 
Physical commodities

 	 	46	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	(46	) 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 
Intangible assets

 	 	133	 	 	 	(39	) 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	(83	) 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	(4	) 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	7	 	 	 	(7	) 
Liabilities at Fair Value

 				 				 				 				 				 				 				 				 			
Commercial paper and other short-term borrowings

 	$	2	 	 	$	(5	) 	 	$	—  	 	 	$	—  	 	 	$	3	 	 	$	(3	) 	 	$	12	 	 	$	19	 	 	$	(4	) 
Trading liabilities:

 				 				 				 				 				 				 				 				 			
Other sovereign government obligations

 	 	8	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	(8	) 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 
Corporate and other debt:

 				 				 				 				 				 				 				 				 			
Residential mortgage-backed securities

 	 	355	 	 	 	(4	) 	 	 	(355	) 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	4	 	 	 	(4	) 
Corporate bonds

 	 	219	 	 	 	(15	) 	 	 	(129	) 	 	 	110	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	(38	) 	 	 	177	 	 	 	(23	) 
Unfunded lending commitments

 	 	85	 	 	 	39	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	46	 	 	 	39	 
Other debt

 	 	73	 	 	 	9	 	 	 	(1	) 	 	 	36	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	(55	) 	 	 	5	 	 	 	49	 	 	 	11	 
 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Total corporate and other debt

 	 	732	 	 	 	29	 	 	 	(485	) 	 	 	146	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	(55	) 	 	 	(33	) 	 	 	276	 	 	 	23	 
Corporate equities

 	 	1	 	 	 	(1	) 	 	 	(21	) 	 	 	22	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	2	 	 	 	5	 	 	 	(3	) 
Securities sold under agreements to repurchase

 	 	340	 	 	 	(14	) 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	(203	) 	 	 	151	 	 	 	(14	) 
Other secured financings

 	 	570	  	 	 	(69	) 	 	 	—  	  	 	 	—  	  	 	 	21	  	 	 	(232	) 	 	 	(22	) 	 	 	406	  	 	 	(67	) 
Long-term borrowings

 	 	1,603	 	 	 	(651	) 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	1,050	 	 	 	(279	) 	 	 	(236	) 	 	 	2,789	 	 	 	(652	) 
 

 	169	 	LOGO
Table of Contents
MORGAN STANLEY

 

NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS—(Continued)

 

 

(1)	Total realized and unrealized gains (losses) are primarily included in Trading revenues in the consolidated statements of income except for $523 million related to Trading assets—Investments, which is included in Investments revenues.
(2)	Amounts represent unrealized gains (losses) for 2012 related to assets and liabilities still outstanding at December 31, 2012.
(3)	Net derivative and other contracts represent Trading assets—Derivative and other contracts, net of Trading liabilities—Derivative and other contracts. For further information on derivative instruments and hedging activities, see Note 12.
 

Trading assets—Corporate and other debt.    During 2012, the Company reclassified approximately $1.9 billion of certain Corporate and other debt, primarily loans, from Level 3 to Level 2. The Company reclassified the loans as external prices and/or spread inputs for these instruments became observable.

 

The Company also reclassified approximately $0.5 billion of certain Corporate and other debt from Level 2 to Level 3. The reclassifications were primarily related to corporate loans and were generally due to a reduction in market price quotations for these or comparable instruments, or a lack of available broker quotes, such that unobservable inputs had to be utilized for the fair value measurement of these instruments.

 

Trading assets—Net derivative and other contracts.    During 2012, the Company reclassified approximately $1.4 billion of certain credit derivative assets and approximately $1.2 billion of certain credit derivative liabilities from Level 3 to Level 2. These reclassifications were primarily related to single name credit default swaps and basket credit default swaps for which certain unobservable inputs became insignificant to the overall measurement.

 

The Company also reclassified approximately $0.6 billion of certain credit derivative assets and approximately $0.3 billion of certain credit derivative liabilities from Level 2 to Level 3. The reclassifications were primarily related to basket credit default swaps for which certain unobservable inputs became significant to the overall measurement.

 

LOGO	 	170	 	
Table of Contents
MORGAN STANLEY

 

NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS—(Continued)

 

Changes in Level 3 Assets and Liabilities Measured at Fair Value on a Recurring Basis for 2011.

 

 	 	Beginning
Balance at
December 31,
2010	 	 	Total Realized
and Unrealized
Gains (Losses)(1)	 	 	Purchases	 	 	Sales	 	 	Issuances	 	 	Settlements	 	 	Net
Transfers	 	 	Ending
Balance at
December 31,
2011	 	 	Unrealized
Gains (Losses)
for Level 3
Assets/
Liabilities
Outstanding at
December 31,
2011(2)	 
 	 	(dollars in millions)	 
Assets at Fair Value

 				 				 				 				 				 				 				 				 			
Trading assets:

 				 				 				 				 				 				 				 				 			
U.S. agency securities

 	$	13	 	 	$	—  	 	 	$	66	 	 	$	(68	) 	 	$	—  	 	 	$	—  	 	 	$	(3	) 	 	$	8	 	 	$	—  	 
Other sovereign government obligations

 	 	73	 	 	 	(4	) 	 	 	56	 	 	 	(2	) 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	(4	) 	 	 	119	 	 	 	(2	) 
Corporate and other debt:

 				 				 				 				 				 				 				 				 			
State and municipal securities

 	 	110	 	 	 	(1	) 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	(96	) 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	(13	) 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 
Residential mortgage-backed securities

 	 	319	 	 	 	(61	) 	 	 	382	 	 	 	(221	) 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	(1	) 	 	 	76	 	 	 	494	 	 	 	(59	) 
Commercial mortgage-backed securities

 	 	188	 	 	 	12	 	 	 	75	 	 	 	(90	) 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	(51	) 	 	 	134	 	 	 	(18	) 
Asset-backed securities

 	 	13	 	 	 	4	 	 	 	13	 	 	 	(19	) 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	20	 	 	 	31	 	 	 	2	 
Corporate bonds

 	 	1,368	 	 	 	(136	) 	 	 	467	 	 	 	(661	) 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	(363	) 	 	 	675	 	 	 	(20	) 
Collateralized debt and loan obligations

 	 	1,659	 	 	 	109	 	 	 	613	 	 	 	(1,296	) 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	(55	) 	 	 	(50	) 	 	 	980	 	 	 	(84	) 
Loans and lending commitments

 	 	11,666	 	 	 	(251	) 	 	 	2,932	 	 	 	(1,241	) 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	(2,900	) 	 	 	(616	) 	 	 	9,590	 	 	 	(431	) 
Other debt

 	 	193	 	 	 	42	 	 	 	14	 	 	 	(76	) 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	(11	) 	 	 	(34	) 	 	 	128	 	 	 	—  	 
 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Total corporate and other debt

 	 	15,516	 	 	 	(282	) 	 	 	4,496	 	 	 	(3,700	) 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	(2,967	) 	 	 	(1,031	) 	 	 	12,032	 	 	 	(610	) 
Corporate equities

 	 	484	 	 	 	(46	) 	 	 	416	 	 	 	(360	) 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	(77	) 	 	 	417	 	 	 	16	 
Net derivative and other contracts(3):

 				 				 				 				 				 				 				 				 			
Interest rate contracts

 	 	424	 	 	 	628	 	 	 	45	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	(714	) 	 	 	(150	) 	 	 	187	 	 	 	420	 	 	 	522	 
Credit contracts

 	 	6,594	 	 	 	319	 	 	 	1,199	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	(277	) 	 	 	(2,165	) 	 	 	144	 	 	 	5,814	 	 	 	1,818	 
Foreign exchange contracts

 	 	46	 	 	 	(35	) 	 	 	2	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	28	 	 	 	2	 	 	 	43	 	 	 	(13	) 
Equity contracts

 	 	(762	) 	 	 	592	 	 	 	214	 	 	 	(133	) 	 	 	(1,329	) 	 	 	136	 	 	 	48	 	 	 	(1,234	) 	 	 	564	 
Commodity contracts

 	 	188	 	 	 	708	 	 	 	52	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	(433	) 	 	 	55	 	 	 	570	 	 	 	689	 
Other

 	 	(913	) 	 	 	(552	) 	 	 	1	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	(118	) 	 	 	405	 	 	 	87	 	 	 	(1,090	) 	 	 	(536	) 
 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Total net derivative and other contracts

 	 	5,577	 	 	 	1,660	 	 	 	1,513	 	 	 	(133	) 	 	 	(2,438	) 	 	 	(2,179	) 	 	 	523	 	 	 	4,523	 	 	 	3,044	 
Investments:

 				 				 				 				 				 				 				 				 			
Private equity funds

 	 	1,986	 	 	 	159	 	 	 	245	 	 	 	(513	) 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	59	 	 	 	1,936	 	 	 	85	 
Real estate funds

 	 	1,176	 	 	 	21	 	 	 	196	 	 	 	(171	) 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	(9	) 	 	 	1,213	 	 	 	251	 
Hedge funds

 	 	901	 	 	 	(20	) 	 	 	169	 	 	 	(380	) 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	26	 	 	 	696	 	 	 	(31	) 
Principal investments

 	 	3,131	 	 	 	288	 	 	 	368	 	 	 	(819	) 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	(31	) 	 	 	2,937	 	 	 	87	 
Other

 	 	560	 	 	 	38	 	 	 	8	 	 	 	(34	) 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	(71	) 	 	 	501	 	 	 	23	 
 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Total investments

 	 	7,754	 	 	 	486	 	 	 	986	 	 	 	(1,917	) 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	(26	) 	 	 	7,283	 	 	 	415	 
Physical commodities

 	 	—  	 	 	 	(47	) 	 	 	771	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	(673	) 	 	 	(5	) 	 	 	46	 	 	 	1	 
Securities received as collateral

 	 	1	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	(1	) 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 
Intangible assets

 	 	157	 	 	 	(25	) 	 	 	6	 	 	 	(1	) 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	(4	) 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	133	 	 	 	(27	) 
Liabilities at Fair Value

 				 				 				 				 				 				 				 				 			
Deposits

 	$	16	 	 	$	2	 	 	$	—  	 	 	$	—  	 	 	$	—  	 	 	$	(14	) 	 	$	—  	 	 	$	—  	 	 	$	—  	 
Commercial paper and other short-term borrowings

 	 	2	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	2	 	 	 	—  	 
Trading liabilities:

 				 				 				 				 				 				 				 				 			
Other sovereign government obligations

 	 	—  	 	 	 	1	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	9	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	8	 	 	 	—  	 
Corporate and other debt:

 				 				 				 				 				 				 				 				 			
Residential mortgage-backed securities

 	 	—  	 	 	 	(8	) 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	347	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	355	 	 	 	(8	) 
Corporate bonds

 	 	44	 	 	 	37	 	 	 	(407	) 	 	 	694	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	(75	) 	 	 	219	 	 	 	51	 
Unfunded lending commitments

 	 	263	 	 	 	178	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	85	 	 	 	178	 
Other debt

 	 	194	 	 	 	123	 	 	 	(12	) 	 	 	22	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	(2	) 	 	 	(6	) 	 	 	73	 	 	 	12	 
 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 	 	
 

 

 
Total corporate and other debt

 	 	501	 	 	 	330	 	 	 	(419	) 	 	 	1,063	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	(2	) 	 	 	(81	) 	 	 	732	 	 	 	233	 
Corporate equities

 	 	15	 	 	 	(1	) 	 	 	(15	) 	 	 	5	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	(5	) 	 	 	1	 	 	 	—  	 
Obligation to return securities received as collateral

 	 	1	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	(1	) 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 
Securities sold under agreements to repurchase

 	 	351	 	 	 	11	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	340	 	 	 	11	 
Other secured financings

 	 	1,016	 	 	 	27	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	154	 	 	 	(267	) 	 	 	(306	) 	 	 	570	 	 	 	13	 
Long-term borrowings

 	 	1,316	 	 	 	39	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	—  	 	 	 	769	 	 	 	(377	) 	 	 	(66	) 	 	 	1,603	 	 	 	32	 
 

(1)	Total realized and unrealized gains (losses) are primarily included in Trading revenues in the consolidated statements of income except for $486 million related to Trading assets—Investments, which is included in Investments revenues.
 

 	171	 	LOGO
Table of Contents
MORGAN STANLEY

 

NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS—(Continued)

 

(2)	Amounts represent unrealized gains (losses) for 2011 related to assets and liabilities still outstanding at December 31, 2011.
(3)	Net derivative and other contracts represent Trading assets—Derivative and other contracts, net of Trading liabilities—Derivative and other contracts. For further information on derivative instruments and hedging activities, see Note 12.
 

Trading assets—Corporate and other debt.    During 2011, the Company reclassified approximately $1.8 billion of certain Corporate and other debt, primarily corporate loans, from Level 3 to Level 2. The Company reclassified these corporate loans as external prices and/or spread inputs for these instruments became observable.

 

The Company also reclassified approximately $0.8 billion of certain Corporate and other debt from Level 2 to Level 3. The reclassifications were primarily related to corporate loans and were generally due to a reduction in market price quotations for these or comparable instruments, or a lack of available broker quotes, such that unobservable inputs had to be utilized for the fair value measurement of these instruments.

 

Quantitative Information about and Sensitivity of Significant Unobservable Inputs Used in Recurring Level 3 Fair Value Measurements at December 31, 2013 and December 31, 2012.

 

The disclosures below provide information on the valuation techniques, significant unobservable inputs and their ranges and averages for each major category of assets and liabilities measured at fair value on a recurring basis with a significant Level 3 balance. The level of aggregation and breadth of products cause the range of inputs to be wide and not evenly distributed across the inventory. Further, the range of unobservable inputs may differ across firms in the financial services industry because of diversity in the types of products included in each firm’s inventory. The following disclosures also include qualitative information on the sensitivity of the fair value measurements to changes in the significant unobservable inputs.

 

LOGO	 	172	 	
Table of Contents
MORGAN STANLEY

 

NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS—(Continued)

 

At December 31, 2013.

 

 	 	Balance at
December  31,
2013
(dollars  in
millions)	 	 	
Valuation

Technique(s)

 	
Significant Unobservable Input(s) /

Sensitivity of the Fair Value to Changes

in the Unobservable Inputs

 	Range(1)	 	Averages(2)
Assets

 				 		 		 		 		 		 		 				 	
Trading assets:

 				 		 		 		 		 		 		 				 	
Corporate and other debt:

 	 	 	 	 	 	 	 	 	 	 	 	 	 	 	 	 	 	 	 	 	 
Commercial mortgage-backed securities

 	$	108	 	 	Comparable pricing	 	Comparable bond price / (A)	 	40 to 93	 	points	 	 	78	  	 	points
Asset-backed securities

 	 	103	 	 	Discounted cash flow	 	Discount rate / (C)	 	18	 	%	 	 	18	  	 	%
Corporate bonds

 	 	522	 	 	Comparable pricing	 	Comparable bond price / (A)	 	1 to 159	 	points	 	 	85	  	 	points
Collateralized debt and loan obligations

 	 	1,468	 	 	Comparable pricing(6)	 	Comparable bond price / (A)	 	18 to 99	 	points	 	 	73	  	 	points
 	 	 	 	 	 	Correlation model	 	Credit correlation / (B)	 	29 to 59	 	%	 	 	43	  	 	%
Loans and lending commitments

 	 	5,129	 	 	Corporate loan model	 	Credit spread / (C)	 	28 to 487	 	basis points	 	 	249	  	 	basis points
 				 	Margin loan model	 	Credit spread / (C)(D)	 	10 to 265	 	basis points	 	 	135	  	 	basis points
 				 		 	Volatility skew / (C)(D)	 	3 to 40	 	%	 	 	14	  	 	%
 				 		 	Comparable bond price / (A)(D)	 	80 to 120	 	points	 	 	100	  	 	points
 				 	Option model	 	Volatility skew / (C)	 	-1 to 0	 	%	 	 	0	  	 	%
 				 	Comparable pricing(6)	 	Comparable loan price / (A)	 	10 to 100	 	points	 	 	76	  	 	points
Corporate equities(3)

 	 	190	 	 	Net asset value(6)	 	Discount to net asset value / (C)	 	0 to 85	 	%	 	 	43	  	 	%
 				 	Comparable pricing	 	Comparable equity price / (A)	 	0 to 100	 	%	 	 	47	  	 	%
 				 	Comparable pricing	 	Comparable price / (A)	 	0 to 100	 	points	 	 	50	  	 	points
 				 	Market approach	 	EBITDA multiple / (A)(D)	 	5 to 9	 	times	 	 	6	  	 	times
 				 		 	Price/Book ratio / (A)(D)	 	0 to 1	 	times	 	 	1	  	 	times
Net derivative and other contracts:

 	 	 	 	 	 	 	 	 	 	 	 	 	 	 	 	 	 
Interest rate contracts

 	 	113	 	 	Option model	 	
Interest rate volatility concentration

liquidity multiple / (C)(D)

 	0 to 6	 	
times

 	 	2	  	 	times
 				 		 	Comparable bond price / (A)(D)	 	5 to 100	 	points	 	 	58	  	 	points / 65 points (4)
 				 		 	
Interest rate—Foreign exchange

correlation / (A)(D)

 	3 to 63	 	%	 	 	43	  	 	% / 48%(4)
 				 		 	Interest rate volatility skew / (A)(D)	 	24 to 50	 	%	 	 	33	  	 	% / 28%(4)
 				 		 	
Interest rate quanto correlation / (A)(D)

 	-11 to 34	 	%	 	 	8	  	 	% / 5%(4)
 				 		 	
Interest rate curve correlation / (A)(D)

 	46 to 92	 	%	 	 	74	  	 	% / 80%(4)
 				 		 	Inflation volatility / (A)(D)	 	77 to 86	 	%	 	 	81	  	 	% / 80%(4)
Credit contracts

 	 	(147)	  	 	Comparable pricing	 	Cash synthetic basis / (C)(D)	 	2 to 5	 	points	 	 	4	  	 	points
 				 		 	Comparable bond price / (C)(D)	 	0 to 75	 	points	 	 	27	  	 	points
 				 	
Correlation model(6)

 	Credit correlation / (B)	 	19 to 96	 	%	 	 	56	  	 	%
Foreign exchange contracts(5)

 	 	68	 	 	Option model	 	Comparable bond price / (A)(D)	 	5 to 100	 	points	 	 	58	  	 	points / 65 points (4)
 				 		 	
Interest rate quanto correlation / (A)(D)

 	-11 to 34	 	%	 	 	8	  	 	% / 5%(4)
 				 		 	
Interest rate curve correlation / (A)(D)

 	46 to 92	 	%	 	 	74	  	 	% / 80%(4)
 				 		 	
Interest rate—Foreign exchange correlation / (A)(D)

 	3 to 63	 	%	 	 	43	  	 	% / 48%(4)
 				 		 	Interest rate volatility skew / (A)(D)	 	24 to 50	 	%	 	 	33	  	 	% / 28%(4)
 				 		 	Interest rate curve / (A)(D)	 	0 to 1	 	%	 	 	1	  	 	% / 0%(4)
Equity contracts(5)

 	 	(831)	  	 	Option model	 	At the money volatility / (A)(D)	 	20 to 53	 	%	 	 	31	  	 	%
 				 		 	Volatility skew / (A)(D)	 	-3 to 0	 	%	 	 	-1	  	 	%
 				 		 	Equity—Equity correlation / (C)(D)	 	40 to 99	 	%	 	 	69	  	 	%
 				 		 	
Equity—Foreign exchange correlation / (C)(D)

 	-50 to 9	 	%	 	 	-20	  	 	%
 	 	 	 	 	 	 	 	
Equity—Interest rate correlation / (C)(D)

 	-4 to 70	 	%	 	 	39	  	 	% / 40%(4)
 

 	173	 	LOGO
Table of Contents
MORGAN STANLEY

 

NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS—(Continued)

 

 	 	Balance at
December  31,
2013
(dollars  in
millions)	 	 	
Valuation

Technique(s)

 	
Significant Unobservable Input(s) /

Sensitivity of the Fair Value to Changes

in the Unobservable Inputs

 	Range(1)	 	Averages(2)
Commodity contracts

 	 	880	 	 	Option model	 	Forward power price / (C)(D)	 	$14 to $91	 	per	 	$	40	  	 	per
 				 		 		 	Megawatt hour	 	 	Megawatt hour
 				 		 	Commodity volatility / (A)(D)	 	11 to 30	 	%	 	 	14	  	 	%
 				 		 	
Cross commodity correlation / (C)(D)

 	34 to 99	 	%	 	 	93	  	 	%
Investments(3):

 	 	 	 	 	 	 	 	 	 	 	 	 	 	 	 	 	 	 	 	 	 
Principal investments

 	 	2,160	 	 	
Discounted cash flow

 	
Implied weighted average cost of capital / (C)(D)

 	12	 	%	 	 	12	  	 	%
 				 		 	
Exit multiple / (A)(D)

 	9	 	times	 	 	9	  	 	times
 				 	
Discounted cash flow(6)

 	
Capitalization rate / (C)(D)

 	5 to 13	 	%	 	 	7	  	 	%
 				 		 	
Equity discount rate / (C)(D)

 	10 to 30	 	%	 	 	21	  	 	%
 				 	
Market approach

 	
EBITDA multiple / (A)

 	5 to 6	 	times	 	 	5	  	 	times
Other

 	 	538	 	 	
Discounted cash flow

 	
Implied weighted average cost of capital / (C)(D)

 	7 to 10	 	%	 	 	8	  	 	%
 				 		 	
Exit multiple / (A)(D)

 	7 to 9	 	times	 	 	9	  	 	times
 				 	
Market approach(6)

 	
EBITDA multiple / (A)

 	8 to 14	 	times	 	 	10	  	 	times
Liabilities

 	 	 	 	 	 	 	 	 	 	 	 	 	 	 	 	 	 	 	 	 	 
Securities sold under agreements to repurchase

 	$	154	 	 	
Discounted cash flow

 	
Funding spread / (A)

 	92 to 97	 	basis points	 	 	95	  	 	basis points
Other secured financings

 	 	278	 	 	
Comparable pricing(6)

 	
Comparable bond price / (A)

 	99 to 102	 	points	 	 	101	  	 	points
 				 	
Discounted cash flow

 	
Funding spread / (A)

 	97	 	basis points	 	 	97	  	 	basis points
Long-term borrowings

 	 	1,887	 	 	
Option model

 	
At the money volatility / (C)(D)

 	20 to 33	 	%	 	 	26	  	 	%
 				 		 	
Volatility skew / (A)(D)

 	-2 to 0	 	%	 	 	0	  	 	%
 				 		 	
Equity—Equity correlation /(A)(D)

 	50 to 70	 	%	 	 	69	  	 	%
 	 	 	 	 	 	 	 	
Equity—Foreign exchange correlation / (C)(D)

 	-60 to 0	 	%	 	 	-23	  	 	%
 

EBITDA—Earnings before interest, taxes, depreciation and amortization

(1)	The ranges of significant unobservable inputs are represented in points, percentages, basis points, times or megawatt hours. Points are a percentage of par; for example, 93 points would be 93% of par. A basis point equals 1/100th of 1%; for example, 487 basis points would equal 4.87%.
(2)	Amounts represent weighted averages except where simple averages and the median of the inputs are provided (see footnote 4 below). Weighted averages are calculated by weighting each input by the fair value of the respective financial instruments except for long-term borrowings and derivative instruments where inputs are weighted by risk.
(3)	Investments in funds measured using an unadjusted NAV are excluded.
(4)	The data structure of the significant unobservable inputs used in valuing Interest rate contracts, Foreign exchange contracts and certain Equity contracts may be in a multi-dimensional form, such as a curve or surface, with risk distributed across the structure. Therefore, a simple average and median, together with the range of data inputs, may be more appropriate measurements than a single point weighted average.
(5)	Includes derivative contracts with multiple risks (i.e., hybrid products).
(6)	This is the predominant valuation technique for this major asset or liability class.
 

Sensitivity of the fair value to changes in the unobservable inputs:

(A)	Significant increase (decrease) in the unobservable input in isolation would result in a significantly higher (lower) fair value measurement.
(B)	Significant changes in credit correlation may result in a significantly higher or lower fair value measurement. Increasing (decreasing) correlation drives a redistribution of risk within the capital structure such that junior tranches become less (more) risky and senior tranches become more (less) risky.
(C)	Significant increase (decrease) in the unobservable input in isolation would result in a significantly lower (higher) fair value measurement.
(D)	There are no predictable relationships between the significant unobservable inputs.
 

LOGO	 	174	 	
Table of Contents
MORGAN STANLEY

 

NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS—(Continued)

 

At December 31, 2012.

 

 	 	Balance at
December  31,
2012
(dollars in
millions)	 	 	
Valuation

Technique(s)

 	
Significant Unobservable Input(s) /

Sensitivity of the Fair Value to Changes

in the Unobservable Inputs

 	Range(1)	 	Weighted
Average
Assets

 				 		 		 		 		 				 		 				 	
Trading assets:

 				 		 		 		 		 				 		 				 	
Corporate and other debt:

 	 	 	 	 	 	 	 	 	 	 	 	 	 	 	 	 	 	 	 	 	 	 	 
Commercial mortgage-backed securities

 	$	232	 	 	Comparable pricing	 	Comparable bond price / (A)	 	46 to 100	  	 	points	 	 	76	  	 	points
Asset-backed securities

 	 	109	 	 	Discounted cash flow	 	Discount rate / (C)	 	21	  	 	%	 	 	21	  	 	%
Corporate bonds

 	 	660	 	 	Comparable pricing	 	Comparable bond price / (A)	 	0 to 143	  	 	points	 	 	24	  	 	points
Collateralized debt and loan obligations

 	 	1,951	 	 	Comparable pricing	 	Comparable bond price / (A)	 	15 to 88	  	 	points	 	 	59	  	 	points
 	 	 	 	 	 	Correlation model	 	Credit correlation / (B)	 	15 to 45	  	 	%	 	 	40	  	 	%
Loans and lending commitments

 	 	4,694	 	 	Corporate loan model	 	Credit spread / (C)	 	17 to 1,004	 	 	basis points	 	 	281	  	 	basis points
 				 	Comparable pricing	 	Comparable bond price / (A)	 	80 to 120	  	 	points	 	 	104	  	 	points
 				 	Comparable pricing	 	Comparable loan price / (A)	 	55 to 100	  	 	points	 	 	88	  	 	points
Corporate equities(2)

 	 	288	 	 	Net asset value	 	Discount to net asset value / (C)	 	0 to 37	  	 	%	 	 	8	  	 	%
 				 	Comparable pricing	 	
Discount to comparable
equity price / (C)

 	0 to 27	  	 	points	 	 	14	  	 	points
 				 	Market approach	 	EBITDA multiple / (A)	 		 		 	 	6	  	 	times	 	 	6	  	 	times
Net derivative and other contracts:

 	 	 	 	 	 	 	 	 	 	 	 	 	 	 	 	 	 	 	 	 	 	 	 
Interest rate contracts

 	 	(82	) 	 	Option model	 	
Interest rate volatility concentration

liquidity multiple / (C)(D)

 	0 to 8	  	 	times	 				 	See (3)
 				 		 	Comparable bond price / (A)(D)	 	5 to 98	  	 	points	 				 	
 				 		 	
Interest rate—Foreign exchange

correlation / (A)(D)

 	2 to 63	  	 	%	 				 	
 				 		 	Interest rate volatility skew / (A)(D)	 	9 to 95	  	 	%	 				 	
 				 		 	
Interest rate quanto correlation / (A)(D)

 	-53 to 33	  	 	%	 				 	
 				 		 	Interest rate curve correlation / (A)(D)	 	48 to 99	  	 	%	 				 	
 				 		 	Inflation volatility / (A)(D)	 	49 to 100	  	 	%	 				 	
 				 	
Discounted cash flow

 	
Forward commercial paper rate-LIBOR basis / (A)

 	-18 to 95	  	 	basis points	 				 	
Credit contracts

 	 	1,822	 	 	Comparable pricing	 	Cash synthetic basis / (C)	 	2 to 14	  	 	points	 	 	 	 